Author:Rashad Khalifa
Lang:en
Titles:The Key;The Heifer;The Amramites;Women;The Feast;Livestock;The Purgatory;The Spoils of War;Ultimatum;Jonah;Hood;Joseph;Thunder;Abraham;Al-Hijr Valley;The Bee;The Children Of Israel;The Cave;Mary;T.H.;The Prophets;Pilgrimage;The Believers;Light;The Statute Book;The Poets;The Ant;History;The Spider;The Romans;Luqmaan;Proxstration;The Parties;Sheba;Initiator;Y.S.;The Arrangers;S.;The Throngs;Forgiver;Detailed;Consultation;Ornaments;Smoke;Kneeling;The Dunes;Muhammad;Victory;The Walls;Q.;Drivers of the Winds;Mount Sinai;The Stars;The Moon;Most gracious;The Inevitable;Iron;The Debate;Exodus;The Test;The Column;Friday;The Hypocrites;Mutual Blaming;Divorce;Prohibition;Kingship;The Pen;Incontestable;The Heights;Noah;Jinns;Cloaked;The Hidden Secret;Resurrection;The Human;Dispatched;The Event;The Snatchers;He Frowned;The Rolling;The Shattering;The Cehaters;The Rupture;The Galaxies;The Bright Star;The Most High;Overwhelming;Dawn;The Town;The Sun;The Night;The Forenoon;Cooling the Temper;The Fig;The Embryo;Destiny;Proof;The Quake;The Gallopers;The Shocker;Hoarding;The Afternoon;The Backbiter;The Elephant;Quraish Tribe;Charity;Bounty;The Disbelievers;Triumph;Thorns;Absoluteness;Daybreak;People
In the name of GOD, Most Gracious, Most Merciful.
Praise be to GOD, Lord of the universe.
Most Gracious, Most Merciful.
Master of the Day of Judgment.
You alone we worship; You alone we ask for help.
Guide us in the right path;
the path of those whom You blessed; not of those who have deserved wrath, nor of the strayers.
A.L.M.
This scripture is infallible; a beacon for the righteous;
who believe in the unseen, observe the Contact Prayers (Salat), and from our provisions to them, they give to charity.
And they believe in what was revealed to you, and in what was revealed before you, and with regard to the Hereafter, they are absolutely certain.
These are guided by their Lord; these are the winners.
As for those who disbelieve, it is the same for them; whether you warn them, or not warn them, they cannot believe.
GOD seals their minds and their hearing, and their eyes are veiled. They have incurred severe retribution.
Then there are those who say, "We believe in GOD and the Last Day," while they are not believers.
In trying to deceive GOD and those who believe, they only deceive themselves without perceiving.
In their minds there is a disease. Consequently, GOD augments their disease. They have incurred a painful retribution for their lying.
When they are told, "Do not commit evil," they say, "But we are righteous!"
In fact, they are evildoers, but they do not perceive.
When they are told, "Believe like the people who believed," they say, "Shall we believe like the fools who believed?" In fact, it is they who are fools, but they do not know.
When they meet the believers, they say, "We believe," but when alone with their devils, they say, "We are with you; we were only mocking."
GOD mocks them, and leads them on in their transgressions, blundering.
It is they who bought the straying, at the expense of guidance. Such trade never prospers, nor do they receive any guidance.
Their example is like those who start a fire, then, as it begins to shed light around them, GOD takes away their light, leaving them in darkness, unable to see.
Deaf, dumb, and blind; they fail to return.
Another example: a rainstorm from the sky in which there is darkness, thunder, and lightning. They put their fingers in their ears, to evade death. GOD is fully aware of the disbelievers.
The lightning almost snatches away their eyesight. When it lights for them, they move forward, and when it turns dark, they stand still. If GOD wills, He can take away their hearing and their eyesight. GOD is Omnipotent.
O people, worship only your Lord -the One who created you and those before you- that you may be saved.
The One who made the earth habitable for you, and the sky a structure. He sends down from the sky water, to produce all kinds of fruits for your sustenance. You shall not set up idols to rival GOD, now that you know.
If you have any doubt regarding what we revealed to our servant, then produce one sura like these, and call upon your own witnesses against GOD, if you are truthful.
If you cannot do this-and you can never do this-then beware of the Hellfire, whose fuel is people and rocks; it awaits the disbelievers.
Give good news to those who believe and lead a righteous life that they will have gardens with flowing streams. When provided with a provision of fruits therein, they will say, "This is what was provided for us previously." Thus, they are given allegorical descriptions. They will have pure spouses therein, and they abide therein forever.
GOD does not shy away from citing any kind of allegory, from the tiny mosquito and greater. As for those who believe, they know that it is the truth from their Lord. As for those who disbelieve, they say, "What did GOD mean by such an allegory?" He misleads many thereby, and guides many thereby. But He never misleads thereby except the wicked,
who violate GOD's covenant after pledging to uphold it, sever what GOD has commanded to be joined, and commit evil. These are the losers.
How can you disbelieve in GOD when you were dead and He gave you life, then He puts you to death, then He brings you back to life, then to Him you ultimately return?
He is the One who created for you everything on earth, then turned to the sky and perfected seven universes therein, and He is fully aware of all things.
Recall that your Lord said to the angels, "I am placing a representative(a temporary god) on Earth." They said, "Will You place therein one who will spread evil therein and shed blood, while we sing Your praises, glorify You, and uphold Your absolute authority?" He said, "I know what you do not know."
He taught Adam all the names then presented them to the angels, saying, "Give me the names of these, if you are right."
They said, "Be You glorified, we have no knowledge, except that which You have taught us. You are the Omniscient, Most Wise."
He said, "O Adam, tell them their names." When he told them their names, He said, "Did I not tell you that I know the secrets of the heavens and the earth? I know what you declare, and what you conceal."
When we said to the angels, "Fall prostrate before Adam," they fell prostrate, except Satan; he refused, was too arrogant, and a disbeliever.
We said, "O Adam, live with your wife in Paradise, and eat therefrom generously, as you please, but do not approach this tree, lest you sin."
But the devil duped them, and caused their eviction therefrom. We said, "Go down as enemies of one another. On Earth shall be your habitation and provision for awhile."
Then, Adam received from his Lord words, whereby He redeemed him. He is the Redeemer, Most Merciful.
We said, "Go down therefrom, all of you. When guidance comes to you from Me, those who follow My guidance will have no fear, nor will they grieve.
"As for those who disbelieve and reject our revelations, they will be dwellers of Hell, wherein they abide forever."
O Children of Israel, remember My favor, which I bestowed upon you, and fulfill your part of the covenant, that I fulfill My part of the covenant, and reverence Me.
You shall believe in what I have revealed herein, confirming what you have; do not be the first to reject it. Do not trade away My revelations for a cheap price, and observe Me.
Do not confound the truth with falsehood, nor shall you conceal the truth, knowingly.
You shall observe the Contact Prayers (Salat) and give the obligatory charity (Zakat), and bow down with those who bow down.
Do you exhort the people to be righteous, while forgetting yourselves, though you read the scripture? Do you not understand?
You shall seek help through steadfastness and the Contact Prayers (Salat). This is difficult indeed, but not so for the reverent,
who believe that they will meet their Lord; that to Him they ultimately return.
O Children of Israel, remember My favor which I bestowed upon you, and that I blessed you more than any other people.
Beware of the day when no soul can avail another soul, no intercession will be accepted, no ransom can be paid, nor can anyone be helped.
Recall that we saved you from Pharaoh's people who inflicted upon you the worst persecution, slaying your sons and sparing your daughters. That was an exacting test from your Lord.
Recall that we parted the sea for you; we saved you and drowned Pharaoh's people before your eyes.
Yet, when we summoned Moses for forty nights, you worshiped the calf in his absence, and turned wicked.
Still, we pardoned you thereafter that you may be appreciative.
Recall that we gave Moses scripture and the statute book, that you may be guided.
Recall that Moses said to his people, "O my people, you have wronged your souls by worshiping the calf. You must repent to your Creator. You shall kill your egos. This is better for you in the sight of your Creator." He did redeem you. He is the Redeemer, Most Merciful.
Recall that you said, "O Moses, we will not believe unless we see GOD, physically." Consequently, the lightning struck you, as you looked.
We then revived you, after you had died, that you may be appreciative.
We shaded you with clouds (in Sinai), and sent down to you manna and quails: "Eat from the good things we provided for you." They did not hurt us (by rebelling); they only hurt their own souls.
Recall that we said, "Enter this town, where you will find as many provisions as you like. Just enter the gate humbly, and treat the people nicely. We will then forgive your sins, and increase the reward for the pious."
But the wicked among them carried out commands other than the commands given to them. Consequently, we sent down upon the transgressors condemnation from the sky, due to their wickedness.
Recall that Moses sought water for his people. We said, "Strike the rock with your staff." Where-upon, twelve springs gushed out therefrom. The members of each tribe knew their own water. Eat and drink from GOD's provisions, and do not roam the earth corruptingly.
Recall that you said, "O Moses, we can no longer tolerate one kind of food. Call upon your Lord to produce for us such earthly crops as beans, cucumbers, garlic, lentils, and onions." He said, "Do you wish to substitute that which is inferior for that which is good? Go down to Egypt, where you can find what you asked for." They have incurred condemnation, humiliation, and disgrace, and brought upon themselves wrath from GOD. This is because they rejected GOD's revelations, and killed the prophets unjustly. This is because they disobeyed and transgressed.
Surely, those who believe, those who are Jewish, the Christians, and the converts; anyone who (1) believes in GOD, and (2) believes in the Last Day, and (3) leads a righteous life, will receive their recompense from their Lord. They have nothing to fear, nor will they grieve.
We made a covenant with you, as we raised Mount Sinai above you: "You shall uphold what we have given you strongly, and remember its contents, that you may be saved."
But you turned away thereafter, and if it were not for GOD's grace towards you and His mercy, you would have been doomed.
You have known about those among you who desecrated the Sabbath. We said to them, "Be you as despicable as apes."
We set them up as an example for their generation, as well as subsequent generations, and an enlightenment for the righteous.
Moses said to his people, "GOD commands you to sacrifice a heifer." They said, "Are you mocking us?" He said, "GOD forbid, that I should behave like the ignorant ones."
They said, "Call upon your Lord to show us which one." He said, "He says that she is a heifer that is neither too old, nor too young; of an intermediate age. Now, carry out what you are commanded to do."
They said, "Call upon your Lord to show us her color." He said, "He says that she is a yellow heifer, bright colored, pleases the beholders."
They said, "Call upon your Lord to show us which one. The heifers look alike to us and, GOD willing, we will be guided."
He said, "He says that she is a heifer that was never humiliated in plowing the land or watering the crops; free from any blemish." They said, "Now you have brought the truth." They finally sacrificed her, after this lengthy reluctance.
You had killed a soul, then disputed among yourselves. GOD was to expose what you tried to conceal.
We said, "Strike (the victim) with part (of the heifer)." That is when GOD brought the victim back to life, and showed you His signs, that you may understand.
Despite this, your hearts hardened like rocks, or even harder. For there are rocks from which rivers gush out. Others crack and release gentle streams, and other rocks cringe out of reverence for GOD. GOD is never unaware of anything you do.
Do you expect them to believe as you do, when some of them used to hear the word of GOD, then distort it, with full understanding thereof, and deliberately?
And when they meet the believers, they say, "We believe," but when they get together with each other, they say, "Do not inform (the believers) of the information given to you by GOD, lest you provide them with support for their argument concerning your Lord. Do you not understand?"
Do they not know that GOD knows everything they conceal, and everything they declare?
Among them are gentiles who do not know the scripture, except through hearsay, then assume that they know it.
Therefore, woe to those who distort the scripture with their own hands, then say, "This is what GOD has revealed," seeking a cheap material gain. Woe to them for such distortion, and woe to them for their illicit gains.
Some have said, "Hell will not touch us, except for a limited number of days." Say, "Have you taken such a pledge from GOD- GOD never breaks His pledge- or, are you saying about GOD what you do not know?"
Indeed, those who earn sins and become surrounded by their evil work will be the dwellers of Hell; they abide in it forever.
As for those who believe, and lead a righteous life, they will be the dwellers of Paradise; they abide in it forever.
We made a covenant with the Children of Israel: "You shall not worship except GOD. You shall honor your parents and regard the relatives, the orphans, and the poor. You shall treat the people amicably. You shall observe the Contact Prayers (Salat) and give the obligatory charity (Zakat)." But you turned away, except a few of you, and you became averse.
We made a covenant with you, that you shall not shed your blood, nor shall you evict each other from your homes. You agreed and bore witness.
Yet, here you are killing each other, and evicting some of you from their homes, banding against them sinfully and maliciously. Even when they surrendered, you demanded ransom from them. Evicting them was prohibited for you in the first place. Do you believe in part of the scripture and disbelieve in part? What should be the retribution  for those among you who do this, except humiliation in this life, and a far worse retribution on the Day of Resurrection? GOD is never unaware of anything you do.
It is they who bought this lowly life at the expense of the Hereafter. Consequently, the retribution is never commuted for them, nor can they be helped.
We gave Moses the scripture, and subsequent to him we sent other messengers, and we gave Jesus, son of Mary, profound miracles and supported him with the Holy Spirit. Is it not a fact that every time a messenger went to you with anything you disliked, your ego caused you to be arrogant? Some of them you rejected, and some of them you killed.
Some would say, "Our minds are made up!" Instead, it is a curse from GOD, as a consequence of their disbelief, that keeps them from believing, except for a few of them.
When this scripture came to them from GOD, and even though it agrees with, and confirms what they have, and even though they used to prophesy its advent when they talked with the disbelievers, when their own prophecy came to pass, they disbelieved therein. GOD's condemnation thus afflicts the disbelievers.
Miserable indeed is what they sold their souls for-rejecting these revelations of GOD out of sheer resentment that GOD should bestow His grace upon whomever He chooses from among His servants. Consequently, they incurred wrath upon wrath. The disbelievers have incurred a humiliating retribution.
When they are told, "You shall believe in these revelations of GOD," they say, "We believe only in what was sent down to us." Thus, they disbelieve in subsequent revelations, even if it is the truth from their Lord, and even though it confirms what they have! Say, "Why then did you kill GOD's prophets, if you were believers?"
Moses went to you with profound miracles, yet you worshiped the calf in his absence, and you turned wicked.
We made a covenant with you, as we raised Mount Sinai above you, saying, "You shall uphold the commandments we have given you, strongly, and listen." They said, "We hear, but we disobey." Their hearts became filled with adoration for the calf, due to their disbelief. Say, "Miserable indeed is what your faith dictates upon you, if you do have any faith."
Say, "If the abode of the Hereafter is reserved for you at GOD, to the exclusion of all other people, then you should long for death, if you are truthful."
They never long for it, because of what their hands have sent forth. GOD is fully aware of the wicked.
In fact, you will find them the most covetous of life; even more so than the idol worshipers. The one of them wishes to live a thousand years. But this will not spare him any retribution, no matter how long he lives. GOD is seer of everything they do.
Say, "Anyone who opposes Gabriel should know that he has brought down this (Quran) into your heart, in accordance with GOD's will, confirming previous scriptures, and providing guidance and good news for the believers."
Anyone who opposes GOD, and His angels, and His messengers, and Gabriel and Michael, should know that GOD opposes the disbelievers.
We have sent down to you such clear revelations, and only the wicked will reject them.
Is it not a fact that when they make a covenant and pledge to keep it, some of them always disregard it? In fact, most of them do not believe.
Now that a messenger from GOD has come to them, and even though he proves and confirms their own scripture, some followers of the scripture (Jews, Christians, and Muslims) disregard GOD's scripture behind their backs, as if they never had any scripture.
They pursued what the devils taught concerning Solomon's kingdom. Solomon, however, was not a disbeliever, but the devils were disbelievers. They taught the people sorcery, and that which was sent down through the two angels of Babel, Haroot and Maroot. These two did not divulge such knowledge without pointing out: "This is a test. You shall not abuse such knowledge." But the people used it in such evil schemes as the breaking up of marriages. They can never harm anyone against the will of GOD. They thus learn what hurts them, not what benefits them, and they know full well that whoever practices witchcraft will have no share in the Hereafter. Miserable indeed is what they sell their souls for, if they only knew.
If they believe and lead a righteous life, the reward from GOD is far better, if they only knew.
O you who believe, do not say, "Raa'ena" (be our shepherd). Instead, you should say, "Unzurna" (watch over us), and listen. The disbelievers have incurred a painful retribution.
Neither the disbelievers among the followers of the scripture, nor the idol worshipers, wish to see any blessings come down to you from your Lord. However, GOD showers His blessings  upon whomever He chooses. GOD possesses infinite grace.
When we abrogate any miracle, or cause it to be forgotten, we produce a better miracle, or at least an equal one. Do you not recognize the fact that GOD is Omnipotent?
Do you not recognize the fact that GOD possesses the kingship of the heavens and the earth; that you have none besides GOD as your Lord and Master?
Do you wish to demand of your messenger what was demanded of Moses in the past? Anyone who chooses disbelief, instead of belief, has truly strayed off the right path.
Many followers of the scripture would rather see you revert to disbelief, now that you have believed. This is due to jealousy on their part, after the truth has become evident to them. You shall pardon them, and leave them alone, until GOD issues His judgment. GOD is Omnipotent.
You shall observe the Contact Prayers (Salat) and give the obligatory charity (Zakat). Any good you send forth on behalf of your souls, you will find it at GOD. GOD is seer of everything you do.
Some have said, "No one will enter Paradise except Jews or Christians!" Such is their wishful thinking. Say, "Show us your proof, if you are right."
Indeed, those who submit themselves absolutely to GOD alone, while leading a righteous life, will receive their recompense from their Lord; they have nothing to fear, nor will they grieve.
The Jews said, "The Christians have no basis," while the Christians said, "The Jews have no basis. "Yet, both of them read the scripture. Such are the utterances of those who possess no knowledge. GOD will judge them on the Day of Resurrection, regarding their disputes.
Who are more evil than those who boycott GOD's masjids, where His name is commemorated, and contribute to their desertion? These ought not to enter therein except fearfully. They will suffer in this life humiliation, and will suffer in the Hereafter a terrible retribution.
To GOD belongs the east and the west; wherever you go there will be the presence of GOD. GOD is Omnipresent, Omniscient.
They said, "GOD has begotten a son!" Be He glorified; never! To Him belongs everything in the heavens and the earth; all are subservient to Him.
The Initiator of the heavens and the earth: to have anything done, He simply says to it, "Be," and it is.
Those who possess no knowledge say, "If only GOD could speak to us, or some miracle could come to us!" Others before them have uttered similar utterances; their minds are similar. We do manifest the miracles for those who have attained certainty.
We have sent you with the truth as a bearer of good news, as well as a warner. You are not answerable for those who incur Hell.
Neither the Jews, nor the Christians, will accept you, unless you follow their religion. Say, "GOD's guidance is the true guidance." If you acquiesce to their wishes, despite the knowledge you have received, you will find no ally or supporter to help you against GOD.
Those who received the scripture, and know it as it should be known, will believe in this. As for those who disbelieve, they are the losers.
O Children of Israel, remember My favor which I bestowed upon you, and that I blessed you more than any other people.
Beware of the day when no soul will help another soul, no ransom will be accepted, no intercession will be useful, and no one will be helped.
Recall that Abraham was put to the test by his Lord, through certain commands, and he fulfilled them. (God) said, "I am appointing you an imam for the people." He said, "And also my descendants?" He said, "My covenant does not include the transgressors."
We have rendered the shrine (the Ka'aba) a focal point for the people, and a safe sanctuary. You may use Abraham's shrine as a prayer house. We commissioned Abraham and Ismail: "You shall purify My house for those who visit, those who live there, and those who bow and prostrate."
Abraham prayed: "My Lord, make this a peaceful land, and provide its people with fruits. Provide for those who believe in GOD and the Last Day." (God) said, "I will also provide for those who disbelieve. I will let them enjoy, temporarily, then commit them to the retribution of Hell, and a miserable destiny."
As Abraham raised the foundations of the shrine, together with Ismail (they prayed): "Our Lord, accept this from us. You are the Hearer, the Omniscient.
"Our Lord, make us submitters to You, and from our descendants let there be a community of submitters to You. Teach us the rites of our religion, and redeem us. You are the Redeemer, Most Merciful.
"Our Lord, and raise among them a messenger to recite to them Your revelations, teach them the scripture and wisdom, and purify them. You are the Almighty, Most Wise."
Who would forsake the religion of Abraham, except one who fools his own soul? We have chosen him in this world, and in the Hereafter he will be with the righteous.
When his Lord said to him, "Submit," he said, "I submit to the Lord of the universe."
Moreover, Abraham exhorted his children to do the same, and so did Jacob: "O my children, GOD has pointed out the religion for you; do not die except as submitters."
Had you witnessed Jacob on his death bed; he said to his children, "What will you worship after I die?" They said, "We will worship your god; the god of your fathers Abraham, Ismail, and Isaac; the one god. To Him we are submitters."
Such is a community from the past. They are responsible for what they earned, and you are responsible for what you earned. You are not answerable for anything they have done.
They said, "You have to be Jewish or Christian, to be guided." Say, "We follow the religion of Abraham-monotheism- he never was an idol worshiper."
Say, "We believe in GOD, and in what was sent down to us, and in what was sent down to Abraham, Ismail, Isaac, Jacob, and the Patriarchs; and in what was given to Moses and Jesus, and all the prophets from their Lord. We make no distinction among any of them. To Him alone we are submitters."
If they believe as you do, then they are guided. But if they turn away, then they are in opposition. GOD will spare you their opposition; He is the Hearer, the Omniscient.
Such is GOD's system, and whose system is better than GOD's? "Him alone we worship."
Say, "Do you argue with us about GOD, when He is our Lord and your Lord? We are responsible for our deeds, and you are responsible for your deeds. To Him alone we are devoted."
Do you say that Abraham, Ismail, Isaac, Jacob, and the Patriarchs were Jewish or Christian? Say, "Do you know better than GOD? Who is more evil than one who conceals a testimony he has learned from GOD? GOD is never unaware of anything you do."
That was a community from the past. They are responsible for what thay earned, and you are responsible for what you earned. You are not answerable for anything they did.
The fools among the people would say, "Why did they change the direction of their Qiblah?" Say, "To GOD belongs the east and the west; He guides whoever wills in a straight path."
We thus made you an impartial community, that you may serve as witnesses among the people, and the messenger serves as a witness among you. We changed the direction of your original Qiblah only to distinguish those among you who readily follow the messenger from those who would turn back on their heels. It was a difficult test, but not for those who are guided by GOD. GOD never puts your worship to waste. GOD is Compassionate towards the people, Most Merciful.
We have seen you turning your face about the sky (searching for the right direction). We now assign a Qiblah that is pleasing to you. Henceforth, you shall turn your face towards the Sacred Masjid. Wherever you may be, all of you shall turn your faces towards it. Those who received the previous scripture know that this is the truth from their Lord. GOD is never unaware of anything they do.
Even if you show the followers of the scripture every kind of miracle, they will not follow your Qiblah. Nor shall you follow their Qiblah. They do not even follow each others' Qiblah. If you acquiesce to their wishes, after the knowledge that has come to you, you will belong with the transgressors.
Those who received the scripture recognize the truth herein, as they recognize their own children. Yet, some of them conceal the truth, knowingly.
This is the truth from your Lord; do not harbor any doubt.
Each of you chooses the direction to follow; you shall race towards righteousness. Wherever you may be, GOD will summon you all. GOD is Omnipotent.
Wherever you go, you shall turn your face (during Salat) towards the Sacred Masjid. This is the truth from your Lord. GOD is never unaware of anything you all do.
Wherever you go, you shall turn your face (during Salat) towards the Sacred Masjid; wherever you might be, you shall turn your faces (during Salat) towards it. Thus, the people will have no argument against you, except the transgressors among them. Do not fear them, and fear Me instead. I will then perfect My blessings upon you, that you may be guided.
(Blessings) such as the sending of a messenger from among you to recite our revelations to you, purify you, teach you the scripture and wisdom, and to teach you what you never knew.
You shall remember Me, that I may remember you, and be thankful to Me; do not be unappreciative.
O you who believe, seek help through steadfastness and the Contact Prayers (Salat). GOD is with those who steadfastly persevere.
Do not say of those who are killed in the cause of GOD, "They are dead." They are alive at their Lord, but you do not perceive.
We will surely test you through some fear, hunger, and loss of money, lives, and crops. Give good news to the steadfast.
When an affliction befalls them, they say, "We belong to  GOD, and to Him we are returning."
These have deserved blessings from their Lord and mercy. These are the guided ones.
The knolls of Safa and Marwah are among the rites decreed by GOD. Anyone who observes Hajj or 'Umrah commits no error by traversing the distance between them. If one volunteers more righteous works, then GOD is Appreciative, Omniscient.
Those who conceal our revelations and guidance, after proclaiming them for the people in the scripture, are condemned by GOD; they are condemned by all the condemners.
As for those who repent, reform, and proclaim, I redeem them. I am the Redeemer, Most Merciful.
Those who disbelieve and die as disbelievers, have incurred the condemnation of GOD, the angels, and all the people (on the Day of Judgment).
Eternally they abide therein. The retribution is never commuted for them, nor are they reprieved.
Your god is one god; there is no god but He, Most Gracious, Most Merciful.
In the creation of the heavens and the earth, the alternation of night and day, the ships that roam the ocean for the benefit of the people, the water that GOD sends down from the sky to revive dead land and to spread in it all kinds of creatures, the manipulation of the winds, and the clouds that are placed between the sky and the earth, there are sufficient proofs for people who understand.
Yet, some people set up idols to rival GOD, and love them as if they are GOD. Those who believe love GOD the most. If only the transgressors could see themselves when they see the retribution! They will realize then that all power belongs to GOD alone, and that GOD's retribution is awesome.
Those who were followed will disown those who followed them. They will see the retribution, and all ties among them will be severed.
Those who followed will say, "If we can get another chance, we will disown them, as they have disowned us now." GOD thus shows them the consequences of their works as nothing but remorse; they will never exit Hell.
O people, eat from the earth's products all that is lawful and good, and do not follow the steps of Satan; he is your most ardent enemy.
He only commands you to commit evil and vice, and to say about GOD what you do not know.
When they are told, "Follow what GOD has revealed herein," they say, "We follow only what we found our parents doing." What if their parents did not understand, and were not guided?
The example of such disbelievers is that of parrots who repeat what they hear of sounds and calls, without understanding. Deaf, dumb, and blind; they cannot understand.
O you who believe, eat from the good things we provided for you, and be thankful to GOD, if you do worship Him alone.
He only prohibits for you the eating of animals that die of themselves (without human interference), blood, the meat of pigs, and animals dedicated to other than GOD. If one is forced (to eat these), without being malicious or  deliberate, he incurs no sin. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
Those who conceal GOD's revelations in the scripture, in exchange for a cheap material gain, eat but fire into their bellies. GOD will not speak to them on the Day of Resurrection, nor will He purify them. They have incurred a painful retribution.
It is they who chose the straying instead of guidance, and the retribution instead of forgiveness. Consequently, they will have to endure Hell.
This is because GOD has revealed this scripture, bearing the truth, and those who dispute the scripture are the most ardent opponents.
Righteousness is not turning your faces towards the east or the west. Righteous are those who believe in GOD, the Last Day, the angels, the scripture, and the prophets; and they give the money, cheerfully, to the relatives, the orphans, the needy, the traveling alien, the beggars, and to free the slaves; and they observe the Contact Prayers (Salat) and give the obligatory charity (Zakat); and they keep their word whenever they make a promise; and they steadfastly persevere in the face of persecution, hardship, and war. These are the truthful; these are the righteous.
O you who believe, equivalence is the law decreed for you when dealing with murder-the free for the free, the slave for the slave, the female for the female. If one is pardoned by the victim's kin, an appreciative response is in order, and an equitable compensation shall be paid. This is an alleviation from your Lord and mercy. Anyone who transgresses beyond this incurs a painful retribution.
Equivalence is a life saving law for you, O you who possess intelligence, that you may be righteous.
It is decreed that when death approaches, you shall write a will for the benefit of the parents and relatives, equitably. This is a duty upon the righteous.
If anyone alters a will he had heard, the sin of altering befalls those responsible for such altering. GOD is Hearer, Knower.
If one sees gross injustice or bias on the part of a testator, and takes corrective action to restore justice to the will, he commits no sin. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
O you who believe, fasting is decreed for you, as it was decreed for those before you, that you may attain salvation.
Specific days (are designated for fasting); if one is ill or traveling, an equal number of other days may be substituted. Those who can fast, but with great difficulty, may substitute feeding one poor person for each day of breaking the fast. If one volunteers (more righteous works), it is better. But fasting is the best for you, if you only knew.
Ramadan is the month during which the Quran was revealed, providing guidance for the people, clear teachings, and the statute book. Those of you who witness this month shall fast therein. Those who are ill or traveling may substitute the same number of other days. GOD wishes for you convenience, not hardship, that you may fulfill your obligations, and to glorify GOD for guiding you, and to express your appreciation.
When My servants ask you about Me, I am always near. I answer their prayers when they pray to Me. The people shall respond to Me and believe in Me, in order to be guided.
Permitted for you is sexual intercourse with your wives during the nights of fasting. They are the keepers of your secrets, and you are the keepers of their secrets. GOD knew that you used to betray your souls, and He has redeemed you, and has pardoned you. Henceforth, you may have intercourse with them, seeking what GOD has permitted for you. You may eat and drink until the white thread of light becomes distinguishable from the dark thread of night at dawn. Then, you shall fast until sunset. Sexual intercourse is prohibited if you decide to retreat to the masjid (during the last ten days of Ramadan). These are GOD's laws; you shall not transgress them. GOD thus clarifies His revelations for the people, that they may attain salvation.
You shall not take each others' money illicitly, nor shall you bribe the officials to deprive others of some of their rights illicitly, while you know.
They ask you about the phases of the moon! Say, "They provide a timing device for the people, and determine the time of Hajj." It is not righteous to beat around the bush; righteousness is attained by upholding the commandments and by being straightforward. You shall observe GOD, that you may succeed.
You may fight in the cause of GOD against those who attack you, but do not aggress. GOD does not love the aggressors.
You may kill those who wage war against you, and you may evict them whence they evicted you. Oppression is worse than murder. Do not fight them at the Sacred Masjid, unless they attack you therein. If they attack you, you may kill them. This is the just retribution for those disbelievers.
If they refrain, then GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
You may also fight them to eliminate oppression, and to worship GOD freely. If they refrain, you shall not aggress; aggression is permitted only against the aggressors.
During the Sacred Months, aggression may be met by an equivalent response. If they attack you, you may retaliate by inflicting an equitable retribution. You shall observe GOD and know that GOD is with the righteous.
You shall spend in the cause of GOD; do not throw yourselves with your own hands into destruction. You shall be charitable; GOD loves the charitable.
You shall observe the complete rites of Hajj and'Umrah for GOD. If you are prevented, you shall send an offering, and do not resume cutting your hair until your offering has reached its destination. If you are ill, or suffering a head injury (and you must cut your hair), you shall expiate by fasting, or giving to charity, or some other form of worship. During the normal Hajj, if you break the state of Ihraam (sanctity) between 'Umrah and Hajj, you shall expiate by offering an animal sacrifice. If you cannot afford it, you shall fast three days during Hajj and seven when you return home-this completes ten-provided you do not live at the Sacred Masjid. You shall observe GOD, and know that GOD is strict in enforcing retribution.
Hajj shall be observed in the specified months. Whoever sets out to observe Hajj shall refrain from sexual intercourse, misconduct, and arguments throughout Hajj. Whatever good you do, GOD is fully aware thereof. As you prepare your provisions for the journey, the best provision is righteousness. You shall observe Me, O you who possess intelligence.
You commit no error by seeking provisions from your Lord (through commerce). When you file from 'Arafaat, you shall commemorate GOD at the Sacred Location (of Muzdalifah). You shall commemorate Him for guiding you; before this, you had gone astray.
You shall file together, with the rest of the people who file, and ask GOD for forgiveness. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
Once you complete your rites, you shall continue to commemorate GOD as you commemorate your own parents, or even better. Some people would say, "Our Lord, give us of this world," while having no share in the Hereafter.
Others would say, "Our Lord, grant us righteousness in this world, and righteousness in the Hereafter, and spare us the retribution of Hell."
Each of these will receive the share they have earned. GOD is most efficient in reckoning.
You shall commemorate GOD for a number of days (in Mena); whoever hastens to do this in two days commits no sin, and whoever stays longer commits no sin, so long as righteousness is maintained. You shall observe GOD, and know that before Him you will be gathered.
Among the people, one may impress you with his utterances concerning this life, and may even call upon GOD to witness his innermost thoughts, while he is a most ardent opponent.
As soon as he leaves, he roams the earth corruptingly, destroying properties and lives. GOD does not love corruption.
When he is told, "Observe GOD," he becomes arrogantly indignant. Consequently, his only destiny is Hell; what a miserable abode.
Then there are those who dedicate their lives to serving GOD; GOD is compassionate towards such worshipers.
O you who believe, you shall embrace total submission; do not follow the steps of Satan, for he is your most ardent enemy.
If you backslide, after the clear proofs have come to you, then know that GOD is Almighty, Most Wise.
Are they waiting until GOD Himself comes to them in dense clouds, together with the angels? When this happens, the whole matter will be terminated, and to GOD everything will be returned.
Ask the Children of Israel how many profound miracles have we shown them! For those who disregard the blessings bestowed upon them by GOD, GOD is most strict in retribution.
This worldly life is adorned in the eyes of the disbelievers, and they ridicule those who believe. However, the righteous will be far above them on the Day of Resurrection. GOD blesses whomever He wills, without limits.
The people used to be one community when GOD sent the prophets as bearers of good news, as well as warners. He sent down with them the scripture, bearing the truth, to judge among the people in their disputes. Ironically, those who received the scripture were the ones who rejected any new scripture, despite clear proofs given to them. This is due to jealousy on their part. GOD guides those who believe to the truth that is disputed by all others, in accordance with His will. GOD guides whoever wills in a straight path.
Do you expect to enter Paradise without being tested like those before you? They were tested with hardship and adversity, and were shaken up, until the messenger and those who believed with him said, "Where is GOD's victory?" GOD's victory is near.
They ask you about giving: say, "The charity you give shall go to the parents, the relatives, the orphans, the poor, and the traveling alien." Any good you do, GOD is fully aware thereof.
Fighting may be imposed on you, even though you dislike it. But you may dislike something which is good for you, and you may like something which is bad for you. GOD knows while you do not know.
They ask you about the Sacred Months and fighting therein: say, "Fighting therein is a sacrilege. However, repelling from the path of GOD and disbelieving in Him and in the sanctity of the Sacred Masjid, and evicting its people, are greater sacrileges in the sight of GOD. Oppression is worse than murder." They will always fight you to revert you from your religion, if they can. Those among you who revert from their religion, and die as disbelievers, have nullified their works in this life and the Hereafter. These are the dwellers of Hell, wherein they abide forever.
Those who believe, and those who emigrate and strive in the cause of GOD, have deserved GOD's mercy. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
They ask you about intoxicants and gambling: say, "In them there is a gross sin, and some benefits for the people. But their sinfulness far outweighs their benefit." They also ask you what to give to charity: say, "The excess." GOD thus clarifies the revelations for you, that you may reflect,
upon this life and the Hereafter. And they ask you about the orphans: say, "Bringing them up as righteous persons is the best you can do for them. If you mix their property with yours, you shall treat them as family members." GOD knows the righteous and the wicked. Had GOD willed, He could have imposed harsher rules upon you. GOD is Almighty, Most Wise.
Do not marry idolatresses unless they believe; a believing woman is better than an idolatress, even if you like her. Nor shall you give your daughters in marriage to idolatrous men, unless they believe. A believing man is better than an idolater, even if you like him. These invite to Hell, while GOD invites to Paradise and forgiveness, as He wills. He clarifies His revelations for the people, that they may take heed.
They ask you about menstruation: say, "It is harmful; you shall avoid sexual intercourse with the women during menstruation; do not approach them until they are rid of it. Once they are rid of it, you may have intercourse with them in the manner designed by GOD. GOD loves the repenters, and He loves those who are clean."
Your women are the bearers of your seed. Thus, you may enjoy this privilege however you like, so long as you maintain righteousness. You shall observe GOD, and know that you will meet Him. Give good news to the believers.
Do not subject GOD's name to your casual swearing, that you may appear righteous, pious, or to attain credibility among the people. GOD is Hearer, Knower.
GOD does not hold you responsible for the mere utterance of oaths; He holds you responsible for your innermost intentions. GOD is Forgiver, Clement.
Those who intend to divorce their wives shall wait four months (cooling off); if they change their minds and reconcile, then GOD is Forgiver, Merciful.
If they go through with the divorce, then GOD is Hearer, Knower.
The divorced women shall wait three menstruations (before marrying another man). It is not lawful for them to conceal what GOD creates in their wombs, if they believe in GOD and the Last Day. (In case of pregnancy,) the husband's wishes shall supersede the wife's wishes, if he wants to remarry her. The women have rights, as well as obligations, equitably. Thus, the man's wishes prevail (in case of pregnancy). GOD is Almighty, Most Wise.
Divorce may be retracted twice. The divorced woman shall be allowed to live in the same home amicably, or leave it amicably. It is not lawful for the husband to take back anything he had given her. However, the couple may fear that they may transgress GOD's law. If there is fear that they may transgress GOD's law, they commit no error if the wife willingly gives back whatever she chooses. These are GOD's laws; do not transgress them. Those who transgress GOD's laws are the unjust.
If he divorces her (for the third time), it is unlawful for him to remarry her, unless she marries another man, then he divorces her. The first husband can then remarry her, so long as they observe GOD's laws. These are GOD's laws; He explains them for people who know.
If you divorce the women, once they fulfill their interim (three menstruations), you shall allow them to live in the same home amicably, or let them leave amicably. Do not force them to stay against their will, as a revenge. Anyone who does this wrongs his own soul. Do not take GOD's revelations in vain. Remember GOD's blessings upon you, and that He sent down to you the scripture and wisdom to enlighten you. You shall observe GOD, and know that GOD is aware of all things.
If you divorce the women, once they fulfill their interim, do not prevent them from remarrying their husbands, if they reconcile amicably. This shall be heeded by those among you who believe in GOD and the Last Day. This is purer for you, and more righteous. GOD knows, while you do not know.
Divorced mothers shall nurse their infants two full years, if the father so wishes. The father shall provide the mother's food and clothing equitably. No one shall be burdened beyond his ability. No mother shall be harmed on account of her infant, nor shall the father be harmed because of his infant. (If the father dies), his inheritor shall assume these responsibilities. If the infant's parents mutually agree to part, after due consultation, they commit no error by doing so. You commit no error by hiring nursing mothers, so long as you pay them equitably. You shall observe GOD, and know that GOD is Seer of everything you do.
Those who die and leave wives, their widows shall wait four months and ten days (before they remarry). Once they fulfill their interim, you commit no error by letting them do whatever righteousmatters they wish to do. GOD is fully Cognizant of everything you do.
You commit no sin by announcing your engagement to the women, or keeping it secret. GOD knows that you will think about them. Do not meet them secretly, unless you have something righteous to discuss. Do not consummate the marriage until their interim is fulfilled. You should know that GOD knows your innermost thoughts, and observe Him. You should know that GOD is Forgiver, Clement.
You commit no error by divorcing the women before touching them, or before setting the dowry for them. In this case, you shall compensate them-the rich as he can afford and the poor as he can afford-an equitable compensation. This is a duty upon the righteous.
If you divorce them before touching them, but after you had set the dowry for them, the compensation shall be half the dowry, unless they voluntarily forfeit their rights, or the party responsible for causing the divorce chooses to forfeit the dowry. To forfeit is closer to righteousness. You shall maintain the amicable relations among you. GOD is Seer of everything you do.
You shall consistently observe the Contact Prayers, especially the middle prayer, and devote yourselves totally to GOD.
Under unusual circumstances, you may pray while walking or riding. Once you are safe, you shall commemorate GOD as He taught you what you never knew.
Those who die and leave wives, a will shall provide their wives with support for a year, provided they stay within the same household. If they leave, you commit no sin by letting them do whatever they wish, so long as righteousness is maintained. GOD is Almighty, Most Wise.
The divorcees also shall be provided for, equitably. This is a duty upon the righteous.
GOD thus explains His revelations for you, that you may understand.
Have you noted those who fled their homes-though they were in the thousands-fearing death? GOD said to them, "Die," then revived them. GOD showers His grace upon the people, but most people are unappreciative.
You shall fight in the cause of GOD, and know that GOD is Hearer, Knower.
Who would lend GOD a loan of righteousness, to have it repaid to them multiplied manifold? GOD is the One who provides and withholds, and to Him you will be returned.
Have you noted the leaders of Israel after Moses? They said to their prophet, "If you appoint a king to lead us, we will fight in the cause of GOD." He said, "Is it your intention that, if fighting is decreed for you, you will not fight?" They said, "Why should we not fight in the cause of GOD, when we have been deprived of our homes, and our children?" Yet, when fighting was decreed for them, they turned away, except a few. GOD is aware of the transgressors.
Their prophet said to them, "GOD has appointed Taloot (Saul) to be your king." They said, "How can he have kingship over us when we are more worthy of kingship than he; he is not even rich?" He said, "GOD has chosen him over you, and has blessed him with an abundance in knowledge and in body." GOD grants His kingship to whomever He wills. GOD is Bounteous, Omniscient.
Their prophet said to them, "The sign of his kingship is that the Ark of the Covenant will be restored to you, bringing assurances from your Lord, and relics left by the people of Moses and the people of Aaron. It will be carried by the angels. This should be a convincing sign for you, if you are really believers."
When Saul took command of the troops, he said, "GOD is putting you to the test by means of a stream. Anyone who drinks from it does not belong with me- only those who do not taste it belong with me- unless it is just a single sip." They drank from it, except a few of them. When he crossed it with those who believed, they said, "Now we lack the strength to face Goliath and his troops." Those who were conscious of meeting GOD said, "Many a small army defeated a large army by GOD's leave. GOD is with those who steadfastly persevere."
When they faced Goliath and his troops, they prayed, "Our Lord, grant us steadfastness, strengthen our foothold, and support us against the disbelieving people."
They defeated them by GOD's leave, and David killed Goliath. GOD gave him kingship and wisdom, and taught him as He willed. If it were not for GOD's support of some people against others, there would be chaos on earth. But GOD showers His grace upon the  people.
These are GOD's revelations. We recite them through you, truthfully, for you are one of the messengers.
These messengers; we blessed some of them more than others. For example, GOD spoke to one, and we raised some of them to higher ranks. And we gave Jesus, son of Mary, profound miracles and supported him with the Holy Spirit. Had GOD willed, their followers would not have fought with each other, after the clear proofs had come to them. Instead, they disputed among themselves; some of them believed, and some disbelieved. Had GOD willed, they would not have fought. Everything is in accordance with GOD's will.
O you who believe, you shall give to charity from the provisions we have given to you, before a day comes where there is no trade, no nepotism, and no intercession. The disbelievers are the unjust.
GOD: there is no other god besides Him, the Living, the Eternal. Never a moment of unawareness or slumber overtakes Him. To Him belongs everything in the heavens and everything on earth. Who could intercede with Him, except in accordance with His will? He knows their past, and their future. No one attains any knowledge, except as He wills. His dominion encompasses the heavens and the earth, and ruling them never burdens Him. He is the Most High, the Great.
There shall be no compulsion in religion: the right way is now distinct from the wrong way. Anyone who denounces the devil and believes in GOD has grasped the strongest bond; one that never breaks. GOD is Hearer, Omniscient.
GOD is Lord of those who believe; He leads them out of darkness into the light. As for those who disbelieve, their lords are their idols; they lead them out of the light into darkness- these will be the dwellers of Hell; they abide in it forever.
Have you noted the one who argued with Abraham about his Lord, though GOD had given him kingship? Abraham said, "My Lord grants life and death." He said, "I grant life and death." Abraham said, "GOD brings the sun from the east, can you bring it from the west?" The disbeliever was stumped. GOD does not guide the wicked.
Consider the one who passed by a ghost town and wondered, "How can GOD revive this after it had died?" GOD then put him to death for a hundred years, then resurrected him. He said, "How long have you stayed here?" He said, "I have been here a day, or part of the day." He said, "No! You have been here a hundred years. Yet, look at your food and drink; they did not spoil. Look at your donkey-we thus render you a lesson for the people. Now, note how we construct the bones, then cover them with flesh." When he realized what had happened, he said, "Now I know that GOD is Omnipotent."
Abraham said, "My Lord, show me how You revive the dead." He said, "Do you not believe?" He said, "Yes, but I wish to reassure my heart." He said, "Take four birds, study their marks, place a piece of each bird on top of a hill, then call them to you. They will come to you in a hurry. You should know that GOD is Almighty, Most Wise."
The example of those who spend their monies in the cause of GOD is that of a grain that produces seven spikes, with a hundred grains in each spike. GOD multiplies this manifold for whomever He wills. GOD is Bounteous, Knower.
Those who spend their money in the cause of GOD, then do not follow their charity with insult or harm, will receive their recompense from their Lord; they have nothing to fear, nor will they grieve.
Kind words and compassion are better than a charity that is followed by insult. GOD is Rich, Clement.
O you who believe, do not nullify your charities by inflicting reproach and insult, like one who spends his money to show off, while disbelieving in GOD and the Last Day. His example is like a rock covered with a thin layer of soil; as soon as heavy rain falls, it washes off the soil, leaving it a useless rock. They gain nothing from their efforts. GOD does not guide disbelieving people.
The example of those who give their money seeking GOD's pleasure, out of sincere conviction, is that of a garden on high fertile soil; when heavy rain falls, it gives twice as much crop. If heavy rain is not available, a drizzle will suffice. GOD is Seer of everything you do.
Does any of you wish to own a garden of palm trees and grapes, with flowing streams and generous crops, then, just as he grows old, and while his children are still dependent on him, a holocaust strikes and burns up his garden? GOD thus clarifies the revelations for you, that you may reflect.
O you who believe, you shall give to charity from the good things you earn, and from what we have produced for you from the earth. Do not pick out the bad therein to give away, when you yourselves do not accept it unless your eyes are closed. You should know that GOD is Rich, Praiseworthy.
The devil promises you poverty and commands you to commit evil, while GOD promises you forgiveness from Him and grace. GOD is Bounteous, Omniscient.
He bestows wisdom upon whomever He chooses, and whoever attains wisdom, has attained a great bounty. Only those who possess intelligence will take heed.
Any charity you give, or a charitable pledge you fulfill, GOD is fully aware thereof. As for the wicked, they will have no helpers.
If you declare your charities, they are still good. But if you keep them anonymous, and give them to the poor, it is better for you, and remits more of your sins. GOD is fully Cognizant of everything you do.
You are not responsible for guiding anyone. GOD is the only one who guides whoever chooses (to be guided). Any charity you give is for your own good. Any charity you give shall be for the sake of GOD. Any charity you give will be repaid to you, without the least injustice.
Charity shall go to the poor who are suffering in the cause of GOD, and cannot emigrate. The unaware may think that they are rich, due to their dignity. But you can recognize them by certain signs; they never beg from the people persistently. Whatever charity you give, GOD is fully aware thereof.
Those who give to charity night and day, secretly and publicly, receive their recompense from their Lord; they will have nothing to fear, nor will they grieve.
Those who charge usury are in the same position as those controlled by the devil's influence. This is because they claim that usury is the same as commerce. However, GOD permits commerce, and prohibits usury. Thus, whoever heeds this commandment from his Lord, and refrains from usury, he may keep his past earnings, and his judgment rests with GOD. As for those who persist in usury, they incur Hell, wherein they abide forever.
GOD condemns usury, and blesses charities. GOD dislikes every disbeliever, guilty.
Those who believe and lead a righteous life, and observe the Contact Prayers (Salat), and give the obligatory charity (Zakat), they receive their recompense from their Lord; they will have nothing to fear, nor will they grieve.
O you who believe, you shall observe GOD and refrain from all kinds of usury, if you are believers.
If you do not, then expect a war from GOD and His messenger. But if you repent, you may keep your capitals, without inflicting injustice, or incurring injustice.
If the debtor is unable to pay, wait for a better time. If you give up the loan as a charity, it would be better for you, if you only knew.
Beware of the day when you are returned to GOD, and every soul is paid for everything it had done, without the least injustice.
O you who believe, when you transact a loan for any period, you shall write it down. An impartial scribe shall do the writing. No scribe shall refuse to perform this service, according to GOD's teachings. He shall write, while the debtor dictates the terms. He shall observe GOD his Lord and never cheat. If the debtor is mentally incapable, or helpless, or cannot dictate, his guardian shall dictate equitably. Two men shall serve as witnesses; if not two men, then a man and two women whose testimony is acceptable to all. Thus, if one woman becomes biased, the other will remind her. It is the obligation of the witnesses to testify when called upon to do so. Do not tire of writing the details, no matter how long, including the time of repayment. This is equitable in the sight of GOD, assures better witnessing, and eliminates any doubts you may have. Business transactions that you execute on the spot need not be recorded, but have them witnessed. No scribe or witness shall be harmed on account of his services. If you harm them, it would be wickedness on your part. You shall observe GOD, and GOD will teach you. GOD is Omniscient.
If you are traveling, and no scribe is available, a bond shall be posted to guarantee repayment. If one is trusted in this manner, he shall return the bond when due, and he shall observe GOD his Lord. Do not withhold any testimony by concealing what you had witnessed. Anyone who withholds a testimony is sinful at heart. GOD is fully aware of everything you do.
To GOD belongs everything in the heavens and the earth. Whether you declare your innermost thoughts, or keep them hidden, GOD holds you responsible for them. He forgives whomever He wills, and punishes whomever He wills. GOD is Omnipotent.
The messenger has believed in what was sent down to him from his Lord, and so did the believers. They believe in GOD, His angels, His scripture, and His messengers: "We make no distinction among any of His messengers." They say, "We hear, and we obey. Forgive us, our Lord. To You is the ultimate destiny."
GOD never burdens a soul beyond its means: to its credit is what it earns, and against it is what it commits. "Our Lord, do not condemn us if we forget or make mistakes. Our Lord, and protect us from blaspheming against You, like those before us have done. Our Lord, protect us from sinning until it becomes too late for us to repent. Pardon us and forgive us. You are our Lord and Master. Grant us victory over the disbelieving people."
A.L.M.
GOD: there is no god except He; the Living, the Eternal.
He sent down to you this scripture, truthfully, confirming all previous scriptures, and He sent down the Torah and the Gospel
before that, to guide the people, and He sent down the statute book. Those who disbelieve in GOD's revelations incur severe retribution. GOD is Almighty, Avenger.
Nothing is hidden from GOD, on earth, or in the heaven.
He is the One who shapes you in the wombs as He wills. There is no other god besides Him; the Almighty, Most Wise.
He sent down to you this scripture, containing straightforward verses- which constitute the essence of the scripture-as well as multiple-meaning or allegorical verses. Those who harbor doubts in their hearts will pursue the multiple-meaning verses to create confusion, and to extricate a certain meaning. None knows the true meaning thereof except GOD and those well founded in knowledge. They say, "We believe in this-all of it comes from our Lord." Only those who possess intelligence will take heed.
"Our Lord, let not our hearts waver, now that You have guided us. Shower us with Your mercy; You are the Grantor.
"Our Lord, You will surely gather the people on a day that is inevitable. GOD never breaks a promise."
Those who disbelieve will never be helped by their money, nor by their children, against GOD. They will be fuel for Hell.
Like Pharaoh's people and those before them, they rejected our revelations and, consequently, GOD punished them for their sins. GOD is strict in enforcing retribution.
Say to those who disbelieve, "You will be defeated, then gathered in Hell; what a miserable abode!"
An example has been set for you by the two armies who clashed- one army was fighting in the cause of GOD, while the other was disbelieving. They saw with their own eyes that they were twice as many. GOD supports with His victory whomever He wills. This should provide an assurance for those who possess vision.
Adorned for the people are the worldly pleasures, such as the women, having children, piles upon piles of gold and silver, trained horses, livestock, and crops. These are the materials of this world. A far better abode is reserved at GOD.
Say, "Let me inform you of a much better deal: for those who lead a righteous life, reserved at their Lord, are gardens with flowing streams, and pure spouses, and joy in GOD's blessings." GOD is Seer of His worshipers.
They say, "Our Lord, we have believed, so forgive us our sins, and spare us the agony of the hellfire."
They are steadfast, truthful, submitting, charitable, and meditators at dawn.
GOD bears witness that there is no god except He, and so do the angels and those who possess knowledge. Truthfully and equitably, He is the absolute god; there is no god but He, the Almighty, Most Wise.
The only religion approved by GOD is "Submission." Ironically, those who have received the scripture are the ones who dispute this fact, despite the knowledge they have received, due to jealousy. For such rejectors of GOD's revelations, GOD is most strict in reckoning.
If they argue with you, then say, "I have simply submitted myself to GOD; I and those who follow me." You shall proclaim to those who received the scripture, as well as those who did not, "Would you submit?" If they submit, then they have been guided, but if they turn away, your sole mission is to deliver this message. GOD is Seer of all people.
Those who have rejected GOD's revelations, and killed the prophets unjustly, and killed those who advocated justice among the people, promise them a painful retribution.
Their works have been nullified, both in this life and in the Hereafter, and they will have no helpers.
Have you noted those who were given part of the scripture, and how they are invited to uphold this scripture of GOD, and apply it to their own lives, then some of them turn away in aversion?
This is because they said, "The hellfire will not touch us, except for a few days." They were thus deceived in their religion by their own fabrications.
How will it be for them, when we summon them on that inevitable day? Each soul will be paid for whatever it earned, without the least injustice.
Say, "Our god: possessor of all sovereignty. You grant sovereignty to whomever You choose, You remove sovereignty from whomever You choose. You grant dignity to whomever You choose, and commit to humiliation whomever You choose. In Your hand are all provisions. You are Omnipotent.
"You merge the night into the day, and merge the day into the night. You produce the living from the dead, and produce the dead from the living, and You provide for whomever You choose, without limits."
The believers never ally themselves with the disbelievers, instead of the believers. Whoever does this is exiled from GOD. Exempted are those who are forced to do this to avoid persecution. GOD alerts you that you shall reverence Him alone. To GOD is the ultimate destiny.
Say, "Whether you conceal your innermost thought, or declare it, GOD is fully aware thereof." He is fully aware of everything in the heavens and the earth. GOD is Omnipotent.
The day will come when each soul will find all the good works it had done brought forth. As for the evil works, it will wish that they were far, far removed. GOD alerts you that you shall reverence Him alone. GOD is Compassionate towards the people.
Proclaim: "If you love GOD, you should follow me." GOD will then love you, and forgive your sins. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
Proclaim: "You shall obey GOD and the messenger." If they turn away, GOD does not love the disbelievers.
GOD has chosen Adam, Noah, the family of Abraham, and the family of Amram (as messengers) to the people.
They belong in the same progeny. GOD is Hearer, Omniscient.
The wife of Amram said, "My Lord, I have dedicated (the baby) in my belly to You, totally, so accept from me. You are Hearer, Omniscient."
When she gave birth to her, she said, "My Lord, I have given birth to a girl"-GOD was fully aware of what she bore- "The male is not the same as the female. I have named her Mary, and I invoke Your protection for her and her descendants from the rejected devil."
Her Lord accepted her a gracious acceptance, and brought her up a gracious upbringing, under the guardianship of Zachariah. Whenever Zachariah entered her sanctuary he found provisions with her. He would ask, "Mary, where did you get this from?" She would say, "It is from GOD. GOD provides for whomever He chooses, without limits."
That is when Zachariah implored his Lord: "My Lord, grant me such a good child; You are the Hearer of the prayers."
The angels called him when he was praying in the sanctuary: "GOD gives you good news of John; a believer in the word of GOD, honorable, moral, and a righteous prophet."
He said, "How can I have a boy, when I am so old, and my wife is sterile?" He said, "GOD does whatever He wills."
He said, "My Lord, give me a sign." He said, "Your sign is that you will not speak to the people for three days, except through signals. Commemorate your Lord frequently; and meditate night and day."
The angels said, "O Mary, GOD has chosen you and purified you. He has chosen you from all the women.
"O Mary, you shall submit to your Lord, and prostrate and bow down with those who bow down."
This is news from the past that we reveal to you. You were not there when they drew their raffles to select Mary's guardian. You were not present when they argued with one another.
The angels said, "O Mary, GOD gives you good news: a Word from Him whose name is 'The Messiah, Jesus the son of Mary. He will be prominent in this life and in the Hereafter, and one of those closest to Me.'
"He will speak to the people from the crib, as well as an adult; he will be one of the righteous."
She said, "My Lord, how can I have a son, when no man has touched me?" He said, "GOD thus creates whatever He wills. To have anything done, He simply says to it, 'Be,' and it is.
"He will teach him the scripture, wisdom, the Torah, and the Gospel."
As a messenger to the Children of Israel: "I come to you with a sign from your Lord-I create for you from clay the shape of a bird, then I blow into it, and it becomes a live bird by GOD's leave. I restore vision to the blind, heal the leprous, and I revive the dead by GOD's leave. I can tell you what you eat, and what you store in your homes. This should be a proof for you, if you are believers.
"I confirm previous scripture-the Torah-and I revoke certain prohibitions imposed upon you. I come to you with sufficient proof from your Lord. Therefore, you shall observe GOD, and obey me.
"GOD is my Lord and your Lord; you shall worship Him alone. This is the right path."
When Jesus sensed their disbelief, he said, "Who are my supporters towards GOD?" The disciples said, "We are GOD's supporters; we believe in GOD, and bear witness that we are submitters."
"Our Lord, We have believed in what You have sent down, and we have followed the messenger; count us among the witnesses."
They plotted and schemed, but so did GOD, and GOD is the best schemer.
Thus, GOD said, "O Jesus, I am terminating your life, raising you to Me, and ridding you of the disbelievers. I will exalt those who follow you above those who disbelieve, till the Day of Resurrection. Then to Me is the ultimate destiny of all of you, then I will judge among you regarding your disputes.
"As for those who disbelieve, I will commit them to painful retribution in this world, and in the Hereafter. They will have no helpers."
As for those who believe and lead a righteous life, He will fully recompense them. GOD does not love the unjust.
These are the revelations that we recite to you, providing a message full of wisdom.
The example of Jesus, as far as GOD is concerned, is the same as that of Adam; He created him from dust, then said to him, "Be," and he was.
This is the truth from your Lord; do not harbor any doubts.
If anyone argues with you, despite the knowledge you have received, then say, "Let us summon our children and your children, our women and your women, ourselves and yourselves, then let us invoke GOD's curse upon the liars."
Absolutely, this is the narration of the truth. Absolutely, there is no god except GOD. Absolutely, GOD is the Almighty, Most Wise.
If they turn away, then GOD is fully aware of the evildoers.
Say, "O followers of the scripture, let us come to a logical agreement between us and you: that we shall not worship except GOD; that we never set up any idols besides Him, nor set up any human beings as lords beside GOD." If they turn away, say, "Bear witness that we are submitters."
O followers of the scripture, why do you argue about Abraham, when the Torah and the Gospel were not revealed until after him? Do you not understand?
You have argued about things you knew; why do you argue about things you do not know? GOD knows, while you do not know.
Abraham was neither Jewish, nor Christian; he was a monotheist submitter. He never was an idol worshiper.
The people most worthy of Abraham are those who followed him, and this prophet, and those who believe. GOD is the Lord and Master of the believers.
Some followers of the scripture wish to lead you astray, but they only lead themselves astray, without perceiving.
O followers of the scripture, why do you reject these revelations of GOD though you bear witness (that this is the truth)?
O followers of the scripture, why do you confound the truth with falsehood, and conceal the truth, knowingly?
Some followers of the scripture say, "Believe in what was sent down to the believers in the morning, and reject it in the evening; maybe someday they will revert.
"And do not believe except as those who follow your religion." Say, "The true guidance is GOD's guidance." If they claim that they have the same guidance, or argue with you about your Lord, say, "All grace is in GOD's hand; He bestows it upon whomever He wills." GOD is Bounteous, Omniscient.
He specifies His mercy for whomever He wills; GOD possesses unlimited grace.
Some followers of the scripture can be trusted with a whole lot, and they will give it back to you. Others among them cannot be trusted with a single dinar; they will not repay you unless you keep after them. That is because they say, "We do not have to be honest when dealing with the gentiles!" Thus, they attribute lies to GOD, knowingly.
Indeed, those who fulfill their obligations and lead a righteous life, GOD loves the righteous.
As for those who trade away GOD's covenant, and their obligations, for a cheap price, they receive no share in the Hereafter. GOD will not speak to them, nor look at them, on the Day of Resurrection, nor will He purify them. They have incurred a painful retribution.
Among them are those who twist their tongues to imitate the scripture, that you may think it is from the scripture, when it is not from the scripture, and they claim that it is from GOD, when it is not from GOD. Thus, they utter lies and attribute them to GOD, knowingly.
Never would a human being whom GOD blessed with the scripture and prophethood say to the people, "Idolize me beside GOD." Instead, (he would say), "Devote yourselves absolutely to your Lord alone," according to the scripture you preach and the teachings you learn.
Nor would he command you to idolize the angels and the prophets as lords. Would he exhort you to disbelieve after becoming submitters?
GOD took a covenant from the prophets, saying, "I will give you the scripture and wisdom. Afterwards, a messenger will come to confirm all existing scriptures. You shall believe in him and support him." He said, "Do you agree with this, and pledge to fulfill this covenant?" They said, "We agree." He said, "You have thus borne witness, and I bear witness along with you."
Those who reject this (Quranic prophecy) are the evil ones.
Are they seeking other than GOD's religion, when everything in the heavens and the earth has submitted to Him, willingly and unwillingly, and to Him they will be returned?
Say, "We believe in GOD, and in what was sent down to us, and in what was sent down to Abraham, Ismail, Isaac, Jacob, and the Patriarchs, and in what was given to Moses, Jesus, and the prophets from their Lord. We make no distinction among any of them. To Him alone we are submitters."
Anyone who accepts other than Submission as his religion, it will not be accepted from him, and in the Hereafter, he will be with the losers.
Why should GOD guide people who disbelieved after believing, and after witnessing that the messenger is truth, and after solid proofs have been given to them? GOD does not guide the wicked.
These have incurred condemnation by GOD, and the angels, and all the people.
Eternally they abide therein; the retribution is never commuted for them, nor will they be reprieved.
Exempted are those who repent thereafter, and reform. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
Those who disbelieve after believing, then plunge deeper into disbelief, their repentance will not be accepted from them; they are the real strayers.
Those who disbelieve and die as disbelievers, an earthful of gold will not be accepted from any of them, even if such a ransom were possible. They have incurred painful retribution; they will have no helpers.
You cannot attain righteousness until you give to charity from the possessions you love. Whatever you give to charity, GOD is fully aware thereof.
All food used to be lawful for the Children of Israel, until Israel imposed certain prohibitions on themselves before the Torah was sent down. Say, "Bring the Torah and read it, if you are truthful."
Those who fabricate false prohibitions after this, and attribute them to GOD, are truly wicked.
Say, "GOD has proclaimed the truth: You shall follow Abraham's religion-monotheism. He never was an idolater."
The most important shrine established for the people is the one in Becca; a blessed beacon for all the people.
In it are clear signs: the station of Abraham. Anyone who enters it shall be granted safe passage. The people owe it to GOD that they shall observe Hajj to this shrine, when they can afford it. As for those who disbelieve, GOD does not need anyone.
Say, "O followers of the scripture, why do you reject these revelations of GOD, when GOD is witnessing everything you do?"
Say, "O followers of the scripture, why do you repel from the path of GOD those who wish to believe, and seek to distort it, even though you are witnesses?" GOD is never unaware of anything you do.
O you who believe, if you obey some of those who received the scripture, they will revert you, after having believed, into disbelievers.
How can you disbelieve, when these revelations of GOD have been recited to you, and His messenger has come to you? Whoever holds fast to GOD will be guided in the right path.
O you who believe, you shall observe GOD as He should be observed, and do not die except as Submitters.
You shall hold fast to the rope of GOD, all of you, and do not be divided. Recall GOD's blessings upon you- you used to be enemies and He reconciled your hearts. By His grace, you became brethren. You were at the brink of a pit of fire, and He saved you therefrom. GOD thus explains His revelations for you, that you may be guided.
Let there be a community of you who invite to what is good, advocate righteousness, and forbid evil. These are the winners.
Do not be like those who became divided and disputed, despite the clear proofs that were given to them. For these have incurred a terrible retribution.
The day will come when some faces will be brightened (with joy), while other faces will be darkened (with misery). As for those whose faces are darkened, they will be asked, "Did you not disbelieve after believing? Therefore, suffer the retribution for your disbelief."
As for those whose faces are brightened, they will rejoice in GOD's mercy; they abide therein forever.
These are GOD's revelations; we recite them to you, truthfully. GOD does not wish any hardship for the people.
To GOD belongs everything in the heavens and everything on earth, and all matters are controlled by GOD.
You are the best community ever raised among the people: you advocate righteousness and forbid evil, and you believe in GOD. If the followers of the scripture believed, it would be better for them. Some of them do believe, but the majority of them are wicked.
They can never harm you, beyond insulting you. If they fight you, they will turn around and flee. They can never win.
They shall be humiliated whenever you encounter them, unless they uphold GOD's covenant, as well as their peace covenants with you. They have incurred wrath from GOD, and, consequently, they are committed to disgrace. This is because they rejected GOD's revelations, and killed the prophets unjustly. This is because they disobeyed and transgressed.
They are not all the same; among the followers of the scripture, there are those who are righteous. They recite GOD's revelations through the night, and they fall prostrate.
They believe in GOD and the Last Day, they advocate righteousness and forbid evil, and they hasten to do righteous works. These are the righteous.
Any good they do will not go unrewarded. GOD is fully aware of the righteous.
Those who disbelieved can never be helped by their money or their children against GOD. They have incurred Hell, wherein they abide forever.
The example of their accomplishments in this life is like a violent wind that hits the harvest of people who have wronged their souls, and wipes it out. GOD never wronged them; it is they who wronged themselves.
O you who believe, do not befriend outsiders who never cease to wish you harm; they even wish to see you suffer. Hatred flows out of their mouths and what they hide in their chests is far worse. We thus clarify the revelations for you, if you understand.
Here you are loving them, while they do not love you, and you believe in all the scripture. When they meet you they say, "We believe," but as soon as they leave, they bite their fingers out of rage towards you. Say, "Die in your rage." GOD is fully aware of the innermost thoughts.
When anything good comes your way they hurt, and when something bad happens to you they rejoice. If you steadfastly persevere, and maintain righteousness, their schemes will never hurt you. GOD is fully aware of everything they do.
Recall that you (Muhammad) were among your people when you set out to assign to the believers their positions for battle. GOD is Hearer, Omniscient.
Two groups among you almost failed, but GOD was their Lord. In GOD the believers shall trust.
GOD has granted you victory at Badr, despite your weakness. Therefore, you shall observe GOD, to show your appreciation.
You told the believers, "Is it not enough that your Lord supports you with three thousand angels, sent down?"
Indeed, if you steadfastly persevere and maintain righteousness, then they attack you suddenly, your Lord will support you with five thousand angels, well trained.
GOD thus informs you, in order to give you good news, and to assure your hearts. Victory comes only from GOD, the Almighty, Most Wise.
He thus annihilates some disbelievers, or neutralizes them; they always end up the losers.
It is not up to you; He may redeem them, or He may punish them for their transgressions.
To GOD belongs everything in the heavens and the earth. He forgives whomever He wills, and punishes whomever He wills. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
O you who believe, you shall not take usury, compounded over and over. Observe GOD, that you may succeed.
Beware of the hellfire that awaits the disbelievers.
You shall obey GOD and the messenger, that you may attain mercy.
You should eagerly race towards forgiveness from your Lord and a Paradise whose width encompasses the heavens and the earth; it awaits the righteous,
who give to charity during the good times, as well as the bad times. They are suppressors of anger, and pardoners of the people. GOD loves the charitable.
If they fall in sin or wrong their souls, they remember GOD and ask forgiveness for their sins-and who forgives the sins except GOD-and they do not persist in sins, knowingly.
Their recompense is forgiveness from their Lord, and gardens with flowing streams; they abide therein forever. What a blessed reward for the workers!
Precedents have been set for you in the past; roam the earth and note the consequences for the unbelievers.
This is a proclamation for the people, and a guidance and enlightenment for the righteous.
You shall not waver, nor shall you grieve, for you are the ultimate victors, if you are believers.
If you suffer hardship, the enemy also suffers the same hardship. We alternate the days of victory and defeat among the people. GOD thus distinguishes the true believers, and blesses some of you with martyrdom. GOD dislikes injustice.
GOD thus toughens those who believe and humiliates the disbelievers.
Do you expect to enter Paradise without GOD distinguishing those among you who strive, and without distinguishing those who are steadfast?
You used to long for death before you had to face it. Now you have faced it, right before your eyes.
Muhammad was no more than a messenger like the messengers before him. Should he die or get killed, would you turn back on your heels? Anyone who turns back on his heels, does not hurt GOD in the least. GOD rewards those who are appreciative.
No one dies except by GOD's leave, at a predetermined time. Whoever seeks the vanities of this world, we give him therefrom, and whoever seeks the rewards of the Hereafter, we bless him therein. We reward those who are appreciative.
Many a prophet had godly people fight along with him, without ever wavering under pressure in the cause of GOD, nor did they hesitate or become discouraged. GOD loves the steadfast.
Their only utterance was, "Our Lord, forgive us our sins, and our transgressions, strengthen our foothold, and grant us victory over the disbelievers."
Consequently, GOD granted them the rewards of this world, and the better rewards of the Hereafter. GOD loves the good doers.
O you who believe, if you obey those who disbelieve, they will turn you back on your heels, then you end up losers.
GOD alone is your Lord and Master, and He is the best supporter.
We will throw terror into the hearts of those who disbelieved, since they set up besides GOD powerless idols. Their destiny is Hell; what a miserable abode for the transgressors!
GOD has fulfilled His promise to you, and you defeated them by His leave. But then you wavered, disputed among yourselves, and disobeyed after He had shown you (the victory) you had longed for. But then, some of you became distracted by the spoils of this world, while others were rightly concerned with the Hereafter. He then diverted you from them to test you. He has pardoned you. GOD showers the believers with His grace.
Recall that you rushed (after the spoils), paying no attention to anyone, even when the messenger was calling from behind you. Consequently, He substituted one misery for another, that you may not grieve over anything you had missed, or agonize over any hardship you had suffered. GOD is Cognizant of everything you do.
After the setback, He sent down upon you peaceful slumber that pacified some of you. Others among you were selfishly concerned about themselves. They harbored thoughts about GOD that were not right- the same thoughts they had harbored during the days of ignorance. Thus, they said, "Is anything up to us?" Say, "Everything is up to GOD." They concealed inside themselves what they did not reveal to you. They said, "If it was up to us, none of us would have been killed in this battle." Say, "Had you stayed in your homes, those destined to be killed would have crawled into their death beds." GOD thus puts you to the test to bring out your true convictions, and to test what is in your hearts. GOD is fully aware of the innermost thoughts.
Surely, those among you who turned back the day the two armies clashed have been duped by the devil. This reflects some of the (evil) works they had committed. GOD has pardoned them. GOD is Forgiver, Clement.
O you who believe, do not be like those who disbelieved and said of their kinsmen who traveled or mobilized for war, "Had they stayed with us, they would not have died or gotten killed." GOD renders this a source of grief in their hearts. GOD controls life and death. GOD is Seer of everything you do.
Whether you get killed or die in the cause of GOD, the forgiveness from GOD, and mercy are far better than anything they hoard.
Whether you die or get killed, you will be summoned before GOD.
It was mercy from GOD that you became compassionate towards them. Had you been harsh and mean-hearted, they would have abandoned you. Therefore, you shall pardon them and ask forgiveness for them, and consult them. Once you make a decision, carry out your plan, and trust in GOD. GOD loves those who trust in Him.
If GOD supports you, none can defeat you. And if He abandons you, who else can support you? In GOD the believers shall trust.
Even the prophet cannot take more of the spoils of war than he is entitled to. Anyone who takes more than his rightful share will have to account for it on the Day of Resurrection. That is when each soul is paid for whatever it earned, without the least injustice.
Is one who pursues GOD's pleasure the same as one who incurs wrath from GOD and his destiny is Hell, the most miserable abode?
They certainly occupy different ranks at GOD. GOD is Seer of everything they do.
GOD has blessed the believers by raising in their midst a messenger from among them, to recite for them His revelations, and to purify them, and to teach them the scripture and wisdom. Before this, they had gone totally astray.
Now that you have suffered a setback, and even though you inflicted twice as much suffering (upon your enemy), you said, "Why did this happen to us?" Say, "This is a consequence of your own deeds." GOD is Omnipotent.
What afflicted you the day the two armies clashed was in accordance with GOD's will, and to distinguish the believers.
And to expose the hypocrites who were told, "Come fight in the cause of GOD, or contribute." They said, "If we knew how to fight, we would have joined you." They were closer to disbelief then than they were to belief. They uttered with their mouths what was not in their hearts. GOD knows what they conceal.
They said of their kinsmen, as they stayed behind, "Had they obeyed us, they would not have been killed." Say, "Then prevent your own death, if you are truthful."
Do not think that those who are killed in the cause of GOD are dead; they are alive at their Lord, enjoying His provisions.
They are rejoicing in GOD's grace, and they have good news for their comrades who did not die with them, that they have nothing to fear, nor will they grieve.
They have good news of GOD's blessings and grace, and that GOD never fails to reward the believers.
For those who respond to GOD and the messenger, despite the persecution they suffer, and maintain their good works, and lead a righteous life, a great reward.
When the people say to them, "People have mobilized against you; you should fear them," this only strengthens their faith, and they say, "GOD suffices us; He is the best Protector."
They have deserved GOD's blessings and grace. No harm ever touches them, for they have attained GOD's approval. GOD possesses infinite grace.
It is the devil's system to instill fear into his subjects. Do not fear them and fear Me instead, if you are believers.
Do not be saddened by those who hasten to disbelieve. They never hurt GOD in the least. Instead, GOD has willed that they will have no share in the Hereafter. They have incurred a terrible retribution.
Those who choose disbelief, instead of belief, do not hurt GOD in the least; they have incurred a painful retribution.
Let not the disbelievers think that we lead them on for their own good. We only lead them on to confirm their sinfulness. They have incurred a humiliating retribution.
GOD is not to leave the believers as you are, without distinguishing the bad from the good. Nor does GOD inform you of the future, but GOD bestows such knowledge upon whomever He chooses from among His messengers. Therefore, you shall believe in GOD and His messengers. If you believe and lead a righteous life, you receive a great recompense.
Let not those who withhold and hoard GOD's provisions think that this is good for them; it is bad for them. For they will carry their hoardings around their necks on the Day of Resurrection. GOD is the ultimate inheritor of the heavens and the earth. GOD is fully Cognizant of everything you do.
GOD has heard the utterances of those who said, "GOD is poor, while we are rich." We will record everything they said, just as we recorded their killing of the prophets unjustly, and we will say, "Suffer the retribution of Hell.
"This is the consequence of your own works." GOD is never unjust towards the people.
It is they who said, "GOD has made a covenant with us that we shall not believe in any messenger, unless he produces an offering that gets consumed by fire." Say, "Messengers before me have come to you with clear proofs, including what you just demanded. Why then did you kill them, if you are truthful?"
If they reject you, messengers before you have been rejected, even though they brought proofs, the Psalms, and the enlightening scripture.
Every person tastes death, then you receive your recompense on the Day of Resurrection. Whoever misses Hell, barely, and makes it to Paradise, has attained a great triumph. The life of this world is no more than an illusion.
You will certainly be tested, through your money and your lives, and you will hear from those who received the scripture, and from the idol worshipers, a lot of insult. If you steadfastly persevere and lead a righteous life, this will prove the strength of your faith.
GOD took a covenant from those who received the scripture: "You shall proclaim it to the people, and never conceal it." But they disregarded it behind their backs, and traded it away for a cheap price. What a miserable trade.
Those who boast about their works, and wish to be praised for something they have not really done, should not think that they can evade the retribution. They have incurred a painful retribution.
To GOD belongs the sovereignty of the heavens and the earth. GOD is Omnipotent.
In the creation of the heavens and the earth, and the alternation of night and day, there are signs for those who possess intelligence.
They remember GOD while standing, sitting, and on their sides, and they reflect upon the creation of the heavens and the earth: "Our Lord, You did not create all this in vain. Be You glorified. Save us from the retribution of Hell.
"Our Lord, whomever You commit to Hell are the ones You have forsaken. Such transgressors have no helpers.
"Our Lord, we have heard a caller calling to faith and proclaiming: 'You shall believe in your Lord,' and we have believed. Our Lord, forgive us our transgressions, remit our sins, and let us die as righteous believers.
"Our Lord, shower us with the blessings you promised us through Your messengers, and do not forsake us on the Day of Resurrection. You never break a promise."
Their Lord responded to them: "I never fail to reward any worker among you for any work you do, be you male or female- you are equal to one another. Thus, those who immigrate, and get evicted from their homes, and are persecuted because of Me, and fight and get killed, I will surely remit their sins and admit them into gardens with flowing streams." Such is the reward from GOD. GOD possesses the ultimate reward.
Do not be impressed by the apparent success of disbelievers.
They only enjoy temporarily, then end up in Hell; what a miserable destiny!
As for those who observe their Lord, they have deserved gardens with flowing streams; they abide therein forever. Such is the abode given to them by GOD. What GOD possesses is far better for the righteous.
Surely, some followers of the previous scriptures do believe in GOD, and in what was revealed to you, and in what was revealed to them. They reverence GOD, and they never trade away GOD's revelations for a cheap price. These will receive their recompense from their Lord. GOD is the most efficient in reckoning.
O you who believe, you shall be steadfast, you shall persevere, you shall be united, you shall observe GOD, that you may succeed.
O people, observe your Lord; the One who created you from one being, and created from it its mate, then spread from the two many men and women. You shall regard GOD, by whom you swear, and regard the parents. GOD is watching over you.
You shall hand over to the orphans their rightful properties. Do not substitute the bad for the good, and do not consume their properties by combining them with yours. This would be a gross injustice.
If you deem it best for the orphans, you may marry their mothers- you may marry two, three, or four. If you fear lest you become unfair, then you shall be content with only one, or with what you already have. Additionally, you are thus more likely to avoid financial hardship.
You shall give the women their due dowries, equitably. If they willingly forfeit anything, then you may accept it; it is rightfully yours.
Do not give immature orphans the properties that GOD has entrusted with you as guardians. You shall provide for them therefrom, and clothe them, and treat them kindly.
You shall test the orphans when they reach puberty. As soon as you find them mature enough, give them their property. Do not consume it extravagantly in a hurry, before they grow up. The rich guardian shall not charge any wage, but the poor guardian may charge equitably. When you give them their properties, you shall have witnesses. GOD suffices as Reckoner.
The men get a share of what the parents and the relatives leave behind. The women too shall get a share of what the parents and relatives leave behind. Whether it is a small or a large inheritance, (the women must get) a definite share.
During distribution of the inheritances, if relatives, orphans, and needy persons are present, you shall give them therefrom, and treat them kindly.
Those who are concerned about their own children, in case they leave them behind, shall observe GOD and be equitable.
Those who consume the orphans' properties unjustly, eat fire into their bellies, and will suffer in Hell.
GOD decrees a will for the benefit of your children; the male gets twice the share of the female. If the inheritors are only women, more than two, they get two-thirds of what is bequeathed. If only one daughter is left, she gets one-half. The parents of the deceased get one-sixth of the inheritance each, if the deceased has left any children. If he left no children, and his parents are the only inheritors, the mother gets one-third. If he has siblings, then the mother gets one-sixth. All this, after fulfilling any will the deceased has left, and after paying off all debts. When it comes to your parents and your children, you do not know which of them is really the best to you and the most beneficial. This is GOD's law. GOD is Omniscient, Most Wise.
You get half of what your wives leave behind, if they had no children. If they had children, you get one-fourth of what they leave. All this, after fulfilling any will they had left, and after paying off all debts. They get one-fourth of what you leave behind, if you had no children. If you had children, they get one-eighth of what you bequeath. All this, after fulfilling any will you had left, and after paying off all debts. If the deceased man or woman was a loner, and leaves two siblings, male or female, each of them gets one-sixth of the inheritance. If there are more siblings, then they equally share one-third of the inheritance. All this, after fulfilling any will, and after paying off all debts, so that no one is hurt. This is a will decreed by GOD. GOD is Omniscient, Clement.
These are GOD's laws. Those who obey GOD and His messenger, He will admit them into gardens with flowing streams, wherein they abide forever. This is the greatest triumph.
As for the one who disobeys GOD and His messenger, and transgresses His laws, He will admit him into Hell, wherein he abides forever. He has incurred a shameful retribution.
Those who commit adultery among your women, you must have four witnesses against them, from among you. If they do bear witness, then you shall keep such women in their homes until they die, or until GOD creates an exit for them.
The couple who commits adultery shall be punished. If they repent and reform, you shall leave them alone. GOD is Redeemer, Most Merciful.
Repentance is acceptable by GOD from those who fall in sin out of ignorance, then repent immediately thereafter. GOD redeems them. GOD is Omniscient, Most Wise.
Not acceptable is the repentance of those who commit sins until death comes to them, then say, "Now I repent." Nor is it acceptable from those who die as disbelievers. For these, we have prepared a painful retribution.
O you who believe, it is not lawful for you to inherit what the women leave behind, against their will. You shall not force them to give up anything you had given them, unless they commit a proven adultery. You shall treat them nicely. If you dislike them, you may dislike something wherein GOD has placed a lot of good.
If you wish to marry another wife, in place of your present wife, and you had given any of them a great deal, you shall not take back anything you had given her. Would you take it fraudulently, maliciously, and sinfully?
How could you take it back, after you have been intimate with each other, and they had taken from you a solemn pledge?
Do not marry the women who were previously married to your fathers-existing marriages are exempted and shall not be broken-for it is a gross offense, and an abominable act.
Prohibited for you (in marriage) are your mothers, your daughters, your sisters, the sisters of your fathers, the sisters of your mothers, the daughters of your brother, the daughters of your sister, your nursing mothers, the girls who nursed from the same woman as you, the mothers of your wives, the daughters of your wives with whom you have consummated the marriage-if the marriage has not been consummated, you may marry the daughter. Also prohibited for you are the women who were married to your genetic sons. Also, you shall not be married to two sisters at the same time-but do not break up existing marriages. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
Also prohibited are the women who are already married, unless they flee their disbelieving husbands who are at war with you. These are GOD's commandments to you. All other categories are permitted for you in marriage, so long as you pay them their due dowries. You shall maintain your morality, by not committing adultery. Thus, whoever you like among them, you shall pay them the dowry decreed for them. You commit no error by mutually agreeing to any adjustments to the dowry. GOD is Omniscient, Most Wise.
Those among you who cannot afford to marry free believing women, may marry believing slave women. GOD knows best about your belief, and you are equal to one another, as far as belief is concerned. You shall obtain permission from their guardians before you marry them, and pay them their due dowry equitably. They shall maintain moral behavior, by not committing adultery, or having secret lovers. Once they are freed through marriage, if they commit adultery, their punishment shall be half of that for the free women. Marrying a slave shall be a last resort for those unable to wait. To be patient is better for you. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
GOD wills to explain things for you, and to guide you through past precedents, and to redeem you. GOD is Omniscient, Most Wise.
GOD wishes to redeem you, while those who pursue their lusts wish that you deviate a great deviation.
GOD wishes to lighten your burden, for the human being is created weak.
O you who believe, do not consume each others' properties illicitly- only mutually acceptable transactions are permitted. You shall not kill yourselves. GOD is Merciful towards you.
Anyone who commits these transgressions, maliciously and deliberately, we will condemn him to Hell. This is easy for GOD to do.
If you refrain from committing the gross sins that are prohibited for you, we will remit your sins, and admit you an honorable admittance.
You shall not covet the qualities bestowed upon each other by GOD; the men enjoy certain qualities, and the women enjoy certain qualities. You may implore GOD to shower you with His grace. GOD is fully aware of all things.
For each of you, we have designated shares from the inheritance left by the parents and the relatives. Also those related to you through marriage, you shall give them their due share. GOD witnesses all things.
The men are made responsible for the women, and GOD has endowed them with certain qualities, and made them the bread earners. The righteous women will cheerfully accept this arrangement, since it is GOD's commandment, and honor their husbands during their absence. If you experience rebellion from the women, you shall first talk to them, then (you may use negative incentives like) deserting them in bed, then you may (as a last alternative) beat them. If they obey you, you are not permitted to transgress against them. GOD is Most High, Supreme.
If a couple fears separation, you shall appoint an arbitrator from his family and an arbitrator from her family; if they decide to reconcile, GOD will help them get together. GOD is Omniscient, Cognizant.
You shall worship GOD alone- do not associate anything with Him. You shall regard the parents, the relatives, the orphans, the poor, the related neighbor, the unrelated neighbor, the close associate, the traveling alien, and your servants. GOD does not like the arrogant show-offs.
The ones who are stingy, exhort the people to be stingy, and conceal what GOD has bestowed upon them from His bounties. We have prepared for the disbelievers a shameful retribution.
They give money to charity only to show off, while disbelieving in GOD and the Last Day. If one's companion is the devil, that is the worst companion.
Why do they not believe in GOD and the Last Day, and give from GOD's provisions to them? GOD is fully aware of them.
GOD does not inflict an atom's weight of injustice. On the contrary, He multiplies the reward manifold for the righteous work, and grants from Him a great recompense.
Thus, when the day (of judgment) comes, we will call upon a witness from each community, and you (the messenger) will serve as a witness among these people.
On that day, those who disbelieved and disobeyed the messenger will wish that they were level with the ground; not a single utterance will they be able to hide from GOD.
O you who believe, do not observe the Contact Prayers (Salat) while intoxicated, so that you know what you are saying. Nor after sexual orgasm without bathing, unless you are on the road, traveling; if you are ill or traveling, or you had urinary or fecal-related excretion (such as gas), or contacted the women (sexually), and you cannot find water, you shall observe Tayammum (dry ablution) by touching clean dry soil, then wiping your faces and hands therewith. GOD is Pardoner, Forgiver.
Have you noted those who received a portion of the scripture, and how they choose to stray, and wish that you stray from the path?
GOD knows best who your enemies are. GOD is the only Lord and Master. GOD is the only Supporter.
Among those who are Jewish, some distort the words beyond the truth, and they say, "We hear, but we disobey," and "Your words are falling on deaf ears," and "Raa'ena (be our shepherd)," as they twist their tongues to mock the religion. Had they said, "We hear, and we obey," and "We hear you," and "Unzurna (watch over us)," it would have been better for them, and more righteous. Instead, they have incurred condemnation from GOD due to their disbelief. Consequently, the majority of them cannot believe.
O you who received the scripture, you shall believe in what we reveal herein, confirming what you have, before we banish certain faces to exile, or condemn them as we condemned those who desecrated the Sabbath. GOD's command is done.
GOD does not forgive idolatry, but He forgives lesser offenses for whomever He wills. Anyone who sets up idols beside GOD, has forged a horrendous offense.
Have you noted those who exalt themselves? Instead, GOD is the One who exalts whomever He wills, without the least injustice.
Note how they fabricate lies about GOD; what a gross offense this is!
Have you noted those who received a portion of the scripture, and how they believe in idolatry and false doctrine, then say, "The disbelievers are better guided than the believers?!"
It is they who incurred GOD's condemnation, and whomever GOD condemns, you will not find any helper for him.
Do they own a share of the sovereignty? If they did, they would not give the people as much as a grain.
Are they envious of the people because GOD has showered them with His blessings? We have given Abraham's family the scripture, and wisdom; we granted them a great authority.
Some of them believed therein, and some of them repelled therefrom; Hell is the only just retribution for these.
Surely, those who disbelieve in our revelations, we will condemn them to the hellfire. Whenever their skins are burnt, we will give them new skins. Thus, they will suffer continuously. GOD is Almighty, Most Wise.
As for those who believe and lead a righteous life, we will admit them into gardens with flowing streams; they abide therein forever. They will have pure spouses therein. We will admit them into a blissful shade.
GOD commands you to give back anything the people have entrusted to you. If you judge among the people, you shall judge equitably. The best enlightenment indeed is what GOD recommends for you. GOD is Hearer, Seer.
O you who believe, you shall obey GOD, and you shall obey the messenger, and those in charge among you. If you dispute in any matter, you shall refer it to GOD and the messenger, if you do believe in GOD and the Last Day. This is better for you, and provides you with the best solution.
Have you noted those who claim that they believe in what was revealed to you, and in what was revealed before you, then uphold the unjust laws of their idols? They were commanded to reject such laws. Indeed, it is the devil's wish to lead them far astray.
When they are told, "Come to what GOD has revealed, and to the messenger," you see the hypocrites shunning you completely.
How will it be when a disaster hits them, as a consequence of their own works? They will come to you then and swear by GOD: "Our intentions were good and righteous!"
GOD is fully aware of their innermost intentions. You shall ignore them, enlighten them, and give them good advice that may save their souls.
We did not send any messenger except to be obeyed in accordance with GOD's will. Had they, when they wronged their souls, come to you and prayed to GOD for forgiveness, and the messenger prayed for their forgiveness, they would have found GOD Redeemer, Most Merciful.
Never indeed, by your Lord; they are not believers unless they come to you to judge in their disputes, then find no hesitation in their hearts whatsoever in accepting your judgment. They must submit a total submission.
Had we decreed for them: "You must offer your lives," or "Give up your homes," they would not have done it, except for a few of them. (Even if such a command was issued,) had they done what they were commanded to do, it would have been better for them, and would prove the strength of their faith.
And we would have granted them a great recompense.
And we would have guided them in the right path.
Those who obey GOD and the messenger belong with those blessed by GOD-the prophets, the saints, the martyrs, and the righteous. These are the best company.
Such is the blessing from GOD; GOD is the best Knower.
O you who believe, you shall remain alert, and mobilize as individuals, or mobilize all together.
Surely, there are those among you who would drag their feet, then, if a setback afflicts you, they would say, "GOD has blessed me that I was not martyred with them."
But if you attain a blessing from GOD, they would say, as if no friendship ever existed between you and them, "I wish I was with them, so I could share in such a great victory."
Those who readily fight in the cause of GOD are those who forsake this world in favor of the Hereafter. Whoever fights in the cause of GOD, then gets killed, or attains victory, we will surely grant him a great recompense.
Why should you not fight in the cause of GOD when weak men, women, and children are imploring: "Our Lord, deliver us from this community whose people are oppressive, and be You our Lord and Master."
Those who believe are fighting for the cause of GOD, while those who disbelieve are fighting for the cause of tyranny. Therefore, you shall fight the devil's allies; the devil's power is nil.
Have you noted those who were told, "You do not have to fight; all you need to do is observe the Contact Prayers (Salat) and give the obligatory charity (Zakat)," then, when fighting was decreed for them, they feared the people as much as they feared GOD, or even more? They said, "Our Lord, why did You force this fighting on us? If only You respite us for awhile!" Say, "The materials of this world are nil, while the Hereafter is far better for the righteous, and you never suffer the slightest injustice."
Wherever you are, death will catch up with you, even if you live in formidable castles. When something good happens to them, they say, "This is from GOD," and when something bad afflicts them, they blame you. Say, "Everything comes from GOD." Why do these people misunderstand almost everything?
Anything good that happens to you is from GOD, and anything bad that happens to you is from you. We have sent you as a messenger to the people, and GOD suffices as witness.
Whoever obeys the messenger is obeying GOD. As for those who turn away, we did not send you as their guardian.
They pledge obedience, but as soon as they leave you, some of them harbor intentions contrary to what they say. GOD records their innermost intentions. You shall disregard them, and put your trust in GOD. GOD suffices as an advocate.
Why do they not study the Quran carefully? If it were from other than GOD, they would have found in it numerous contradictions.
When a rumor that affects security comes their way, they spread it. Had they referred it to the messenger, and those in charge among them, those who understand these matters would have informed them. If it were not for GOD's grace towards you, and His mercy, you would have followed the devil, except a few.
You shall fight for the cause of GOD; you are responsible only for your own soul, and exhort the believers to do the same. GOD will neutralize the power of those who disbelieve. GOD is much more powerful, and much more effective.
Whoever mediates a good deed receives a share of the credit thereof, and whoever mediates an evil work, incurs a share thereof. GOD controls all things.
When greeted with a greeting, you shall respond with a better greeting or at least an equal one. GOD reckons all things.
GOD: there is no god except He. He will surely summon you on the Day of Resurrection-the inevitable day. Whose narration is more truthful than GOD's?
Why should you divide yourselves into two groups regarding hypocrites (among you)? GOD is the one who condemned them because of their own behavior. Do you want to guide those who are sent astray by GOD? Whomever GOD sends astray, you can never find a way to guide them.
They wish that you disbelieve as they have disbelieved, then you become equal. Do not consider them friends, unless they mobilize along with you in the cause of GOD. If they turn against you, you shall fight them, and you may kill them when you encounter them in war. You shall not accept them as friends, or allies.
Exempted are those who join people with whom you have signed a peace treaty, and those who come to you wishing not to fight you, nor fight their relatives. Had GOD willed, He could have permitted them to fight against you. Therefore, if they leave you alone, refrain from fighting you, and offer you peace, then GOD gives you no excuse to fight them.
You will find others who wish to make peace with you, and also with their people. However, as soon as war erupts, they fight against you. Unless these people leave you alone, offer you peace, and stop fighting you, you may fight them when you encounter them. Against these, we give you a clear authorization.
No believer shall kill another believer, unless it is an accident. If one kills a believer by accident, he shall atone by freeing a believing slave, and paying a compensation to the victim's family, unless they forfeit such a compensation as a charity. If the victim belonged to people who are at war with you, though he was a believer, you shall atone by freeing a believing slave. If he belonged to people with whom you have signed a peace treaty, you shall pay the compensation in addition to freeing a believing slave. If you cannot find a slave to free, you shall atone by fasting two consecutive months, in order to be redeemed by GOD. GOD is Knower, Most Wise.
Anyone who kills a believer on purpose, his retribution is Hell, wherein he abides forever, GOD is angry with him, and condemns him, and has prepared for him a terrible retribution.
O you who believe, if you strike in the cause of GOD, you shall be absolutely sure. Do not say to one who offers you peace, "You are not a believer," seeking the spoils of this world. For GOD possesses infinite spoils. Remember that you used to be like them, and GOD blessed you. Therefore, you shall be absolutely sure (before you strike). GOD is fully Cognizant of everything you do.
Not equal are the sedentary among the believers who are not handicapped, and those who strive in the cause of GOD with their money and their lives. GOD exalts the strivers with their money and their lives above the sedentary. For both, GOD promises salvation, but GOD exalts the strivers over the sedentary with a great recompense.
The higher ranks come from Him, as well as forgiveness and mercy. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
Those whose lives are terminated by the angels, while in a state of wronging their souls, the angels will ask them, "What was the matter with you?" They will say, "We were oppressed on earth." They will say, "Was GOD's earth not spacious enough for you to emigrate therein?" For these, the final abode is Hell, and a miserable destiny.
Exempted are the weak men, women, and children who do not possess the strength, nor the means to find a way out.
These may be pardoned by GOD. GOD is Pardoner, Forgiver.
Anyone who emigrates in the cause of GOD will find on earth great bounties and richness. Anyone who gives up his home, emigrating to GOD and His messenger, then death catches up with him, his recompense is reserved with GOD. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
When you travel, during war, you commit no error by shortening your Contact Prayers (Salat), if you fear that the disbelievers may attack you. Surely, the disbelievers are your ardent enemies.
When you are with them, and lead the Contact Prayer (Salat) for them, let some of you stand guard; let them hold their weapons, and let them stand behind you as you prostrate. Then, let the other group that has not prayed take their turn praying with you, while the others stand guard and hold their weapons. Those who disbelieved wish to see you neglect your weapons and your equipment, in order to attack you once and for all. You commit no error, if you are hampered by rain or injury, by putting down your weapons, so long as you remain alert. GOD has prepared for the disbelievers a shameful retribution.
Once you complete your Contact Prayer (Salat), you shall remember GOD while standing, sitting, or lying down. Once the war is over, you shall observe the Contact Prayers (Salat); the Contact Prayers (Salat) are decreed for the believers at specific times.
Do not waver in pursuing the enemy. If you suffer, they also suffer. However, you expect from GOD what they never expect. GOD is Omniscient, Most Wise.
We have sent down to you the scripture, truthfully, in order to judge among the people in accordance with what GOD has shown you. You shall not side with the betrayers.
You shall implore GOD for forgiveness. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
Do not argue on behalf of those who have wronged their own souls; GOD does not love any betrayer, guilty.
They hide from the people, and do not care to hide from GOD, though He is with them as they harbor ideas He dislikes. GOD is fully aware of everything they do.
Here you are arguing on their behalf in this world; who is going to argue with GOD on their behalf on the Day of Resurrection? Who is going to be their advocate?
Anyone who commits evil, or wrongs his soul, then implores GOD for forgiveness, will find GOD Forgiving, Most Merciful.
Anyone who earns a sin, earns it to the detriment of his own soul. GOD is Omniscient, Most Wise.
Anyone who earns a sin, then accuses an innocent person thereof, has committed a blasphemy and a gross offense.
If it were not for GOD's grace towards you, and His mercy, some of them would have misled you. They only mislead themselves, and they can never harm you in the least. GOD has sent down to you the scripture and wisdom, and He has taught you what you never knew. Indeed, GOD's blessings upon you have been great.
There is nothing good about their private conferences, except for those who advocate charity, or righteous works, or making peace among the people. Anyone who does this, in response to GOD's teachings, we will grant him a great recompense.
As for him who opposes the messenger, after the guidance has been pointed out to him, and follows other than the believers' way, we will direct him in the direction he has chosen, and commit him to Hell; what a miserable destiny!
GOD does not forgive idol worship (if maintained until death), and He forgives lesser offenses for whomever He wills. Anyone who idolizes any idol beside GOD has strayed far astray.
They even worship female gods besides Him; as a matter of fact, they only worship a rebellious devil.
GOD has condemned him, and he said, "I will surely recruit a definite share of Your worshipers.
"I will mislead them, I will entice them, I will command them to (forbid the eating of certain meats by) marking the ears of livestock, and I will command them to distort the creation of GOD." Anyone who accepts the devil as a lord, instead of GOD, has incurred a profound loss.
He promises them and entices them; what the devil promises is no more than an illusion.
These have incurred Hell as their final abode, and can never evade it.
As for those who believe and lead a righteous life, we will admit them into gardens with flowing streams, wherein they live forever. Such is the truthful promise of GOD. Whose utterances are more truthful than GOD's?
It is not in accordance with your wishes, or the wishes of the people of the scripture: anyone who commits evil pays for it, and will have no helper or supporter against GOD.
As for those who lead a righteous life, male or female, while believing, they enter Paradise; without the slightest injustice.
Who is better guided in his religion than one who submits totally to GOD, leads a righteous life, according to the creed of Abraham: monotheism? GOD has chosen Abraham as a beloved friend.
To GOD belongs everything in the heavens and the earth. GOD is in full control of all things.
They consult you concerning women: say, "GOD enlightens you regarding them, as recited for you in the scripture. You shall restore the rights of orphaned girls whom you cheat out of their due dowries when you wish to marry them: you shall not take advantage of them. The rights of orphaned boys must also be protected as well. You shall treat the orphans equitably. Whatever good you do, GOD is fully aware thereof."
If a woman senses oppression or desertion from her husband, the couple shall try to reconcile their differences, for conciliation is best for them. Selfishness is a human trait, and if you do good and lead a righteous life, GOD is fully Cognizant of everything you do.
You can never be equitable in dealing with more than one wife, no matter how hard you try. Therefore, do not be so biased as to leave one of them hanging (neither enjoying marriage, nor left to marry someone else). If you correct this situation and maintain righteousness, GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
If the couple must decide to part, GOD will provide for each of them from His bounties. GOD is Bounteous, Most Wise.
To GOD belongs everything in the heavens and the earth, and we have enjoined on those who received the scripture before you, and enjoined on you, that you shall reverence GOD. If you disbelieve, then to GOD belongs everything in the heavens and the earth. GOD is in no need, Praiseworthy.
To GOD belongs everything in the heavens and the earth, and GOD is the only Protector.
If He wills, He can annihilate you, O people, and substitute others in your place. GOD is certainly able to do this.
Anyone who seeks the materials of this world should know that GOD possesses both the materials of this world and the Hereafter. GOD is Hearer, Seer.
O you who believe, you shall be absolutely equitable, and observe GOD, when you serve as witnesses, even against yourselves, or your parents, or your relatives. Whether the accused is rich or poor, GOD takes care of both. Therefore, do not be biased by your personal wishes. If you deviate or disregard (this commandment), then GOD is fully Cognizant of everything you do.
O you who believe, you shall believe in GOD and His messenger, and the scripture He has revealed through His messenger, and the scripture He has revealed before that. Anyone who refuses to believe in GOD, and His angels, and His scriptures, and His messengers, and the Last Day, has indeed strayed far astray.
Surely, those who believe, then disbelieve, then believe, then disbelieve, then plunge deeper into disbelief, GOD will not forgive them, nor will He guide them in any way.
Inform the hypocrites that they have incurred painful retribution.
They are the ones who ally themselves with disbelievers instead of believers. Are they seeking dignity with them? All dignity belongs with GOD alone.
He has instructed you in the scripture that: if you hear GOD's revelations being mocked and ridiculed, you shall not sit with them, unless they delve into another subject. Otherwise, you will be as guilty as they are. GOD will gather the hypocrites and the disbelievers together in Hell.
They watch you and wait; if you attain victory from GOD, they say (to you), "Were we not with you?" But if the disbelievers get a turn, they say (to them), "Did we not side with you, and protect you from the believers?" GOD will judge between you on the Day of Resurrection. GOD will never permit the disbelievers to prevail over the believers.
The hypocrites think that they are deceiving GOD, but He is the One who leads them on. When they get up for the Contact Prayer (Salat), they get up lazily. That is because they only show off in front of the people, and rarely do they think of GOD.
They waver in between, neither belonging to this group, nor that group. Whomever GOD sends astray, you will never find a way to guide him.
O you who believe, you shall not ally yourselves with the disbelievers, instead of the believers. Do you wish to provide GOD with a clear proof against you?
The hypocrites will be committed to the lowest pit of Hell, and you will find no one to help them.
Only those who repent, reform, hold fast to GOD, and devote their religion absolutely to GOD alone, will be counted with the believers. GOD will bless the believers with a great recompense.
What will GOD gain from punishing you, if you became appreciative and believed? GOD is Appreciative, Omniscient.
GOD does not like the utterance of bad language, unless one is treated with gross injustice. GOD is Hearer, Knower.
If you work righteousness-either declared or concealed- or pardon a transgression, GOD is Pardoner, Omnipotent.
Those who disbelieve in GOD and His messengers, and seek to make distinction among GOD and His messengers, and say, "We believe in some and reject some," and wish to follow a path in between;
these are the real disbelievers. We have prepared for the disbelievers a shameful retribution.
As for those who believe in GOD and His messengers, and make no distinction among them, He will grant them their recompense. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
The people of the scripture challenge you to bring down to them a book from the sky! They have asked Moses for more than that, saying, "Show us GOD, physically." Consequently, the lightning struck them, as a consequence of their audacity. Additionally, they worshiped the calf, after all the miracles they had seen. Yet, we pardoned all this. We supported Moses with profound miracles.
And we raised Mount Sinai above them, as we took their covenant. And we said to them, "Enter the gate humbly." And we said to them, "Do not desecrate the Sabbath." Indeed, we took from them a solemn covenant.
(They incurred condemnation) for violating their covenant, rejecting GOD's revelations, killing the prophets unjustly, and for saying, "Our minds are made up!" In fact, GOD is the One who sealed their minds, due to their disbelief, and this is why they fail to believe, except rarely.
(They are condemned) for disbelieving and uttering about Mary a gross lie.
And for claiming that they killed the Messiah, Jesus, son of Mary, the messenger of GOD. In fact, they never killed him, they never crucified him-they were made to think that they did. All factions who are disputing in this matter are full of doubt concerning this issue. They possess no knowledge; they only conjecture. For certain, they never killed him.
Instead, GOD raised him to Him; GOD is Almighty, Most Wise.
Everyone among the people of the scripture was required to believe in him before his death. On the Day of Resurrection, he will be a witness against them.
Due to their transgressions, we prohibited for the Jews good foods that used to be lawful for them; also for consistently repelling from the path of GOD.
And for practicing usury, which was forbidden, and for consuming the people's money illicitly. We have prepared for the disbelievers among them painful retribution.
As for those among them who are well founded in knowledge, and the believers, they believe in what was revealed to you, and in what was revealed before you. They are observers of the Contact Prayers (Salat), and givers of the obligatory charity (Zakat); they are believers in GOD and the Last Day. We grant these a great recompense.
We have inspired you, as we inspired Noah and the prophets after him. And we inspired Abraham, Ismail, Isaac, Jacob, the Patriarchs, Jesus, Job, Jonah, Aaron, and Solomon. And we gave David the Psalms.
Messengers we have told you about, and messengers we never told you about. And GOD spoke to Moses directly.
Messengers to deliver good news, as well as warnings. Thus, the people will have no excuse when they face GOD, after all these messengers have come to them. GOD is Almighty, Most Wise.
But GOD bears witness concerning what He has revealed to you; He has revealed it with His knowledge. And the angels bear witness as well, but GOD suffices as witness.
Surely, those who disbelieve and repel from the way of GOD have strayed far astray.
Those who disbelieve and transgress, GOD will not forgive them, nor will He guide them in any way;
except the way to Hell, wherein they abide forever. This is easy for GOD to do.
O people, the messenger has come to you with the truth from your Lord. Therefore, you shall believe for your own good. If you disbelieve, then to GOD belongs everything in the heavens and the earth. GOD is Omniscient, Most Wise.
O people of the scripture, do not transgress the limits of your religion, and do not say about GOD except the truth. The Messiah, Jesus, the son of Mary, was a messenger of GOD, and His word that He had sent to Mary, and a revelation from Him. Therefore, you shall believe in GOD and His messengers. You shall not say, "Trinity." You shall refrain from this for your own good. GOD is only one god. Be He glorified; He is much too glorious to have a son. To Him belongs everything in the heavens and everything on earth. GOD suffices as Lord and Master.
The Messiah would never disdain from being a servant of GOD, nor would the closest angels. Those who disdain from worshiping Him, and are too arrogant to submit, He will summon them all before Him.
As for those who believe and lead a righteous life, He will fully recompense them, and shower them with His grace. As for those who disdain and turn arrogant, He will commit them to painful retribution. They will find no lord beside GOD, nor a savior.
O people, a proof has come to you from your Lord; we have sent down to you a profound beacon.
Those who believe in GOD, and hold fast to Him, He will admit them into mercy from Him, and grace, and will guide them to Him in a straight path.
They consult you; say, "GOD advises you concerning the single person. If one dies and leaves no children, and he had a sister, she gets half the inheritance. If she dies first, he inherits from her, if she left no children. If there were two sisters, they get two-thirds of the inheritance. If the siblings are men and women, the male gets twice the share of the female." GOD thus clarifies for you, lest you go astray. GOD is fully aware of all things.
O you who believe, you shall fulfill your covenants. Permitted for you to eat are the livestock, except those specifically prohibited herein. You shall not permit hunting throughout Hajj pilgrimage. GOD decrees whatever He wills.
O you who believe, do not violate the rites instituted by GOD, nor the Sacred Months, nor the animals to be offered, nor the garlands marking them, nor the people who head for the Sacred Shrine (Ka'bah) seeking blessings from their Lord and approval. Once you complete the pilgrimage, you may hunt. Do not be provoked into aggression by your hatred of people who once prevented you from going to the Sacred Masjid. You shall cooperate in matters of righteousness and piety; do not cooperate in matters that are sinful and evil. You shall observe GOD. GOD is strict in enforcing retribution.
Prohibited for you are animals that die of themselves, blood, the meat of pigs, and animals dedicated to other than GOD. (Animals that die of themselves include those) strangled, struck with an object, fallen from a height, gored, attacked by a wild animal-unless you save your animal before it dies-and animals sacrificed on altars. Also prohibited is dividing the meat through a game of chance; this is an abomination. Today, the disbelievers have given up concerning (the eradication of) your religion; do not fear them and fear Me instead. Today, I have completed your religion, perfected My blessing upon you, and I have decreed Submission as the religion for you. If one is forced by famine (to eat prohibited food), without being deliberately sinful, then GOD is Forgiver, Merciful.
They consult you concerning what is lawful for them; say, "Lawful for you are all good things, including what trained dogs and falcons catch for you." You train them according to GOD's teachings. You may eat what they catch for you, and mention GOD's name thereupon. You shall observe GOD. GOD is most efficient in reckoning.
Today, all good food is made lawful for you. The food of the people of the scripture is lawful for you. Also, you may marry the chaste women among the believers, as well as the chaste women among the followers of previous scripture, provided you pay them their due dowries. You shall maintain chastity, not committing adultery, nor taking secret lovers. Anyone who rejects faith, all his work will be in vain, and in the Hereafter he will be with the losers.
O you who believe, when you observe the Contact Prayers (Salat), you shall: (1) wash your faces, (2) wash your arms to the elbows, (3) wipe your heads, and (4) wash your feet to the ankles. If you were unclean due to sexual orgasm, you shall bathe. If you are ill, or traveling, or had any digestive excretion (urinary, fecal, or gas), or had (sexual) contact with the women, and you cannot find water, you shall observe the dry ablution (Tayammum) by touching clean dry soil, then rubbing your faces and hands. GOD does not wish to make the religion difficult for you; He wishes to cleanse you and to perfect His blessing upon you, that you may be appreciative.
Remember GOD's blessing upon you, and His covenant that He covenanted with you: you said, "We hear and we obey." You shall observe GOD; GOD is fully aware of the innermost thoughts.
O you who believe, you shall be absolutely equitable, and observe GOD, when you serve as witnesses. Do not be provoked by your conflicts with some people into committing injustice. You shall be absolutely equitable, for it is more righteous. You shall observe GOD. GOD is fully Cognizant of everything you do.
GOD promises those who believe and lead a righteous life forgiveness and a great recompense.
As for those who disbelieve and reject our revelations, they are the dwellers of Hell.
O you who believe, remember GOD's blessings upon you; when some people extended their hands to aggress against you, He protected you and withheld their hands. You shall observe GOD; in GOD the believers shall trust.
GOD had taken a covenant from the Children of Israel, and we raised among them twelve patriarchs. And GOD said, "I am with you, so long as you observe the Contact Prayers (Salat), give the obligatory charity (Zakat), and believe in My messengers and respect them, and continue to lend GOD a loan of righteousness. I will then remit your sins, and admit you into gardens with flowing streams. Anyone who disbelieves after this, has indeed strayed off the right path."
It was a consequence of their violating the covenant that we condemned them, and we caused their hearts to become hardened. Consequently, they took the words out of context, and disregarded some of the commandments given to them. You will continue to witness betrayal from them, excepting a few of them. You shall pardon them, and disregard them. GOD loves those who are benevolent.
Also from those who said, "We are Christian," we took their covenant. But they disregarded some of the commandments given to them. Consequently, we condemned them to animosity and hatred among themselves, until the Day of Resurrection. GOD will then inform them of everything they had done.
O people of the scripture, our messenger has come to you to proclaim for you many things you have concealed in the scripture, and to pardon many other transgressions you have committed. A beacon has come to you from GOD, and a profound scripture.
With it, GOD guides those who seek His approval. He guides them to the paths of peace, leads them out of darkness into the light by His leave, and guides them in a straight path.
Pagans indeed are those who say that GOD is the Messiah, the son of Mary. Say, "Who could oppose GOD if He willed to annihilate the Messiah, son of Mary, and his mother, and everyone on earth?" To GOD belongs the sovereignty of the heavens and the earth, and everything between them. He creates whatever He wills. GOD is Omnipotent.
The Jews and the Christians said, "We are GOD's children and His beloved." Say, "Why then does He punish you for your sins? You are just humans like the other humans He created. " He forgives whomever He wills and punishes whomever He wills. To GOD belongs the sovereignty of the heavens and the earth, and everything between them, and to Him is the final destiny.
O people of the scripture, our messenger has come to you, to explain things to you, after a period of time without messengers, lest you say, "We did not receive any preacher or warner." A preacher and warner has now come to you. GOD is Omnipotent.
Recall that Moses said to his people, "O my people, remember GOD's blessings upon you: He appointed prophets from among you, made you kings, and granted you what He never granted any other people.
"O my people, enter the holy land that GOD has decreed for you, and do not rebel, lest you become losers."
They said, "O Moses, there are powerful people in it, and we will not enter it, unless they get out of it. If they get out, we are entering."
Two men who were reverent and blessed by GOD said, "Just enter the gate. If you just enter it, you will surely prevail. You must trust in GOD, if you are believers."
They said, "O Moses, we will never enter it, so long as they are in it. Therefore, go-you and your Lord-and fight. We are sitting right here."
He said, "My Lord, I can only control myself and my brother. So, allow us to part company with the wicked people."
He said, "Henceforth, it is forbidden them for forty years, during which they will roam the earth aimlessly. Do not grieve over such wicked people."
Recite for them the true history of Adam's two sons. They made an offering, and it was accepted from one of them, but not from the other. He said, "I will surely kill you." He said, "GOD accepts only from the righteous.
"If you extend your hand to kill me, I am not extending my hand to kill you. For I reverence GOD, Lord of the universe.
"I want you, not me, to bear my sin and your sin, then you end up with the dwellers of Hell. Such is the requital for the transgressors."
His ego provoked him into killing his brother. He killed him, and ended up with the losers.
GOD then sent a raven to scratch the soil, to teach him how to bury his brother's corpse. He said, "Woe to me; I failed to be as intelligent as this raven, and bury my brother's corpse." He became ridden with remorse.
Because of this, we decreed for the Children of Israel that anyone who murders any person who had not committed murder or horrendous crimes, it shall be as if he murdered all the people. And anyone who spares a life, it shall be as if he spared the lives of all the people. Our messengers went to them with clear proofs and revelations, but most of them, after all this, are still transgressing.
The just retribution for those who fight GOD and His messenger, and commit horrendous crimes, is to be killed, or crucified, or to have their hands and feet cut off on alternate sides, or to be banished from the land. This is to humiliate them in this life, then they suffer a far worse retribution in the Hereafter.
Exempted are those who repent before you overcome them. You should know that GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
O you who believe, you shall reverence GOD and seek the ways and means to Him, and strive in His cause, that you may succeed.
Certainly, those who disbelieved, if they possessed everything on earth, even twice as much, and offered it as ransom to spare them the retribution on the Day of Resurrection, it would not be accepted from them; they have incurred a painful retribution.
They will want to exit Hell, but alas, they can never exit therefrom; their retribution is eternal.
The thief, male or female, you shall mark their hands as a punishment for their crime, and to serve as an example from GOD. GOD is Almighty, Most Wise.
If one repents after committing this crime, and reforms, GOD redeems him. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
Do you not know that GOD possesses the sovereignty of the heavens and the earth? He punishes whomever He wills, and forgives whomever He wills. GOD is Omnipotent.
O you messenger, do not be saddened by those who hasten to disbelieve among those who say, "We believe," with their mouths, while their hearts do not believe. Among the Jews, some listened to lies. They listened to people who never met you, and who distorted the words out of context, then said, "If you are given this, accept it, but if you are given anything different, beware." Whomever GOD wills to divert, you can do nothing to help him against GOD. GOD does not wish to cleanse their hearts. They have incurred humiliation in this world, and in the Hereafter, they will suffer a terrible retribution.
They are upholders of lies, and eaters of illicit earnings. If they come to you to judge among them, you may judge among them, or you may disregard them. If you choose to disregard them, they cannot harm you in the least. But if you judge among them, you shall judge equitably. GOD loves those who are equitable.
Why do they ask you to judge among them, when they have the Torah, containing GOD's law, and they chose to disregard it? They are not believers.
We have sent down the Torah, containing guidance and light. Ruling in accordance with it were the Jewish prophets, as well as the rabbis and the priests, as dictated to them in GOD's scripture, and as witnessed by them. Therefore, do not reverence human beings; you shall reverence Me instead. And do not trade away My revelations for a cheap price. Those who do not rule in accordance with GOD's revelations are the disbelievers.
And we decreed for them in it that: the life for the life, the eye for the eye, the nose for the nose, the ear for the ear, the tooth for the tooth, and an equivalent injury for any injury. If one forfeits what is due to him as a charity, it will atone for his sins. Those who do not rule in accordance with GOD's revelations are the unjust.
Subsequent to them, we sent Jesus, the son of Mary, confirming the previous scripture, the Torah. We gave him the Gospel, containing guidance and light, and confirming the previous scriptures, the Torah, and augmenting its guidance and light, and to enlighten the righteous.
The people of the Gospel shall rule in accordance with GOD's revelations therein. Those who do not rule in accordance with GOD's revelations are the wicked.
Then we revealed to you this scripture, truthfully, confirming previous scriptures, and superseding them. You shall rule among them in accordance with GOD's revelations, and do not follow their wishes if they differ from the truth that came to you. For each of you, we have decreed laws and different rites. Had GOD willed, He could have made you one congregation. But He thus puts you to the test through the revelations He has given each of you. You shall compete in righteousness. To GOD is your final destiny-all of you-then He will inform you of everything you had disputed.
You shall rule among them in accordance with GOD's revelations to you. Do not follow their wishes, and beware lest they divert you from some of GOD's revelations to you. If they turn away, then know that GOD wills to punish them for some of their sins. Indeed, many people are wicked.
Is it the law of the days of ignorance that they seek to uphold? Whose law is better than GOD's for those who have attained certainty?
O you who believe, do not take certain Jews and Christians as allies; these are allies of one another. Those among you who ally themselves with these belong with them. GOD does not guide the transgressors.
You will see those who harbor doubt in their hearts hasten to join them, saying, "We fear lest we may be defeated." May GOD bring victory, or a command from Him, that causes them to regret their secret thoughts.
The believers will then say, "Are these the same people who swore by GOD solemnly that they were with you?" Their works have been nullified; they are the losers.
O you who believe, if you revert from your religion, then GOD will substitute in your place people whom He loves and who love Him. They will be kind with the believers, stern with the disbelievers, and will strive in the cause of GOD without fear of any blame. Such is GOD's blessing; He bestows it upon whomever He wills. GOD is Bounteous, Omniscient.
Your real allies are GOD and His messenger, and the believers who observe the Contact Prayers (Salat), and give the obligatory charity (Zakat), and they bow down.
Those who ally themselves with GOD and His messenger, and those who believed, belong in the party of GOD; absolutely, they are the victors.
O you who believe, do not befriend those among the recipients of previous scripture who mock and ridicule your religion, nor shall you befriend the disbelievers. You shall reverence GOD, if you are really believers.
When you call to the Contact Prayers (Salat), they mock and ridicule it. This is because they are people who do not understand.
Say, "O people of the scripture, do you not hate us because we believe in GOD, and in what was revealed to us, and in what was revealed before us, and because most of you are not righteous?"
Say, "Let me tell you who are worse in the sight of GOD: those who are condemned by GOD after incurring His wrath until He made them (as despicable as) monkeys and pigs, and the idol worshipers. These are far worse, and farther from the right path."
When they come to you, they say, "We believe," even though they were full of disbelief when they entered, and they are full of disbelief when they leave. GOD is fully aware of everything they conceal.
You see many of them readily committing evil and transgression, and eating from illicit earnings. Miserable indeed is what they do.
If only the rabbis and the priests enjoin them from their sinful utterances and illicit earnings! Miserable indeed is what they commit.
The Jews even said, "GOD's hand is tied down!" It is their hands that are tied down. They are condemned for uttering such a blasphemy. Instead, His hands are wide open, spending as He wills. For certain, your Lord's revelations to you will cause many of them to plunge deeper into transgression and disbelief. Consequently, we have committed them to animosity and hatred among themselves until the Day of Resurrection. Whenever they ignite the flames of war, GOD puts them out. They roam the earth wickedly, and GOD dislikes the evildoers.
If only the people of the scripture believe and lead a righteous life, we will then remit their sins, and admit them into gardens of bliss.
If only they would uphold the Torah and the Gospel, and what is sent down to them herein from their Lord, they would be showered with blessings from above them and from beneath their feet. Some of them are righteous, but many of them are evildoers.
O you messenger, deliver what is revealed to you from your Lord- until you do, you have not delivered His message-and GOD will protect you from the people. GOD does not guide the disbelieving people.
Say, "O people of the scripture, you have no basis until you uphold the Torah, and the Gospel, and what is sent down to you herein from your Lord." For sure, these revelations from your Lord will cause many of them to plunge deeper into transgression and disbelief. Therefore, do not feel sorry for the disbelieving people.
Surely, those who believe, those who are Jewish, the converts, and the Christians; any of them who (1) believe in GOD and (2) believe in the Last Day, and (3) lead a righteous life, have nothing to fear, nor will they grieve.
We have taken a covenant from the Children of Israel, and we sent to them messengers. Whenever a messenger went to them with anything they disliked, some of them they rejected, and some they killed.
They thought that they would not be tested, so they turned blind and deaf, then GOD redeemed them, but then many of them turned blind and deaf again. GOD is Seer of everything they do.
Pagans indeed are those who say that GOD is the Messiah, son of Mary. The Messiah himself said, "O Children of Israel, you shall worship GOD; my Lord and your Lord." Anyone who sets up any idol beside GOD, GOD has forbidden Paradise for him, and his destiny is Hell. The wicked have no helpers.
Pagans indeed are those who say that GOD is a third of a trinity. There is no god except the one god. Unless they refrain from saying this, those who disbelieve among them will incur a painful retribution.
Would they not repent to GOD, and ask His forgiveness? GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
The Messiah, son of Mary, is no more than a messenger like the messengers before him, and his mother was a saint. Both of them used to eat the food. Note how we explain the revelations for them, and note how they still deviate!
Say, "Would you worship beside GOD powerless idols who can neither harm you, nor benefit you? GOD is Hearer, Omniscient."
Say, "O people of the scripture, do not transgress the limits of your religion beyond the truth, and do not follow the opinions of people who have gone astray, and have misled multitudes of people; they are far astray from the right path."
Condemned are those who disbelieved among the Children of Israel, by the tongue of David and Jesus, the son of Mary. This is because they disobeyed and transgressed.
They did not enjoin one another from committing evil. Miserable indeed is what they did.
You would see many of them allying themselves with those who disbelieve. Miserable indeed is what their hands have sent forth on behalf of their souls. GOD is angry with them and, consequently, they will abide forever in retribution.
Had they believed in GOD, and the prophet, and in what was revealed to him herein, they would not have befriended them. But many of them are evil.
You will find that the worst enemies of the believers are the Jews and the idol worshipers. And you will find that the closest people in friendship to the believers are those who say, "We are Christian." This is because they have priests and monks among them, and they are not arrogant.
When they hear what was revealed to the messenger, you see their eyes flooding with tears as they recognize the truth therein, and they say, "Our Lord, we have believed, so count us among the witnesses.
"Why should we not believe in GOD, and in the truth that has come to us, and hope that our Lord may admit us with the righteous people?"
GOD has rewarded them for saying this; He will admit them into gardens with flowing streams. They abide therein forever. Such is the reward for the righteous.
As for those who disbelieve and reject our revelations, they are the dwellers of Hell.
O you who believe, do not prohibit good things that are made lawful by GOD, and do not aggress; GOD dislikes the aggressors.
And eat from the good and lawful things that GOD has provided for you. You shall reverence GOD, in whom you are believers.
GOD does not hold you responsible for the mere utterance of oaths; He holds you responsible for your actual intentions. If you violate an oath, you shall atone by feeding ten poor people from the same food you offer to your own family, or clothing them, or by freeing a slave. If you cannot afford this, then you shall fast three days. This is the atonement for violating the oaths that you swore to keep. You shall fulfill your oaths. GOD thus explains His revelations to you, that you may be appreciative.
O you who believe, intoxicants, and gambling, and the altars of idols, and the games of chance are abominations of the devil; you shall avoid them, that you may succeed.
The devil wants to provoke animosity and hatred among you through intoxicants and gambling, and to distract you from remembering GOD, and from observing the Contact Prayers (Salat). Will you then refrain?
You shall obey GOD, and you shall obey the messenger, and beware. If you turn away, then know that the sole duty of our messenger is to deliver the message efficiently.
Those who believe and lead a righteous life bear no guilt by eating any food, so long as they observe the commandments, believe and lead a righteous life, then maintain their piety and faith, and continue to observe piety and righteousness. GOD loves the righteous.
O you who believe, GOD will test you with some game within reach of your hands and your arrows (during pilgrimage). GOD thus distinguishes those among you who observe Him in their privacy. Those who transgress after this have incurred a painful retribution.
O you who believe, do not kill any game during pilgrimage. Anyone who kills any game on purpose, his fine shall be a number of livestock animals that is equivalent to the game animals he killed. The judgment shall be set by two equitable people among you. They shall make sure that the offerings reach the Ka'bah. Otherwise, he may expiate by feeding poor people, or by an equivalent fast to atone for his offense. GOD has pardoned past offenses. But if anyone returns to such an offense, GOD will avenge it. GOD is Almighty, Avenger.
All fish of the sea are made lawful for you to eat. During pilgrimage, this may provide for you during your journey. You shall not hunt throughout the pilgrimage. You shall reverence GOD, before whom you will be summoned.
GOD has appointed the Ka'bah, the Sacred Masjid, to be a sanctuary for the people, and also the Sacred Months, the offerings (to the Sacred Masjid), and the garlands marking them. You should know that GOD knows everything in the heavens and the earth, and that GOD is Omniscient.
Know that GOD is strict in enforcing retribution, and that GOD is Forgiving, Most Merciful.
The sole duty of the messenger is to deliver the message, and GOD knows everything you declare and everything you conceal.
Proclaim: "The bad and the good are not the same, even if the abundance of the bad may impress you. You shall reverence GOD, (even if you are in the minority) O you who possess intelligence, that you may succeed."
O you who believe, do not ask about matters which, if revealed to you prematurely, would hurt you. If you ask about them in light of the Quran, they will become obvious to you. GOD has deliberately overlooked them. GOD is Forgiver, Clement.
Others before you have asked the same questions, then became disbelievers therein.
GOD did not prohibit livestock that begets certain combinations of males and females, nor livestock liberated by an oath, nor the one that begets two males in a row, nor the bull that fathers ten. It is the disbelievers who invented such lies about GOD. Most of them do not understand.
When they are told, "Come to what GOD has revealed, and to the messenger," they say, "What we found our parents doing is sufficient for us." What if their parents knew nothing, and were not guided?
O you who believe, you should worry only about your own necks. If the others go astray, they cannot hurt you, as long as you are guided. To GOD is your ultimate destiny, all of you, then He will inform you of everything you had done.
O you who believe, witnessing a will when one of you is dying shall be done by two equitable people among you. If you are traveling, then two others may do the witnessing. After observing the Contact Prayer (Salat), let the witnesses swear by GOD, to alleviate your doubts: "We will not use this to attain personal gains, even if the testator is related to us. Nor will we conceal GOD's testimony. Otherwise, we would be sinners."
If the witnesses are found to be guilty of bias, then two others shall be asked to take their places. Choose two persons who were victimized by the first witnesses, and let them swear by GOD: "Our testimony is more truthful than theirs; we will not be biased. Otherwise, we will be transgressors."
This is more apt to encourage an honest testimony on their part, fearing that their oath may be disregarded like that of the previous witnesses. You shall observe GOD and listen. GOD does not guide the wicked.
The day will come when GOD will summon the messengers and ask them, "How was the response to you?" They will say, "We have no knowledge. You are the Knower of all secrets."
GOD will say, "O Jesus, son of Mary, remember My blessings upon you and your mother. I supported you with the Holy Spirit, to enable you to speak to the people from the crib, as well as an adult. I taught you the scripture, wisdom, the Torah, and the Gospel. Recall that you created from clay the shape of a bird by My leave, then blew into it, and it became a live bird by My leave. You healed the blind and the leprous by My leave, and revived the dead by My leave. Recall that I protected you from the Children of Israel who wanted to hurt you, despite the profound miracles you had shown them. The disbelievers among them said, 'This is obviously magic.'
"Recall that I inspired the disciples: 'You shall believe in Me and My messenger.' They said, 'We have believed, and bear witness that we are submitters.' "
Recall that the disciples said, "O Jesus, son of Mary, can your Lord send down to us a feast from the sky?" He said, "You should reverence GOD, if you are believers."
They said, "We wish to eat from it, and to reassure our hearts, and to know for sure that you have told us the truth. We will serve as witnesses thereof."
Said Jesus, the son of Mary, "Our god, our Lord, send down to us a feast from the sky. Let it bring plenty for each and every one of us, and a sign from You. Provide for us; You are the best Provider."
GOD said, "I am sending it down. Anyone among you who disbelieves after this, I will punish him as I never punished anyone else."
GOD will say, "O Jesus, son of Mary, did you say to the people, 'Make me and my mother idols beside GOD?' " He will say, "Be You glorified. I could not utter what was not right. Had I said it, You already would have known it. You know my thoughts, and I do not know Your thoughts. You know all the secrets.
"I told them only what You commanded me to say, that: 'You shall worship GOD, my Lord and your Lord.' I was a witness among them for as long as I lived with them. When You terminated my life on earth, You became the Watcher over them. You witness all things.
"If You punish them, they are Your constituents. If You forgive them, You are the Almighty, Most Wise."
GOD will proclaim, "This is a day when the truthful will be saved by their truthfulness." They have deserved gardens with flowing streams. They abide therein forever. GOD is pleased with them, and they are pleased with Him. This is the greatest triumph.
To GOD belongs the sovereignty of the heavens and the earth, and everything in them, and He is Omnipotent.
Praise be to GOD, who created the heavens and the earth, and made the darkness and the light. Yet, those who disbelieve in their Lord continue to deviate.
He is the One who created you from mud, then predetermined your life span, a life span that is known only to Him. Yet, you continue to doubt.
He is the one GOD in the heavens and the earth. He knows your secrets and your declarations, and He knows everything you earn.
No matter what kind of proof comes to them from their Lord, they turn away from it, in aversion.
Since they rejected the truth when it came to them, they have incurred the consequences of their heedlessness.
Have they not seen how many generations before them we have annihilated? We established them on earth more than we did for you, and we showered them with blessings, generously, and we provided them with flowing streams. We then annihilated them because of their sins, and we substituted another generation in their place.
Even if we sent down to them a physical book, written on paper, and they touched it with their hands, those who disbelieved would have said, "This is no more than clever magic."
They also said, "If only an angel could come down with him!" Had we sent an angel, the whole matter would have been terminated, and they would no longer be respited.
Had we sent an angel, we would have sent him in the form of a man, and we would have kept them just as confused as they are confused now.
Messengers before you have been ridiculed. It is those who mocked them who suffered the consequences of their ridiculing.
Say, "Roam the earth and note the consequences for the rejectors."
Say, "To whom belongs everything in the heavens and the earth?" Say, "To GOD." He has decreed that mercy is His attribute. He will surely summon you all on the Day of Resurrection, which is inevitable. The ones who lose their souls are those who disbelieve.
To Him belongs everything that dwells in the night and the day. He is the Hearer, the Knower.
Say, "Shall I accept other than GOD as a Lord and Master, when He is the Initiator of the heavens and the earth, and He feeds but is not fed?" Say, "I am commanded to be the most devoted submitter, and, 'Do not be an idol worshiper.' "
Say, "I fear, if I disobeyed my Lord, the retribution of an awesome day.
"Whoever is spared (the retribution), on that day, has attained His mercy. And this is the greatest triumph."
If GOD touches you with adversity, none can relieve it except He. And if He touches you with a blessing, He is Omnipotent.
He is Supreme over His creatures. He is the Most Wise, the Cognizant.
Say, "Whose testimony is the greatest?" Say, "GOD's. He is the witness between me and you that this Quran has been inspired to me, to preach it to you and whomever it reaches. Indeed, you bear witness that there are other gods beside GOD." Say, "I do not testify as you do; there is only one god, and I disown your idolatry."
Those to whom we have given the scripture recognize this as they recognize their own children. The ones who lose their souls are those who do not believe.
Who is more evil than one who lies about GOD, or rejects His revelations? The transgressors never succeed.
On the day when we summon them all, we will ask the idol worshipers, "Where are the idols you set up?"
Their disastrous response will be, "By GOD our Lord, we never were idol worshipers."
Note how they lied to themselves, and how the idols they had invented have abandoned them.
Some of them listen to you, but we place veils on their hearts to prevent them from understanding, and deafness in their ears. Thus, no matter what kind of proof they see, they cannot believe. Thus, when they come to argue with you, the disbelievers say, "These are tales from the past."
They repel others from this (Quran), as they themselves stay away from it, and thus, they only destroy themselves without perceiving.
If only you could see them when they face the hellfire! They would say then, "Woe to us. Oh, we wish we could go back, and never reject our Lord's revelations, and join the believers."
As a matter of fact, (they only say this because) their secrets have been exposed.If they go back, they will commit exactly the same crimes. They are liars.
They say (subconsciously), "We live only this life; we will not be resurrected."
If you could only see them when they stand before their Lord! He would say, "Is this not the truth?" They would say, "Yes, by our Lord." He would say, "You have incurred the retribution by your disbelief."
Losers indeed are those who disbelieve in meeting GOD, until the Hour comes to them suddenly, then say, "We deeply regret wasting our lives in this world." They will carry loads of their sins on their backs; what a miserable load!
The life of this world is no more than illusion and vanity, while the abode of the Hereafter is far better for the righteous. Do you not understand?!
We know that you may be saddened by what they say. You should know that it is not you that they reject; it is GOD's revelations that the wicked disregard.
Messengers before you have been rejected, and they steadfastly persevered in the face of rejection. They were persecuted until our victory came to them. Such is GOD's system that will never change. The history of My messengers thus sets the precedents for you.
If their rejection gets to be too much for you, you should know that even if you dug a tunnel through the earth, or climbed a ladder into the sky, and produced a miracle for them (they still would not believe). Had GOD willed, He could have guided them, unanimously. Therefore, do not behave like the ignorant ones.
The only ones to respond are those who listen. GOD resurrects the dead; they ultimately return to Him.
They said, "If only a certain sign could come down to him from his Lord!" Say, "GOD is able to send down a sign, but most of them do not know."
All the creatures on earth, and all the birds that fly with wings, are communities like you. We did not leave anything out of this book. To their Lord, all these creatures will be summoned.
Those who reject our proofs are deaf and dumb, in total darkness. Whomever GOD wills, He sends astray, and whomever He wills, He leads in a straight path.
Say, "What if GOD's retribution came to you, or the Hour came to you: would you implore other than GOD, if you are truthful?"
The fact is: only Him you implore, and He answers your prayer, if He so wills, and you forget your idols.
We have sent (messengers) to communities before you, and we put them to the test through adversity and hardship, that they may implore.
If only they implored when our test afflicted them! Instead, their hearts were hardened, and the devil adorned their works in their eyes.
When they thus disregard the message given to them, we open for them the gates of everything. Then, just as they rejoice in what was given to them, we punish them suddenly; they become utterly stunned.
The wicked are thus annihilated. Praise be to GOD, Lord of the universe.
Say, "What if GOD took away your hearing and your eyesight, and sealed your minds; which god, other than GOD, can restore these for you?" Note how we explain the revelations, and note how they still deviate!
Say, "What if GOD's retribution came to you suddenly, or after an announcement, is it not the wicked who incur annihilation?"
We do not send the messengers except as deliverers of good news, as well as warners. Those who believe and reform have nothing to fear, nor will they grieve.
As for those who reject our revelations, they incur the retribution for their wickedness.
Say, "I do not say to you that I possess the treasures of GOD. Nor do I know the future. Nor do I say to you that I am an angel. I simply follow what is revealed to me." Say, "Is the blind the same as the seer? Do you not reflect?"
And preach with this (Quran) to those who reverence the summoning before their Lord- they have none beside Him as a Lord and Master, nor an intercessor-that they may attain salvation.
And do not dismiss those who implore their Lord day and night, devoting themselves to Him alone. You are not responsible for their reckoning, nor are they responsible for your reckoning. If you dismiss them, you will be a transgressor.
We thus test the people by each other, to let them say (mockingly), "Are these the people among us who are blessed by GOD?" Is GOD not aware of the appreciative ones?
When those who believe in our revelations come to you, you shall say, "Salamun 'Alaykum (Peace be upon you). Your Lord has decreed that mercy is His attribute. Thus, anyone among you who commits a transgression out of ignorance, and repents thereafter and reforms, then He is Forgiving, Most Merciful."
We thus explain the revelations, and point out the ways of the wicked.
Say, "I am forbidden from worshiping what you worship besides GOD." Say, "I will not follow your opinions. Otherwise, I will go astray, and not be guided."
Say, "I have solid proof from my Lord, and you have rejected it. I do not control the retribution you challenge me to bring. Judgment belongs with GOD alone. He narrates the truth, and He is the best judge."
Say, "If I controlled the retribution you challenge me to bring, the whole matter would have been terminated long ago. GOD knows best who the wicked are."
With Him are the keys to all secrets; none knows them except He. He knows everything on land and in the sea. Not a leaf falls without His knowledge. Nor is there a grain in the depths of the soil. Nor is there anything wet or dry, that is not recorded in a profound record.
He is the One who puts you to death during the night, and knows even the smallest of your actions during the day. He resurrects you every morning, until your life span is fulfilled, then to Him is your ultimate return. He will then inform you of everything you had done.
He is Supreme over His creatures, and He appoints guards to protect you. When the appointed time of death comes to any of you, our messengers put him to death without delay.
Then everyone is returned to GOD, their rightful Lord and Master. Absolutely, He is the ultimate judge; He is the most accurate reckoner.
Say, "Who can save you from the darkness of the land or the sea?" You implore Him loudly and secretly: "If He saves us this time, we will be eternally appreciative."
Say, "GOD does save you this time, and other times as well, then you still set up idols besides Him."
Say, "He is certainly able to pour upon you retribution from above you, or from beneath your feet. Or He can divide you into factions and have you taste each others' tyranny. Note how we explain the revelations, that they may understand."
Your people have rejected this, even though it is the truth. Say, "I am not a guardian over you."
Every prophecy herein will come to pass, and you will surely find out.
If you see those who mock our revelations, you shall avoid them until they delve into another subject. If the devil causes you to forget, then, as soon as you remember, do not sit with such evil people.
The righteous are not responsible for the utterances of those people, but it may help to remind them; perhaps they may be saved.
You shall disregard those who take their religion in vain, as if it is a social function, and are totally absorbed in this worldly life. Remind with this (Quran), lest a soul may suffer the consequences of its evil earnings. It has none beside GOD as a Lord and Master, nor an intercessor. If it could offer any kind of ransom, it would not be accepted. They suffer the consequences of the evil works they earn; they have incurred hellish drinks, and a painful retribution because of their disbelief.
Say, "Shall we implore, beside GOD, what possesses no power to benefit us or hurt us, and turn back on our heels after GOD has guided us? In that case, we would join those possessed by the devils, and rendered utterly confused, while their friends try to save them: 'Stay with us on the right path.' " Say, "GOD's guidance is the right guidance. We are commanded to submit to the Lord of the universe.
"And to observe the Contact Prayers (Salat), and to reverence Him-He is the One before whom you will be summoned (for the reckoning)."
He is the One who created the heavens and the earth, truthfully. Whenever He says, "Be," it is. His word is the absolute truth. All sovereignty belongs to Him the day the horn is blown. Knower of all secrets and declarations, He is the Most Wise, the Cognizant.
Recall that Abraham said to his father Azer, "How could you worship statues as gods? I see that you and your people have gone far astray."
We showed Abraham the marvels of the heavens and the earth, and blessed him with certainty:
When the night fell, he saw a shining planet. "Maybe this is my Lord," he said. When it disappeared, he said, "I do not like (gods) that disappear."
When he saw the moon rising, he said, "Maybe this is my Lord!" When it disappeared, he said, "Unless my Lord guides me, I will be with the strayers."
When he saw the sun rising, he said, "This must be my Lord. This is the biggest." But when it set, he said, "O my people, I denounce your idolatry.
"I have devoted myself absolutely to the One who initiated the heavens and the earth; I will never be an idol worshiper."
His people argued with him. He said, "Do you argue with me about GOD, after He has guided me? I have no fear of the idols you set up. Nothing can happen to me, unless my Lord wills it. My Lord's knowledge encompasses all things. Would you not take heed?
"Why should I fear your idols? It is you who should be afraid, since you worship instead of GOD idols that are utterly powerless to help you. Which side is more deserving of security, if you know?"
Those who believe, and do not pollute their belief with idol worship, have deserved the perfect security, and they are truly guided.
Such was our argument, with which we supported Abraham against his people. We exalt whomever we will to higher ranks. Your Lord is Most Wise, Omniscient.
And we granted him Isaac and Jacob, and we guided both of them. Similarly, we guided Noah before that, and from his descendants (we guided) David, Solomon, Job, Joseph, Moses, and Aaron. We thus reward the righteous.
Also, Zachariah, John, Jesus, and Elias; all were righteous.
And Ismail, Elisha, Jonah, and Lot; each of these we distinguished over all the people.
From among their ancestors, their descendants, and their siblings, we chose many, and we guided them in a straight path.
Such is GOD's guidance, with which He guides whomever He chooses from among His servants. Had any of them fallen into idolatry, their works would have been nullified.
Those were the ones to whom we have given the scripture, wisdom, and prophethood. If these people disbelieve, we will substitute others in their place, and the new people will not be disbelievers.
These are the ones guided by GOD; you shall be guided in their footsteps. Say, "I do not ask you for any wage. This is but a message for all the people."
They never valued GOD as He should be valued. Thus, they said, "GOD does not reveal anything to any human being." Say, "Who then revealed the scripture that Moses brought, with light and guidance for the people?" You put it down on paper to proclaim it, while concealing a lot of it. You were taught what you never knew-you and your parents. Say, "GOD (is the One who revealed it)," then leave them in their heedlessness, playing.
This too is a blessed scripture that we have revealed, confirming the previous scriptures, that you may warn the most important community and all those around it. Those who believe in the Hereafter will believe in this (scripture), and will observe the Contact Prayers (Salat).
Who is more evil than one who fabricates lies and attributes them to GOD, or says, "I have received divine inspiration," when no such inspiration was given to him, or says, "I can write the same as GOD's revelations?" If only you could see the transgressors at the time of death! The angels extend their hands to them, saying, "Let go of your souls. Today, you have incurred a shameful retribution for saying about GOD other than the truth, and for being too arrogant to accept His revelations.
"You have come back to us as individuals, just as we created you the first time, and you have left behind what we provided for you. We do not see with you the intercessors that you idolized and claimed that they will help you. All ties among you have been severed; the idols you set up have abandoned you."
GOD is the One who causes the grains and the seeds to crack and germinate. He produces the living from the dead, and the dead from the living. Such is GOD; how could you deviate!
At the crack of dawn, He causes the morning to emerge. He made the night still, and He rendered the sun and the moon to serve as calculation devices. Such is the design of the Almighty, the Omniscient.
And He is the One who made the stars to guide you during the darkness, on land and on sea. We thus clarify the revelations for people who know.
He initiated you from one person, and decided your path, as well as your final destiny. We thus clarify the revelations for people who understand.
He is the One who sends down from the sky water, whereby we produce all kinds of plants. We produce from the green material multitudes of complex grains, palm trees with hanging clusters, and gardens of grapes, olives and pomegranate; fruits that are similar, yet dissimilar. Note their fruits as they grow and ripen. These are signs for people who believe.
Yet, they set up beside GOD idols from among the jinns, though He is the One who created them. They even attribute to Him sons and daughters, without any knowledge. Be He glorified. He is the Most High, far above their claims.
The Initiator of the heavens and the earth. How can He have a son, when He never had a mate? He created all things, and He is fully aware of all things.
Such is GOD your Lord, there is no god except He, the Creator of all things. You shall worship Him alone. He is in control of all things.
No visions can encompass Him, but He encompasses all visions. He is the Compassionate, the Cognizant.
Enlightenments have come to you from your Lord. As for those who can see, they do so for their own good, and those who turn blind, do so to their own detriment. I am not your guardian.
We thus explain the revelations, to prove that you have received knowledge, and to clarify them for people who know.
Follow what is revealed to you from your Lord, there is no god except He, and disregard the idol worshipers.
Had GOD willed, they would not have worshiped idols. We did not appoint you as their guardian, nor are you their advocate.
Do not curse the idols they set up beside GOD, lest they blaspheme and curse GOD, out of ignorance. We have adorned the works of every group in their eyes. Ultimately, they return to their Lord, then He informs them of everything they had done.
They swore by GOD, solemnly, that if a miracle came to them, they would surely believe. Say, "Miracles come only from GOD." For all you know, if a miracle did come to them, they would continue to disbelieve.
We control their minds and their hearts. Thus, since their decision is to disbelieve, we leave them in their transgressions, blundering.
Even if we sent down the angels to them; even if the dead spoke to them; even if we summoned every miracle before them; they cannot believe unless GOD wills it. Indeed, most of them are ignorant.
We have permitted the enemies of every prophet- human and jinn devils- to inspire in each other fancy words, in order to deceive. Had your Lord willed, they would not have done it. You shall disregard them and their fabrications.
This is to let the minds of those who do not believe in the Hereafter listen to such fabrications, and accept them, and thus expose their real convictions.
Shall I seek other than GOD as a source of law, when He has revealed to you this book fully detailed? Those who received the scripture recognize that it has been revealed from your Lord, truthfully. You shall not harbor any doubt.
The word of your Lord is complete, in truth and justice. Nothing shall abrogate His words. He is the Hearer, the Omniscient.
If you obey the majority of people on earth, they will divert you from the path of GOD. They follow only conjecture; they only guess.
Your Lord is fully aware of those who stray off His path, and He is fully aware of those who are guided.
You shall eat from that upon which GOD's name has been pronounced, if you truly believe in His revelations.
Why should you not eat from that upon which GOD's name has been mentioned? He has detailed for you what is prohibited for you, unless you are forced. Indeed, many people mislead others with their personal opinions, without knowledge. Your Lord is fully aware of the transgressors.
You shall avoid obvious sins, as well as the hidden ones. Those who have earned sins will surely pay for their transgressions.
Do not eat from that upon which the name of GOD has not been mentioned, for it is an abomination. The devils inspire their allies to argue with you; if you obey them, you will be idol worshipers.
Is one who was dead and we granted him life, and provided him with light that enables him to move among the people, equal to one in total darkness from which he can never exit? The works of the disbelievers are thus adorned in their eyes.
We allow the leading criminals of every community to plot and scheme. But they only plot and scheme against their own souls, without perceiving.
When a powerful proof comes to them, they say, "We will not believe, unless we are given what is given to GOD's messengers!" GOD knows exactly who is best qualified to deliver His message. Such criminals will suffer debasement at GOD, and terrible retribution as a consequence of their evil scheming.
Whomever GOD wills to guide, He renders his chest wide open to Submission. And whomever He wills to send astray, He renders his chest intolerant and straitened, like one who climbs towards the sky. GOD thus places a curse upon those who refuse to believe.
This is the straight path to your Lord. We have explained the revelations for people who take heed.
They have deserved the abode of peace at their Lord; He is their Lord and Master, as a reward for their works.
The day will come when He summons all of them (and says): "O you jinns, you have claimed multitudes of humans." Their human companions will say, "Our Lord, we enjoyed each others' company until we wasted the life span You had set for us." He will say, "Hell is your destiny." They abide therein forever, in accordance with GOD's will. Your Lord is Wise, Omniscient.
We thus match the wicked to be companions of each other, as a punishment for their transgressions.
O you jinns and humans, did you not receive messengers from among you, who narrated to you My revelations, and warned you about the meeting of this day? They will say, "We bear witness against ourselves." They were totally preoccupied with the worldly life, and they will bear witness against themselves that they were disbelievers.
This is to show that your Lord never annihilates any community unjustly, while its people are unaware.
Everyone will attain a rank commensurate with their deeds. Your Lord is never unaware of anything they do.
Your Lord is the Rich One; possessor of all mercy. If He wills, He can remove you, and substitute whomever He wills in your place, just as He produced you from the progeny of other people.
What is promised to you will come to pass, and you can never evade it.
Say, "O my people, do your best, and so will I. You will surely find out who the ultimate victors are." Certainly, the wicked will never succeed.
They even set aside a share of GOD's provisions of crops and livestock, saying, "This share belongs to GOD," according to their claims, "and this share belongs to our idols." However, what was set aside for their idols never reached GOD, while the share they set aside for GOD invariably went to their idols. Miserable indeed is their judgment.
Thus were the idol worshipers duped by their idols, to the extent of killing their own children. In fact, their idols inflict great pain upon them, and confuse their religion for them. Had GOD willed, they would not have done it. You shall disregard them and their fabrications.
They said, "These are livestock and crops that are prohibited; no one shall eat them except whomever we permit," so they claimed. They also prohibited the riding of certain livestock. Even the livestock they ate, they never pronounced GOD's name as they sacrificed them. Such are innovations attributed to Him. He will surely requite them for their innovations.
They also said, "What is in the bellies of these livestock is reserved exclusively for the males among us, and prohibited for our wives." But if it was a still birth, they permitted their wives to share therein. He will certainly requite them for their innovations. He is Most Wise, Omniscient.
Losers indeed are those who killed their children foolishly, due to their lack of knowledge, and prohibited what GOD has provided for them, and followed innovations attributed to GOD. They have gone astray; they are not guided.
He is the One who established gardens, trellised and untrellised, and palm trees, and crops with different tastes, and olives, and pomegranate-fruits that are similar, yet dissimilar. Eat from their fruits, and give the due alms on the day of harvest, and do not waste anything. He does not love the wasters.
Some livestock supply you with transportation, as well as bedding materials. Eat from GOD's provisions to you, and do not follow the steps of Satan; he is your most ardent enemy.
Eight kinds of livestock: regarding the two kinds of sheep, and the two kinds of goats, say, "Is it the two males that He prohibited, or the two females, or the contents of the wombs of the two females? Tell me what you know, if you are truthful."
Regarding the two kinds of camels, and the two kinds of cattle, say, "Is it the two males that He prohibited, or the two females, or the contents of the wombs of the two females? Were you witnesses when GOD decreed such prohibitions for you? Who is more evil than those who invent such lies and attribute them to GOD? They thus mislead the people without knowledge. GOD does not guide such evil people."
Say, "I do not find in the revelations given to me any food that is prohibited for any eater except: (1) carrion, (2) running blood, (3) the meat of pigs, for it is contaminated, and (4) the meat of animals blasphemously dedicated to other than GOD." If one is forced (to eat these), without being deliberate or malicious, then your Lord is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
For those who are Jewish we prohibited animals with undivided hoofs; and of the cattle and sheep we prohibited the fat, except that which is carried on their backs, or in the viscera, or mixed with bones. That was a retribution for their transgressions, and we are truthful.
If they disbelieve you, then say, "Your Lord possesses infinite mercy, but His retribution is unavoidable for the guilty people."
The idol worshipers say, "Had GOD willed, we would not practice idolatry, nor would our parents, nor would we prohibit anything." Thus did those before them disbelieve, until they incurred our retribution. Say, "Do you have any proven knowledge that you can show us? You follow nothing but conjecture; you only guess."
Say, "GOD possesses the most powerful argument; if He wills He can guide all of you."
Say, "Bring your witnesses who would testify that GOD has prohibited this or that." If they testify, do not testify with them. Nor shall you follow the opinions of those who reject our revelations, and those who disbelieve in the Hereafter, and those who stray away from their Lord.
Say, "Come let me tell you what your Lord has really prohibited for you: You shall not set up idols besides Him. You shall honor your parents. You shall not kill your children from fear of poverty-we provide for you and for them. You shall not commit gross sins, obvious or hidden. You shall not kill- GOD has made life sacred- except in the course of justice. These are His commandments to you, that you may understand."
You shall not touch the orphans' money except in the most righteous manner, until they reach maturity. You shall give full weight and full measure when you trade, equitably. We do not burden any soul beyond its means. You shall be absolutely just when you bear witness, even against your relatives. You shall fulfill your covenant with GOD. These are His commandments to you, that you may take heed.
This is My path-a straight one. You shall follow it, and do not follow any other paths, lest they divert you from His path. These are His commandments to you, that you may be saved.
And we gave Moses the scripture, complete with the best commandments, and detailing everything, and a beacon and mercy, that they may believe in meeting their Lord.
This too is a blessed scripture that we have revealed; you shall follow it and lead a righteous life, that you may attain mercy.
Now you can no longer say, "The scripture was sent down to two groups before us, and we were unaware of their teachings."
Nor can you say, "If only a scripture could come down to us, we would be better guided than they." A proven scripture has now come to you from your Lord, and a beacon, and a mercy. Now, who is more evil than one who rejects these proofs from GOD, and disregards them? We will commit those who disregard our proofs to the worst retribution for their heedlessness.
Are they waiting for the angels to come to them, or your Lord, or some physical manifestations of your Lord? The day this happens, no soul will benefit from believing if it did not believe before that, and did not reap the benefits of belief by leading a righteous life. Say, "Keep on waiting; we too are waiting."
Those who divide themselves into sects do not belong with you. Their judgment rests with GOD, then He will inform them of everything they had done.
Whoever does a righteous work receives the reward for ten, and the one who commits a sin is requited for only one. No one suffers the slightest injustice.
Say, "My Lord has guided me in a straight path-the perfect religion of Abraham, monotheism. He never was an idol worshiper."
Say, "My Contact Prayers (Salat), my worship practices, my life and my death, are all devoted absolutely to GOD alone, the Lord of the universe.
"He has no partner. This is what I am commanded to believe, and I am the first to submit."
Say, "Shall I seek other than GOD as a lord, when He is the Lord of all things? No soul benefits except from its own works, and none bears the burden of another. Ultimately, you return to your Lord, then He informs you regarding all your disputes."
He is the One who made you inheritors of the earth, and He raised some of you above others in rank, in order to test you in accordance with what He has given you. Surely, your Lord is efficient in enforcing retribution, and He is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
A. L. M. S.
This scripture has been revealed to you-you shall not harbor doubt about it in your heart-that you may warn with it, and to provide a reminder for the believers.
You shall all follow what is revealed to you from your Lord; do not follow any idols besides Him. Rarely do you take heed.
Many a community we annihilated; they incurred our retribution while they were asleep, or wide awake.
Their utterance when our retribution came to them was: "Indeed, we have been transgressors."
We will certainly question those who received the message, and we will question the messengers.
We will inform them authoritatively, for we were never absent.
The scales will be set on that day, equitably. Those whose weights are heavy will be the winners.
As for those whose weights are light, they will be the ones who lost their souls as a consequence of disregarding our revelations, unjustly.
We have established you on earth, and we have provided for you the means of support therein. Rarely are you appreciative.
We created you, then we shaped you, then we said to the angels, "Fall prostrate before Adam." They fell prostrate, except Iblees (Satan); he was not with the prostrators.
He said, "What prevented you from prostrating when I ordered you?" He said, "I am better than he; You created me from fire, and created him from mud."
He said, "Therefore, you must go down, for you are not to be arrogant here Get out; you are debased."
He said, "Grant me a respite, until the Day of Resurrection."
He said, "You are granted a respite."
He said, "Since You have willed that I go astray, I will skulk for them on Your straight path.
"I will come to them from before them, and from behind them, and from their right, and from their left, and You will find that most of them are unappreciative."
He said, "Get out therefrom, despised and defeated. Those among them who follow you, I will fill Hell with you all.
"As for you, Adam, dwell with your wife in Paradise, and eat therefrom as you please, but do not approach this one tree, lest you fall in sin."
The devil whispered to them, in order to reveal their bodies, which were invisible to them. He said, "Your Lord did not forbid you from this tree, except to prevent you from becoming angels, and from attaining eternal existence."
He swore to them, "I am giving you good advice."
He thus duped them with lies. As soon as they tasted the tree, their bodies became visible to them, and they tried to cover themselves with the leaves of Paradise. Their Lord called upon them: "Did I not enjoin you from that tree, and warn you that the devil is your most ardent enemy?"
They said, "Our Lord, we have wronged our souls, and unless You forgive us and have mercy on us, we will be losers."
He said, "Go down as enemies of one another. On earth shall be your habitation and provision for awhile."
He said, "On it you will live, on it you will die, and from it you will be brought out."
O children of Adam, we have provided you with garments to cover your bodies, as well as for luxury. But the best garment is the garment of righteousness. These are some of GOD's signs, that they may take heed.
O children of Adam, do not let the devil dupe you as he did when he caused the eviction of your parents from Paradise, and the removal of their garments to expose their bodies. He and his tribe see you, while you do not see them. We appoint the devils as companions of those who do not believe.
They commit a gross sin, then say, "We found our parents doing this, and GOD has commanded us to do it." Say, "GOD never advocates sin. Are you saying about GOD what you do not know?"
Say, "My Lord advocates justice, and to stand devoted to Him alone at every place of worship. You shall devote your worship absolutely to Him alone. Just as He initiated you, you will ultimately go back to Him."
Some He guided, while others are committed to straying. They have taken the devils as their masters, instead of GOD, yet they believe that they are guided.
O children of Adam, you shall be clean and dress nicely when you go to the masjid. And eat and drink moderately; Surely, He does not love the gluttons.
Say, "Who prohibited the nice things GOD has created for His creatures, and the good provisions?" Say, "Such provisions are to be enjoyed in this life by those who believe. Moreover, the good provisions will be exclusively theirs on the Day of Resurrection. "We thus explain the revelations for people who know.
Say, "My Lord prohibits only evil deeds, be they obvious or hidden, and sins, and unjustifiable aggression, and to set up beside GOD powerless idols, and to say about GOD what you do not know."
For each community, there is a predetermined life span. Once their interim comes to an end, they cannot delay it by one hour, nor advance it.
O children of Adam, when messengers come to you from among you, and recite My revelations to you, those who take heed and lead a righteous life, will have nothing to fear, nor will they grieve.
As for those who reject our revelations, and are too arrogant to uphold them, they have incurred Hell, wherein they abide forever.
Who is more evil than those who invent lies about GOD, or reject His revelations? These will get their share, in accordance with the scripture, then, when our messengers come to terminate their lives, they will say, "Where are the idols you used to implore beside GOD?" They will say, "They have abandoned us." They will bear witness against themselves that they were disbelievers.
He will say, "Enter with the previous communities of jinns and humans into Hell." Every time a group enters, they will curse their ancestral group. Once they are all in it, the latest one will say of the previous one, "Our Lord, these are the ones who misled us. Give them double the retribution of Hell." He will say, "Each receives double, but you do not know."
The ancestral group will say to the later group, "Since you had an advantage over us, taste the retribution for your own sins."
Surely, those who reject our revelations and are too arrogant to uphold them, the gates of the sky will never open for them, nor will they enter Paradise until the camel passes through the needle's eye. We thus requite the guilty.
They have incurred Hell as an abode; they will have barriers above them. We thus requite the transgressors.
As for those who believe and lead a righteous life-we never burden any soul beyond its means-these will be the dwellers of Paradise. They abide in it forever.
We will remove all jealousy from their hearts. Rivers will flow beneath them, and they will say, "GOD be praised for guiding us. We could not possibly be guided, if it were not that GOD has guided us. The messengers of our Lord did bring the truth." They will be called: "This is your Paradise. You have inherited it, in return for your works."
The dwellers of Paradise will call the dwellers of Hell: "We have found our Lord's promise to be the truth; have you found your Lord's promise to be the truth?" They will say, "Yes." An announcer between them will announce: "GOD's condemnation has befallen the transgressors;
"who repel from the path of GOD, and strive to make it crooked, and, with regard to the Hereafter, they are disbelievers."
A barrier separates them, while the Purgatory is occupied by people who recognize each side by their looks. They will call the dwellers of Paradise: "Peace be upon you." They did not enter (Paradise) through wishful thinking.
When they turn their eyes towards the dwellers of Hell, they will say, "Our Lord, do not put us with these wicked people."
The dwellers of the Purgatory will call on people they recognize by their looks, saying, "Your great numbers did not avail you in any way, nor did your arrogance.
"Are those the people you swore that GOD will never touch them with mercy?" (The people in the Purgatory will then be told,) "Enter Paradise; you have nothing to fear, nor will you grieve."
The dwellers of Hell will call on the dwellers of Paradise: "Let some of your water, or some of GOD's provisions to you flow towards us." They will say, "GOD has forbidden them for the disbelievers."
Those who do not take their religion seriously, and are totally preoccupied with this worldly life, we forget them on that day, because they forgot that day, and because they spurned our revelations.
We have given them a scripture that is fully detailed, with knowledge, guidance, and mercy for the people who believe.
Are they waiting until all (prophecies) are fulfilled? The day such fulfillment comes to pass, those who disregarded it in the past will say, "The messengers of our Lord have brought the truth. Are there any intercessors to intercede on our behalf? Would you send us back, so that we change our behavior, and do better works than what we did?" They have lost their souls, and their own innovations have caused their doom.
Your Lord is the one GOD, who created the heavens and the earth in six days, then assumed all authority. The night overtakes the day, as it pursues it persistently, and the sun, the moon, and the stars are committed to serve by His command. Absolutely, He controls all creation and all commands. Most Exalted is GOD, Lord of the universe.
You shall worship your Lord publicly and privately; He does not love the transgressors.
Do not corrupt the earth after it has been set straight, and worship Him out of reverence, and out of hope. Surely, GOD's mercy is attainable by the righteous.
He is the One who sends the wind with good omen, as a mercy from His hands. Once they gather heavy clouds, we drive them to dead lands, and send down water therefrom, to produce with it all kinds of fruits. We thus resurrect the dead, that you may take heed.
The good land readily produces its plants by the leave of its Lord, while the bad land barely produces anything useful. We thus explain the revelations for people who are appreciative.
We sent Noah to his people, saying, "O my people, worship GOD; you have no other god beside Him. I fear for you the retribution of an awesome day."
The leaders among his people said, "We see that you are far astray."
He said, "O my people, I am not astray; I am a messenger from the Lord of the universe.
"I deliver to you the messages of my Lord, and I advise you, and I know from GOD what you do not know.
"Is it too much of a wonder that a reminder should come to you from your Lord, through a man like you, to warn you, and to lead you to righteousness, that you may attain mercy?"
They rejected him. Consequently, we saved him and those with him in the ark, and we drowned those who rejected our revelations; they were blind.
To 'Ad we sent their brother Hud. He said, "O my people, worship GOD; you have no other god beside Him. Would you then observe righteousness?"
The leaders who disbelieved among his people said, "We see that you are behaving foolishly, and we think that you are a liar."
He said, "O my people, there is no foolishness in me; I am a messenger from the Lord of the universe.
"I deliver to you my Lord's messages, and I am honestly advising you.
"Is it too much of a wonder that a message should come to you from your Lord, through a man like you, to warn you? Recall that He made you inheritors after the people of Noah, and multiplied your number. Remember GOD's blessings, that you may succeed."
They said, "Did you come to make us worship GOD alone, and abandon what our parents used to worship? We challenge you to bring the doom you threaten us with, if you are truthful."
He said, "You have incurred condemnation and wrath from your Lord. Do you argue with me in defense of innovations you have fabricated-you and your parents- which were never authorized by GOD? Therefore, wait and I will wait along with you."
We then saved him and those with him, by mercy from us, and we annihilated those who rejected our revelations and refused to be believers.
To Thamud we sent their brother Saleh. He said, "O my people, worship GOD; you have no other god beside Him. Proof has been provided for you from your Lord: here is GOD's camel, to serve as a sign for you. Let her eat from GOD's land, and do not touch her with any harm, lest you incur a painful retribution.
"Recall that He made you inheritors after 'Ad, and established you on earth, building mansions in its valleys, and carving homes from its mountains. You shall remember GOD's blessings, and do not roam the earth corruptingly."
The arrogant leaders among his people said to the common people who believed, "How do you know that Saleh is sent by his Lord?" They said, "The message he brought has made us believers."
The arrogant ones said, "We disbelieve in what you believe in."
Subsequently, they slaughtered the camel, rebelled against their Lord's command, and said, "O Saleh, bring the doom you threaten us with, if you are really a messenger."
Consequently, the quake annihilated them, leaving them dead in their homes.
He turned away from them, saying, "O my people, I have delivered my Lord's message to you, and advised you, but you do not like any advisers."
Lot said to his people, "You commit such an abomination; no one in the world has done it before!
"You practice sex with the men, instead of the women. Indeed, you are a transgressing people."
His people responded by saying, "Evict them from your town. They are people who wish to be pure."
Consequently, we saved him and his family, but not his wife; she was with the doomed.
We showered them with a certain shower; note the consequences for the guilty.
To Midyan we sent their brother Shu'aib. He said, "O my people, worship GOD; you have no other god beside Him. Proof has come to you from your Lord. You shall give full weight and full measure when you trade. Do not cheat the people out of their rights. Do not corrupt the earth after it has been set straight. This is better for you, if you are believers.
"Refrain from blocking every path, seeking to repel those who believe from the path of GOD, and do not make it crooked. Remember that you used to be few and He multiplied your number. Recall the consequences for the wicked.
"Now that some of you have believed in what I was sent with, and some have disbelieved, wait until GOD issues His judgment between us; He is the best judge."
The arrogant leaders among his people said, "We will evict you, O Shu'aib, together with those who believed with you, from our town, unless you revert to our religion." He said, "Are you going to force us?
"We would be blaspheming against GOD if we reverted to your religion after GOD has saved us from it. How could we revert back to it against the will of GOD our Lord? Our Lord's knowledge encompasses all things. We have put our trust in GOD. Our Lord, grant us a decisive victory over our people. You are the best supporter."
The disbelieving leaders among his people said, "If you follow Shu'aib, you will be losers."
The quake annihilated them, leaving them dead in their homes.
Those who rejected Shu'aib vanished, as if they never existed. Those who rejected Shu'aib were the losers.
He turned away from them, saying, "O my people, I have delivered to you the messages of my Lord, and I have advised you. How can I grieve over disbelieving people."
Whenever we sent a prophet to any community, we afflicted its people with adversity and hardship, that they may implore.
Then we substituted peace and prosperity in place of that hardship. But alas, they turned heedless and said, "It was our parents who experienced that hardship before prosperity." Consequently, we punished them suddenly when they least expected.
Had the people of those communities believed and turned righteous, we would have showered them with blessings from the heaven and the earth. Since they decided to disbelieve, we punished them for what they earned.
Did the people of the present communities guarantee that our retribution will not come to them in the night as they sleep?
Did the people of today's communities guarantee that our retribution will not come to them in the daytime while they play?
Have they taken GOD's plans for granted? None takes GOD's plans for granted except the losers.
Does it ever occur to those who inherit the earth after previous generations that, if we will, we can punish them for their sins, and seal their hearts, causing them to turn deaf?
We narrate to you the history of those communities: their messengers went to them with clear proofs, but they were not to believe in what they had rejected before. GOD thus seals the hearts of the disbelievers.
We found that most of them disregard their covenant; we found most of them wicked.
After (those messengers,) we sent Moses with our signs to Pharaoh and his people, but they transgressed. Note the consequences for the wicked.
Moses said, "O Pharaoh, I am a messenger from the Lord of the universe.
"It is incumbent upon me that I do not say about GOD except the truth. I come to you with a sign from your Lord; let the Children of Israel go."
He said, "If you have a sign, then produce it, if you are truthful."
He threw down his staff, and it turned into a tremendous serpent.
He took out his hand, and it was white to the beholders.
The leaders among Pharaoh's people said, "This is no more than a clever magician.
"He wants to take you out of your land; what do you recommend?"
They said, "Respite him and his brother, and send summoners to every city.
"Let them summon every experienced magician."
The magicians came to Pharaoh and said, "Do we get paid if we are the winners?"
He said, "Yes indeed; you will even become close to me."
They said, "O Moses, either you throw, or we are throwing."
He said, "You throw." When they threw, they tricked the people's eyes, intimidated them, and produced a great magic.
We then inspired Moses: "Throw down your staff," whereupon it swallowed whatever they fabricated.
Thus, the truth prevailed, and what they did was nullified.
They were defeated then and there; they were humiliated.
The magicians fell prostrate.
They said, "We believe in the Lord of the universe.
"The Lord of Moses and Aaron."
Pharaoh said, "Did you believe in him without my permission? This must be a conspiracy you schemed in the city, in order to take its people away. You will surely find out.
"I will cut your hands and feet on alternate sides, then I will crucify you all."
They said, "We will then return to our Lord.
"You persecute us simply because we believed in the proofs of our Lord when they came to us." "Our Lord, grant us steadfastness, and let us die as submitters."
The leaders among Pharaoh's people said, "Will you allow Moses and his people to corrupt the earth, and forsake you and your gods?" He said, "We will kill their sons, and spare their daughters. We are much more powerful than they are."
Moses said to his people, "Seek GOD's help, and steadfastly persevere. The earth belongs to GOD, and He grants it to whomever He chooses from among His servants. The ultimate victory belongs to the righteous."
They said, "We were persecuted before you came to us, and after you came to us." He said, "Your Lord will annihilate your enemy and establish you on earth, then He will see how you behave."
We then afflicted Pharaoh's people with drought, and shortage of crops, that they may take heed.
When good omens came their way, they said, "We have deserved this," but when a hardship afflicted them, they blamed Moses and those with him. In fact, their omens are decided only by GOD, but most of them do not know.
They said, "No matter what kind of sign you show us, to dupe us with your magic, we will not believe."
Consequently, we sent upon them the flood, the locusts, the lice, the frogs, and the blood-profound signs. But they maintained their arrogance. They were evil people.
Whenever a plague afflicted them, they said, "O Moses, implore your Lord-you are close to Him. If you relieve this plague, we will believe with you, and will send the Children of Israel with you."
Yet, when we relieved the plague for any length of time, they violated their pledge.
Consequently, we avenged their actions, and drowned them in the sea. That is because they rejected our signs, and were totally heedless thereof.
We let the oppressed people inherit the land, east and west, and we blessed it. The blessed commands of your Lord were thus fulfilled for the Children of Israel, to reward them for their steadfastness, and we annihilated the works of Pharaoh and his people and everything they harvested.
We delivered the Children of Israel across the sea. When they passed by people who were worshiping statues, they said, "O Moses, make a god for us, like the gods they have." He said, "Indeed, you are ignorant people.
"These people are committing a blasphemy, for what they are doing is disastrous for them.
"Shall I seek for you other than GOD to be your god, when He has blessed you more than anyone else in the world?"
Recall that we delivered you from Pharaoh's people, who inflicted the worst persecution upon you, killing your sons and sparing your daughters. That was an exacting trial for you from your Lord.
We summoned Moses for thirty nights, and completed them by adding ten. Thus, the audience with his Lord lasted forty nights. Moses said to his brother Aaron, "Stay here with my people, maintain righteousness, and do not follow the ways of the corruptors."
When Moses came at our appointed time, and his Lord spoke with him, he said, "My Lord, let me look and see You." He said, "You cannot see Me. Look at that mountain; if it stays in its place, then you can see Me." Then, his Lord manifested Himself to the mountain, and this caused it to crumble. Moses fell unconscious. When he came to, he said, "Be You glorified. I repent to You, and I am the most convinced believer."
He said, "O Moses, I have chosen you, out of all the people, with My messages and by speaking to you. Therefore, take what I have given you and be appreciative."
We wrote for him on the tablets all kinds of enlightenments and details of everything: "You shall uphold these teachings strongly, and exhort your people to uphold them- these are the best teachings. I will point out for you the fate of the wicked."
I will divert from My revelations those who are arrogant on earth, without justification. Consequently, when they see every kind of proof they will not believe. And when they see the path of guidance they will not adopt it as their path, but when they see the path of straying they will adopt it as their path. This is the consequence of their rejecting our proofs, and being totally heedless thereof.
Those who reject our revelations and the meeting of the Hereafter, their works are nullified. Are they requited only for what they committed?
During his absence, Moses' people made from their jewelry the statue of a calf, complete with the sound of a calf. Did they not see that it could not speak to them, or guide them in any path? They worshiped it, and thus turned wicked.
Finally, when they regretted their action, and realized that they had gone astray, they said, "Unless our Lord redeems us with His mercy, and forgives us, we will be losers."
When Moses returned to his people, angry and disappointed, he said, "What a terrible thing you have done in my absence! Could you not wait for the commandments of your Lord?" He threw down the tablets, and took hold of his brother's head, pulling him towards himself. (Aaron) said, "Son of my mother, the people took advantage of my weakness, and almost killed me. Let not my enemies rejoice, and do not count me with the transgressing people."
(Moses) said, "My Lord, forgive me and my brother, and admit us into Your mercy. Of all the merciful ones, You are the Most Merciful."
Surely, those who idolized the calf have incurred wrath from their Lord, and humiliation in this life. We thus requite the innovators.
As for those who committed sins, then repented thereafter and believed, your Lord-after this- is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
When Moses' anger subsided, he picked up the tablets, containing guidance and mercy for those who reverence their Lord.
Moses then selected seventy men from among his people, to come to our appointed audience. When the quake shook them, he said, "My Lord, You could have annihilated them in the past, together with me, if You so willed. Would You annihilate us for the deeds of those among us who are foolish? This must be the test that You have instituted for us. With it, You condemn whomever You will, and guide whomever You will. You are our Lord and Master, so forgive us, shower us with Your mercy; You are the best Forgiver.
"And decree for us righteousness in this world, and in the Hereafter. We have repented to You." He said, "My retribution befalls whomever I will. But My mercy encompasses all things. However, I will specify it for those who (1) lead a righteous life, (2) give the obligatory charity (Zakat), (3) believe in our revelations, and
"(4) follow the messenger, the gentile prophet (Muhammad), whom they find written in their Torah and Gospel. He exhorts them to be righteous, enjoins them from evil, allows for them all good food, and prohibits that which is bad, and unloads the burdens and the shackles imposed upon them. Those who believe in him, respect him, support him, and follow the light that came with him are the successful ones."
Say, "O people, I am GOD's messenger to all of you. To Him belongs the sovereignty of the heavens and the earth. There is no god except He. He controls life and death." Therefore, you shall believe in GOD and His messenger, the gentile prophet, who believes in GOD and His words. Follow him, that you may be guided.
Among the followers of Moses there are those who guide in accordance with the truth, and the truth renders them righteous.
We divided them into twelve tribal communities, and we inspired Moses when his people asked him for water: "Strike the rock with your staff," whereupon twelve springs gushed out therefrom. Thus, each community knew its water. And we shaded them with clouds, and sent down to them manna and quails: "Eat from the good things we provided for you." It is not us that they wronged; it is they who wronged their own souls.
Recall that they were told, "Go into this town to live, and eat therefrom as you please, treat the people amicably, and enter the gate humbly. We will then forgive your transgressions. We will multiply the reward for the righteous."
But the evil ones among them substituted other commands for the commands given to them. Consequently, we sent upon them condemnation from the sky, because of their wickedness.
Remind them of the community by the sea, who desecrated the Sabbath. When they observed the Sabbath, the fish came to them abundantly. And when they violated the Sabbath, the fish did not come. We thus afflicted them, as a consequence of their transgression.
Recall that a group of them said, "Why should you preach to people whom GOD will surely annihilate or punish severely?" They answered, "Apologize to your Lord," that they might be saved.
When they disregarded what they were reminded of, we saved those who prohibited evil, and afflicted the wrongdoers with a terrible retribution for their wickedness.
When they continued to defy the commandments, we said to them, "Be you despicable apes."
Additionally, your Lord has decreed that He will raise up against them people who will inflict severe persecution upon them, until the Day of Resurrection. Your Lord is most efficient in enforcing retribution, and He is certainly the Forgiver, Most Merciful.
We scattered them among many communities throughout the land. Some of them were righteous, and some were less than righteous. We tested them with prosperity and hardship, that they may return.
Subsequent to them, He substituted new generations who inherited the scripture. But they opted for the worldly life instead, saying, "We will be forgiven." But then they continued to opt for the materials of this world. Did they not make a covenant to uphold the scripture, and not to say about GOD except the truth? Did they not study the scripture? Certainly, the abode of the Hereafter is far better for those who maintain righteousness. Do you not understand?
Those who uphold the scripture, and observe the Contact Prayers (Salat), we never fail to recompense the pious.
We raised the mountain above them like an umbrella, and they thought it was going to fall on them: "You shall uphold what we have given you, strongly, and remember the contents thereof, that you may be saved."
Recall that your Lord summoned all the descendants of Adam, and had them bear witness for themselves: "Am I not your Lord?" They all said, "Yes. We bear witness." Thus, you cannot say on the Day of Resurrection, "We were not aware of this."
Nor can you say, "It was our parents who practiced idolatry, and we simply followed in their footsteps. Will You punish us because of what others have innovated?"
We thus explain the revelations, to enable the people to redeem themselves.
Recite for them the news of one who was given our proofs, but chose to disregard them. Consequently, the devil pursued him, until he became a strayer.
Had we willed, we could have elevated him therewith, but he insisted on sticking to the ground, and pursued his own opinions. Thus, he is like the dog; whether you pet him or scold him, he pants. Such is the example of people who reject our proofs. Narrate these narrations, that they may reflect.
Bad indeed is the example of people who reject our proofs; it is only their own souls that they wrong.
Whomever GOD guides is the truly guided one, and whomever He commits to straying, these are the losers.
We have committed to Hell multitudes of jinns and humans. They have minds with which they do not understand, eyes with which they do not see, and ears with which they do not hear. They are like animals; no, they are far worse-they are totally unaware.
To GOD belongs the most beautiful names; call upon Him therewith, and disregard those who distort His names. They will be requited for their sins.
Among our creations, there are those who guide with the truth, and the truth renders them righteous.
As for those who reject our revelations, we lead them on without them ever realizing it.
I will even encourage them; My scheming is formidable.
Why do they not reflect upon their friend (the messenger)? He is not crazy. He is simply a profound warner.
Have they not looked at the dominion of the heavens and the earth, and all the things GOD has created? Does it ever occur to them that the end of their life may be near? Which Hadith, beside this, do they believe in?
Whomever GOD commits to straying, there is no way for anyone to guide him. He leaves them in their sins, blundering.
They ask you about the end of the world (the Hour), and when it will come to pass. Say, "The knowledge thereof is with my Lord. Only He reveals its time. Heavy it is, in the heavens and the earth. It will not come to you except suddenly." They ask you as if you are in control thereof. Say, "The knowledge thereof is with GOD," but most people do not know.
Say, "I have no power to benefit myself, or harm myself. Only what GOD wills happens to me. If I knew the future, I would have increased my wealth, and no harm would have afflicted me. I am no more than a warner, and a bearer of good news for those who believe."
He created you from one person (Adam). Subsequently, He gives every man a mate to find tranquility with her. She then carries a light load that she can hardly notice. As the load gets heavier, they implore GOD their Lord: "If You give us a good baby, we will be appreciative."
But when He gives them a good baby, they turn His gift into an idol that rivals Him. GOD be exalted, far above any partnership.
Is it not a fact that they are idolizing idols who create nothing, and are themselves created?
Idols that can neither help them, nor even help themselves?
When you invite them to the guidance, they do not follow you. Thus, it is the same for them whether you invite them, or remain silent.
The idols you invoke besides GOD are creatures like you. Go ahead and call upon them; let them respond to you, if you are right.
Do they have legs on which they walk? Do they have hands with which they defend themselves? Do they have eyes with which they see? Do they have ears with which they hear? Say, "Call upon your idols, and ask them to smite me without delay.
"GOD is my only Lord and Master; the One who revealed this scripture. He protects the righteous.
"As for the idols you set up beside Him, they cannot help you, nor can they help themselves."
When you invite them to the guidance, they do not hear. And you see them looking at you, but they do not see.
You shall resort to pardon, advocate tolerance, and disregard the ignorant.
When the devil whispers to you any whisper, seek refuge in GOD; He is Hearer, Omniscient.
Those who are righteous, whenever the devil approaches them with an idea, they remember, whereupon they become seers.
Their brethren ceaselessly entice them to go astray.
If you do not produce a miracle that they demand, they say, "Why not ask for it?" Say, "I simply follow what is revealed to me from my Lord." These are enlightenments from your Lord, and guidance, and mercy for people who believe.
When the Quran is recited, you shall listen to it and take heed, that you may attain mercy.
You shall remember your Lord within yourself, publicly, privately, and quietly, day and night; do not be unaware.
Those at your Lord are never too proud to worship Him; they glorify Him and fall prostrate before Him.
They consult you about the spoils of war. Say, "The spoils of war belong to GOD and the messenger." You shall observe GOD, exhort one another to be righteous, and obey GOD and His messenger, if you are believers.
The true believers are those whose hearts tremble when GOD is mentioned, and when His revelations are recited to them, their faith is strengthened, and they trust in their Lord.
They observe the Contact Prayers (Salat), and from our provisions to them, they give to charity.
Such are the true believers. They attain high ranks at their Lord, as well as forgiveness and a generous provision.
When your Lord willed that you leave your home, to fulfill a specific plan, some believers became exposed as reluctant believers.
They argued with you against the truth, even after everything was explained to them. They acted as if they were being driven to certain death.
Recall that GOD promised you victory over a certain group, but you still wanted to face the weaker group. It was GOD's plan to establish the truth with His words, and to defeat the disbelievers.
For He has decreed that the truth shall prevail, and the falsehood shall vanish, in spite of the evildoers.
Thus, when you implored your Lord to come to the rescue, He responded to you: "I am supporting you with one thousand angels in succession."
GOD gave you this good news to strengthen your hearts. Victory comes only from GOD. GOD is Almighty, Most Wise.
He caused peaceful slumber to overtake you and pacify you, and He sent down water from the sky to clean you therewith. He protected you from the devil's curse, reassured your hearts and strengthened your foothold.
Recall that your Lord inspired the angels: "I am with you; so support those who believed. I will throw terror into the hearts of those who disbelieved. You may strike them above the necks, and you may strike even every finger."
This is what they have justly incurred by fighting GOD and His messenger. For those who fight against GOD and His messenger, GOD's retribution is severe.
This is to punish the disbelievers; they have incurred the retribution of Hell.
O you who believe, if you encounter the disbelievers who have mobilized against you, do not turn back and flee.
Anyone who turns back on that day, except to carry out a battle plan, or to join his group, has incurred wrath from GOD, and his abode is Hell; what a miserable destiny!
It was not you who killed them; GOD is the One who killed them. It was not you who threw when you threw; GOD is the One who threw. But He thus gives the believers a chance to earn a lot of credit. GOD is Hearer, Omniscient.
Additionally, GOD thus nullifies the schemes of the disbelievers.
You sought victory (O disbelievers), and victory did come; it belonged to the believers. If you refrain (from aggression) it would be better for you, but if you return, so will we. Your armies will never help you, no matter how great. For GOD is on the side of the believers.
O you who believe, obey GOD and His messenger, and do not disregard him while you hear.
Do not be like those who say, "We hear," when they do not hear.
The worst creatures in the sight of GOD are the deaf and dumb, who do not understand.
Had GOD known of any good in them, He would have made them hearers. Even if He made them hearers, they still would turn away in aversion.
O you who believe, you shall respond to GOD and to the messenger when he invites you to what gives you life. You should know that GOD is closer to you than your heart, and that before Him you will be summoned.
Beware of a retribution that may not be limited to the evildoers among you. You should know that GOD's retribution is severe.
Remember that you used to be few and oppressed, fearing that the people may snatch you, and He granted you a secure sanctuary, supported you with His victory, and provided you with good provisions, that you may be appreciative.
O you who believe, do not betray GOD and the messenger, and do not betray those who trust you, now that you know.
You should know that your money and your children are a test, and that GOD possesses a great recompense.
O you who believe, if you reverence GOD, He will enlighten you, remit your sins, and forgive you. GOD possesses infinite grace.
The disbelievers plot and scheme to neutralize you, or kill you, or banish you. However, they plot and scheme, but so does GOD. GOD is the best schemer.
When our revelations are recited to them, they say, "We have heard. If we wanted to, we could have said the same things. These are no more than tales from the past!"
They also said, "Our god, if this is really the truth from you, then shower us with rocks from the sky, or pour upon us a painful punishment."
However, GOD is not to punish them while you are in their midst; GOD is not to punish them while they are seeking forgiveness.
Have they not deserved GOD's retribution, by repelling others from the Sacred Masjid, even though they are not the custodians thereof? The true custodians thereof are the righteous, but most of them do not know.
Their Contact Prayers (Salat) at the shrine (Ka'bah) were no more than a mockery and a means of repelling the people (by crowding them out). Therefore, suffer the retribution for your disbelief.
Those who disbelieve spend their money to repel others from the way of GOD. They will spend it, then it will turn into sorrow and remorse for them. Ultimately, they will be defeated, and all disbelievers will be summoned to Hell.
GOD will sift away the bad from the good, then pile the bad on top of each other, all in one pile, then throw it in Hell. Such are the losers.
Tell those who disbelieved: if they stop, all their past will be forgiven. But if they return, they will incur the same fate as their previous counterparts.
You shall fight them to ward off oppression, and to practice your religion devoted to GOD alone. If they refrain from aggression, then GOD is fully Seer of everything they do.
If they turn away, then you should know that GOD is your Lord and Master; the best Lord and Master, the best supporter.
You should know that if you gain any spoils in war, one-fifth shall go to GOD and the messenger, to be given to the relatives, the orphans, the poor, and the traveling alien. You will do this if you believe in GOD and in what we revealed to our servant on the day of decision, the day the two armies clashed. GOD is Omnipotent.
Recall that you were on this side of the valley, while they were on the other side. Then their caravan had to move to lower ground. Had you planned it this way, you could not have done it. But GOD was to carry out a predetermined matter, whereby those destined to be annihilated were annihilated for an obvious reason, and those destined to be saved were saved for an obvious reason. GOD is Hearer, Omniscient.
GOD made them appear in your dream (O Muhammad) fewer in number. Had He made them appear more numerous, you would have failed, and you would have disputed among yourselves. But GOD saved the situation. He is Knower of the innermost thoughts.
And when the time came and you faced them, He made them appear fewer in your eyes, and made you appear fewer in their eyes as well. For GOD willed to carry out a certain plan. All decisions are made by GOD.
O you who believe, when you encounter an army, you shall hold fast and commemorate GOD frequently, that you may succeed.
You shall obey GOD and His messenger, and do not dispute among yourselves, lest you fail and scatter your strength. You shall steadfastly persevere. GOD is with those who steadfastly persevere.
Do not be like those who left their homes grudgingly, only to show off, and in fact discouraged others from following the path of GOD. GOD is fully aware of everything they do.
The devil had adorned their works in their eyes, and said, "You cannot be defeated by any people today," and "I will be fighting along with you." But as soon as the two armies faced each other, he turned back on his heels and fled, saying, "I disown you. I see what you do not see. I am afraid of GOD. GOD's retribution is awesome."
The hypocrites and those who harbored doubt in their hearts said, "These people are deceived by their religion." However, if one puts his trust in GOD, then GOD is Almighty, Most Wise.
If you could only see those who disbelieved when the angels put them to death! They will beat them on their faces and their rear ends: "Taste the retribution of Hell.
"This is a consequence of what your hands have sent forth. GOD is never unjust towards the creatures."
This is the same fate as that of Pharaoh's people and those who disbelieved before them. They rejected GOD's revelations, and GOD punished them for their sins. GOD is powerful, and His retribution is severe.
GOD does not change a blessing He has bestowed upon any people unless they themselves decide to change. GOD is Hearer, Omniscient.
Such was the case with the people of Pharaoh and others before them. They first rejected the signs of their Lord. Consequently, we annihilated them for their sins. We drowned Pharaoh's people; the wicked were consistently punished.
The worst creatures in the sight of GOD are those who disbelieved; they cannot believe.
You reach agreements with them, but they violate their agreements every time; they are not righteous.
Therefore, if you encounter them in war, you shall set them up as a deterrent example for those who come after them, that they may take heed.
When you are betrayed by a group of people, you shall mobilize against them in the same manner. GOD does not love the betrayers.
Let not those who disbelieve think that they can get away with it; they can never escape.
You shall prepare for them all the power you can muster, and all the equipment you can mobilize, that you may frighten the enemies of GOD, your enemies, as well as others who are not known to you; GOD knows them. Whatever you spend in the cause of GOD will be repaid to you generously, without the least injustice.
If they resort to peace, so shall you, and put your trust in GOD. He is the Hearer, the Omniscient.
If they want to deceive you, then GOD will suffice you. He will help you with His support, and with the believers.
He has reconciled the hearts (of the believers). Had you spent all the money on earth, you could not reconcile their hearts. But GOD did reconcile them. He is Almighty, Most Wise.
O you prophet, sufficient for you is GOD and the believers who have followed you.
O you prophet, you shall exhort the believers to fight. If there are twenty of you who are steadfast, they can defeat two hundred, and a hundred of you can defeat a thousand of those who disbelieved. That is because they are people who do not understand.
Now (that many new people have joined you) GOD has made it easier for you, for He knows that you are not as strong as you used to be. Henceforth, a hundred steadfast believers can defeat two hundred, and a thousand of you can defeat two thousand by GOD's leave. GOD is with those who steadfastly persevere.
No prophet shall acquire captives, unless he participates in the fighting. You people are seeking the materials of this world, while GOD advocates the Hereafter. GOD is Almighty, Most Wise.
If it were not for a predetermined decree from GOD, you would have suffered, on account of what you took, a terrible retribution.
Therefore, eat from the spoils you have earned, that which is lawful and good, and observe GOD. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
O you prophet, tell the prisoners of war in your hands, "If GOD knew of anything good in your hearts, He would have given you better than anything you have lost, and would have forgiven you. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful."
And if they want to betray you, they have already betrayed GOD. This is why He made them the losers. GOD is Omniscient, Most Wise.
Surely, those who believed, and emigrated, and strove with their money and their lives in the cause of GOD, as well as those who hosted them and gave them refuge, and supported them, they are allies of one another. As for those who believe, but do not emigrate with you, you do not owe them any support, until they do emigrate. However, if they need your help, as brethren in faith, you shall help them, except against people with whom you have signed a peace treaty. GOD is Seer of everything you do.
Those who disbelieved are allies of one another. Unless you keep these commandments, there will be chaos on earth, and terrible corruption.
Those who believed and emigrated, and strove in the cause of GOD, as well as those who hosted them and gave them refuge, and supported them, these are the true believers. They have deserved forgiveness and a generous recompense.
Those who believed afterwards, and emigrated, and strove with you, they belong with you. Those who are related to each other shall be the first to support each other, in accordance with GOD's commandments. GOD is fully aware of all things.
An ultimatum is herein issued from GOD and His messenger to the idol worshipers who enter into a treaty with you.
Therefore, roam the earth freely for four months, and know that you cannot escape from GOD, and that GOD humiliates the disbelievers.
A proclamation is herein issued from GOD and His messenger to all the people on the great day of pilgrimage, that GOD has disowned the idol worshipers, and so did His messenger. Thus, if you repent, it would be better for you. But if you turn away, then know that you can never escape from GOD. Promise those who disbelieve a painful retribution.
If the idol worshipers sign a peace treaty with you, and do not violate it, nor band together with others against you, you shall fulfill your treaty with them until the expiration date. GOD loves the righteous.
Once the Sacred Months are past, (and they refuse to make peace) you may kill the idol worshipers when you encounter them, punish them, and resist every move they make. If they repent and observe the Contact Prayers (Salat) and give the obligatory charity (Zakat), you shall let them go. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
If one of the idol worshipers sought safe passage with you, you shall grant him safe passage, so that he can hear the word of GOD, then send him back to his place of security. That is because they are people who do not know.
How can the idol worshipers demand any pledge from GOD and from His messenger? Exempted are those who have signed a peace treaty with you at the Sacred Masjid. If they honor and uphold such a treaty, you shall uphold it as well. GOD loves the righteous.
How can they (demand a pledge) when they never observed any rights of kinship between you and them, nor any covenant, if they ever had a chance to prevail. They pacified you with lip service, while their hearts were in opposition, and most of them are wicked.
They traded away GOD's revelations for a cheap price. Consequently, they repulsed the people from His path. Miserable indeed is what they did!
They never observe any rights of kinship towards any believer, nor do they uphold their covenants; these are the real transgressors.
If they repent and observe the Contact Prayers (Salat) and give the obligatory charity (Zakat), then they are your brethren in religion. We thus explain the revelations for people who know.
If they violate their oaths after pledging to keep their covenants, and attack your religion, you may fight the leaders of paganism- you are no longer bound by your covenant with them- that they may refrain.
Would you not fight people who violated their treaties, tried to banish the messenger, and they are the ones who started the war in the first place? Are you afraid of them? GOD is the One you are supposed to fear, if you are believers.
You shall fight them, for GOD will punish them at your hands, humiliate them, grant you victory over them, and cool the chests of the believers.
He will also remove the rage from the believers' hearts. GOD redeems whomever He wills. GOD is Omniscient, Most Wise.
Did you think that you will be left alone without GOD distinguishing those among you who strive, and never ally themselves with GOD's enemies, or the enemies of His messenger, or the enemies of the believers? GOD is fully Cognizant of everything you do.
The idol worshipers are not to frequent the masjids of GOD, while confessing their disbelief. These have nullified their works, and they will abide forever in Hell.
The only people to frequent GOD's masjids are those who believe in GOD and the Last Day, and observe the Contact Prayers (Salat), and give the obligatory charity (Zakat), and do not fear except GOD. These will surely be among the guided ones.
Have you considered the watering of the pilgrims and caring for the Sacred Masjid a substitute for believing in GOD and the Last Day, and striving in the cause of GOD? They are not equal in the sight of GOD. GOD does not guide the wicked people.
Those who believe, and emigrate, and strive in the cause of GOD with their money and their lives, are far greater in rank in the sight of GOD. These are the winners.
Their Lord gives them good news: mercy and approval from Him, and gardens where they rejoice in everlasting bliss.
Eternally they abide therein. GOD possesses a great recompense.
O you who believe, do not ally yourselves even with your parents and your siblings, if they prefer disbelieving over believing. Those among you who ally themselves with them are transgressing.
Proclaim: "If your parents, your children, your siblings, your spouses, your family, the money you have earned, a business you worry about, and the homes you cherish are more beloved to you than GOD and His messenger, and the striving in His cause, then just wait until GOD brings His judgment." GOD does not guide the wicked people.
GOD has granted you victory in many situations. But on the day of Hunayn, you became too proud of your great number. Consequently, it did not help you at all, and the spacious earth became so straitened around you, that you turned around and fled.
Then GOD sent down contentment upon His messenger and upon the believers. And He sent down invisible soldiers; He thus punished those who disbelieved. This is the requital for the disbelievers.
Ultimately, GOD redeems whomever He wills. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
O you who believe, the idol worshipers are polluted; they shall not be permitted to approach the Sacred Masjid after this year. If you fear loss of income, GOD will shower you with His provisions, in accordance with His will. GOD is Omniscient, Most Wise.
You shall fight back against those who do not believe in GOD, nor in the Last Day, nor do they prohibit what GOD and His messenger have prohibited, nor do they abide by the religion of truth-among those who received the scripture-until they pay the due tax, willingly or unwillingly.
The Jews said, "Ezra is the son of GOD," while the Christians said, "Jesus is the son of GOD!" These are blasphemies uttered by their mouths. They thus match the blasphemies of those who have disbelieved in the past. GOD condemns them. They have surely deviated.
They have set up their religious leaders and scholars as lords, instead of GOD. Others deified the Messiah, son of Mary. They were all commanded to worship only one god. There is no god except He. Be He glorified, high above having any partners.
They want to put out GOD's light with their mouths, but GOD insists upon perfecting His light, in spite of the disbelievers.
He is the One who sent His messenger with the guidance and the religion of truth, and will make it dominate all religions, in spite of the idol worshipers.
O you who believe, many religious leaders and preachers take the people's money illicitly, and repel from the path of GOD. Those who hoard the gold and silver, and do not spend them in the cause of GOD, promise them a painful retribution.
The day will come when their gold and silver will be heated in the fire of Hell, then used to burn their foreheads, their sides, and their backs: "This is what you hoarded for yourselves, so taste what you have hoarded."
The count of months, as far as GOD is concerned, is twelve. This has been GOD's law, since the day He created the heavens and the earth. Four of them are sacred. This is the perfect religion; you shall not wrong your souls (by fighting) during the Sacred Months. However, you may declare all-out war against the idol worshipers (even during the Sacred Months), when they declare all-out war against you, and know that GOD is on the side of the righteous.
Altering the Sacred Months is a sign of excessive disbelief; it augments the straying of those who have disbelieved. They alternate the Sacred Months and the regular months, while preserving the number of months consecrated by GOD. They thus violate what GOD has consecrated. Their evil works are adorned in their eyes. GOD does not guide the disbelieving people.
O you who believe, when you are told, "Mobilize in the cause of GOD," why do you become heavily attached to the ground? Have you chosen this worldly life in place of the Hereafter? The materials of this world, compared to the Hereafter, are nil.
Unless you mobilize, He will commit you to painful retribution and substitute other people in your place; you can never hurt Him in the least. GOD is Omnipotent.
If you fail to support him (the messenger), GOD has already supported him. Thus, when the disbelievers chased him, and he was one of two in the cave, he said to his friend, "Do not worry; GOD is with us." GOD then sent down contentment and security upon him, and supported him with invisible soldiers. He made the word of the disbelievers lowly. GOD's word reigns supreme. GOD is Almighty, Most Wise.
You shall readily mobilize, light or heavy, and strive with your money and your lives in the cause of GOD. This is better for you, if you only knew.
If there were a quick material gain, and a short journey, they would have followed you. But the striving is just too much for them. They will swear by GOD: "If we could, we would have mobilized with you." They thus hurt themselves, and GOD knows that they are liars.
GOD has pardoned you: why did you give them permission (to stay behind), before you could distinguish those who are truthful from the liars?
Those who truly believe in GOD and the Last Day do not ask your permission to evade the opportunity to strive with their money and their lives. GOD is fully aware of the righteous.
The only people who wish to be excused are those who do not really believe in GOD and the Last Day. Their hearts are full of doubt, and their doubts cause them to waver.
Had they really wanted to mobilize, they would have prepared for it thoroughly. But GOD disliked their participation, so He discouraged them; they were told, "Stay behind with those who are staying behind."
Had they mobilized with you, they would have created confusion, and would have caused disputes and divisions among you. Some of you were apt to listen to them. GOD is fully aware of the transgressors.
They sought to spread confusion among you in the past, and confounded matters for you. However, the truth ultimately prevails, and GOD's plan is carried out, in spite of them.
Some of them would say, "Give me permission (to stay behind); do not impose such a hardship on me." In fact, they have thus incurred a terrible hardship; Hell is surrounding the disbelievers.
If something good happens to you, they hurt, and if an affliction befalls you, they say, "We told you so," as they turn away rejoicing.
Say, "Nothing happens to us, except what GOD has decreed for us. He is our Lord and Master. In GOD the believers shall trust."
Say, "You can only expect for us one of two good things (victory or martyrdom), while we expect for you condemnation from GOD and retribution from Him, or at our hands. Therefore, wait, and we will wait along with you."
Say, "Spend, willingly or unwillingly. Nothing will be accepted from you, for you are evil people."
What prevented the acceptance of their spending is that they disbelieved in GOD and His messenger, and when they observed the Contact Prayers (Salat), they observed them lazily, and when they gave to charity, they did so grudgingly.
Do not be impressed by their money, or their children. GOD causes these to be sources of retribution for them in this life, and (when they die) their souls depart while they are disbelievers.
They swear by GOD that they belong with you, while they do not belong with you; they are divisive people.
If they could find a refuge, or caves, or a hiding place, they would go to it, rushing.
Some of them criticize your distribution of the charities; if they are given therefrom, they become satisfied, but if they are not given therefrom, they become objectors.
They should be satisfied with what GOD and His messenger have given them. They should have said, "GOD suffices us. GOD will provide for us from His bounties, and so will His messenger. We are seeking only GOD."
Charities shall go to the poor, the needy, the workers who collect them, the new converts, to free the slaves, to those burdened by sudden expenses, in the cause of GOD, and to the traveling alien. Such is GOD's commandment. GOD is Omniscient, Most Wise.
Some of them hurt the prophet by saying, "He is all ears!" Say, "It is better for you that he listens to you. He believes in GOD, and trusts the believers. He is a mercy for those among you who believe." Those who hurt GOD's messenger have incurred a painful retribution.
They swear by GOD to you, to please you, when GOD and His messenger are more worthy of pleasing, if they are really believers.
Did they not know that anyone who opposes GOD and His messenger has incurred the fire of Hell forever? This is the worst humiliation.
The hypocrites worry that a sura may be revealed exposing what is inside their hearts. Say, "Go ahead and mock. GOD will expose exactly what you are afraid of."
If you ask them, they would say, "We were only mocking and kidding." Say, "Do you realize that you are mocking GOD, and His revelations, and His messenger?"
Do not apologize. You have disbelieved after having believed. If we pardon some of you, we will punish others among you, as a consequence of their wickedness.
The hypocrite men and the hypocrite women belong with each other-they advocate evil and prohibit righteousness, and they are stingy. They forgot GOD, so He forgot them. The hypocrites are truly wicked.
GOD promises the hypocrite men and the hypocrite women, as well as the disbelievers, the fire of Hell, wherein they abide forever. It suffices them. GOD has condemned them; they have incurred an everlasting retribution.
Some of those before you were stronger than you, and possessed more money and children. They became preoccupied with their material possessions. Similarly, you have become preoccupied with your material possessions, just like those before you have become preoccupied. You have become totally heedless, just as they were heedless. Such are the people who nullify their works, both in this world and in the Hereafter; they are the losers.
Have they not learned anything from the previous generations; the people of Noah, 'Ad, Thamud, the people of Abraham, the dwellers of Midyan, and the evildoers (of Sodom and Gomorrah)? Their messengers went to them with clear proofs. GOD never wronged them; they are the ones who wronged their own souls.
The believing men and women are allies of one another. They advocate righteousness and forbid evil, they observe the Contact Prayers (Salat) and give the obligatory charity (Zakat), and they obey GOD and His messenger. These will be showered by GOD's mercy. GOD is Almighty, Most Wise.
GOD promises the believing men and the believing women gardens with flowing streams, wherein they abide forever, and magnificent mansions in the gardens of Eden. And GOD's blessings and approval are even greater. This is the greatest triumph.
O you prophet, strive against the disbelievers and the hypocrites, and be stern in dealing with them. Their destiny is Hell; what a miserable abode!
They swear by GOD that they never said it, although they have uttered the word of disbelief; they have disbelieved after becoming submitters. In fact, they gave up what they never had. They have rebelled even though GOD and His messenger have showered them with His grace and provisions. If they repent, it would be best for them. But if they turn away, GOD will commit them to painful retribution in this life and in the Hereafter. They will find no one on earth to be their lord and master.
Some of them even pledged: "If GOD showered us with His grace, we would be charitable, and would lead a righteous life."
But when He did shower them with His provisions, they became stingy, and turned away in aversion.
Consequently, He plagued them with hypocrisy in their hearts, till the day they meet Him. This is because they broke their promises to GOD, and because of their lying.
Do they not realize that GOD knows their secrets, and their conspiracies, and that GOD is the Knower of all secrets?
Those who criticize the generous believers for giving too much, and ridicule the poor believers for giving too little, GOD despises them. They have incurred a painful retribution.
Whether you ask forgiveness for them, or do not ask forgiveness for them- even if you ask forgiveness for them seventy times-GOD will not forgive them. This is because they disbelieve in GOD and His messenger. GOD does not guide the wicked people.
The sedentary rejoiced in their staying behind the messenger of GOD, and hated to strive with their money and their lives in the cause of GOD. They said, "Let us not mobilize in this heat!" Say, "The fire of Hell is much hotter," if they could only comprehend.
Let them laugh a little, and cry a lot. This is the requital for the sins they have earned.
If GOD returns you to a situation where they ask your permission to mobilize with you, you shall say, "You will never again mobilize with me, nor will you ever fight with me against any enemy. For you have chosen to be with the sedentary in the first place. Therefore, you must stay with the sedentary."
You shall not observe the funeral prayer for any of them when he dies, nor shall you stand at his grave. They have disbelieved in GOD and His messenger, and died in a state of wickedness.
Do not be impressed by their money or their children; GOD causes these to be sources of misery for them in this world, and their souls depart as disbelievers.
When a sura is revealed, stating: "Believe in GOD, and strive with His messenger," even the strong among them say, "Let us stay behind!"
They chose to be with the sedentary. Consequently, their hearts were sealed, and thus, they cannot comprehend.
As for the messenger and those who believed with him, they eagerly strive with their money and their lives. These have deserved all the good things; they are the winners.
GOD has prepared for them gardens with flowing streams, wherein they abide forever. This is the greatest triumph.
The Arabs made up excuses, and came to you seeking permission to stay behind. This is indicative of their rejection of GOD and His messenger-they stay behind. Indeed, those who disbelieve among them have incurred a painful retribution.
Not to be blamed are those who are weak, or ill, or do not find anything to offer, so long as they remain devoted to GOD and His messenger. The righteous among them shall not be blamed. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
Also excused are those who come to you wishing to be included with you, but you tell them, "I do not have anything to carry you on." They then turn back with tears in their eyes, genuinely saddened that they could not afford to contribute.
The blame is on those who ask your permission to stay behind, even though they have no excuse. They have chosen to be with the sedentary. Consequently, GOD has sealed their hearts, and thus, they do not attain any knowledge.
They apologize to you when you return to them (from battle). Say, "Do not apologize; we no longer trust you. GOD has informed us about you." GOD will see your works, and so will the messenger, then you will be returned to the Knower of all secrets and declarations, then He will inform you of everything you had done.
They will swear by GOD to you, when you return to them, that you may disregard them. Do disregard them. They are polluted, and their destiny is Hell, as a requital for the sins they have earned.
They swear to you, that you may pardon them. Even if you pardon them, GOD does not pardon such wicked people.
The Arabs are the worst in disbelief and hypocrisy, and the most likely to ignore the laws that GOD has revealed to His messenger. GOD is Omniscient, Most Wise.
Some Arabs consider their spending (in the cause of God) to be a loss, and even wait in anticipation that a disaster may hit you. It is they who will incur the worst disaster. GOD is Hearer, Omniscient.
Other Arabs do believe in GOD and the Last Day, and consider their spending to be a means towards GOD, and a means of supporting the messenger. Indeed, it will bring them nearer; GOD will admit them into His mercy. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
As for the early vanguards who immigrated (Muhajerin), and the supporters who gave them refuge (Ansar) and those who followed them in righteousness, GOD is pleased with them, and they are pleased with Him. He has prepared for them gardens with flowing streams, wherein they abide forever. This is the greatest triumph.
Among the Arabs around you, there are hypocrites. Also, among the city dwellers, there are those who are accustomed to hypocrisy. You do not know them, but we know them. We will double the retribution for them, then they end up committed to a terrible retribution.
There are others who have confessed their sins; they have mixed good deeds with bad deeds. GOD will redeem them, for GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
Take from their money a charity to purify them and sanctify them. And encourage them, for your encouragement reassures them. GOD is Hearer, Omniscient.
Do they not realize that GOD accepts the repentance of His worshipers, and takes the charities, and that GOD is the Redeemer, Most Merciful?
Say, "Work righteousness; GOD will see your work, and so will His messenger and the believers. Ultimately, you will be returned to the Knower of all secrets and declarations, then He will inform you of everything you had done."
Others are waiting for GOD's decision; He may punish them, or He may redeem them. GOD is Omniscient, Most Wise.
There are those who abuse the masjid by practicing idol worship, dividing the believers, and providing comfort to those who oppose GOD and His messenger. They solemnly swear: "Our intentions are honorable!" GOD bears witness that they are liars.
You shall never pray in such a masjid. A masjid that is established on the basis of righteousness from the first day is more worthy of your praying therein. In it, there are people who love to be purified. GOD loves those who purify themselves.
Is one who establishes his building on the basis of reverencing GOD and to gain His approval better, or one who establishes his building on the brink of a crumbling cliff, that falls down with him into the fire of Hell? GOD does not guide the transgressing people.
Such a building that they have established remains a source of doubt in their hearts, until their hearts are stilled. GOD is Omniscient, Most Wise.
GOD has bought from the believers their lives and their money in exchange for Paradise. Thus, they fight in the cause of GOD, willing to kill and get killed. Such is His truthful pledge in the Torah, the Gospel, and the Quran-and who fulfills His pledge better than GOD? You shall rejoice in making such an exchange. This is the greatest triumph.
They are the repenters, the worshipers, the praisers, the meditators, the bowing and prostrating, the advocators of righteousness and forbidders of evil, and the keepers of GOD's laws. Give good news to such believers.
Neither the prophet, nor those who believe shall ask forgiveness for the idol worshipers, even if they were their nearest of kin, once they realize that they are destined for Hell.
The only reason Abraham asked forgiveness for his father was that he had promised him to do so. But as soon as he realized that he was an enemy of GOD, he disowned him. Abraham was extremely kind, clement.
GOD does not send any people astray, after He had guided them, without first pointing out for them what to expect. GOD is fully aware of all things.
To GOD belongs the sovereignty of the heavens and the earth. He controls life and death. You have none beside GOD as a Lord and Master.
GOD has redeemed the prophet, and the immigrants (Muhajireen) and the supporters who hosted them and gave them refuge (Ansar), who followed him during the difficult times. That is when the hearts of some of them almost wavered. But He has redeemed them, for He is Compassionate towards them, Most Merciful.
Also (redeemed were) the three who stayed behind. The spacious earth became so straitened for them, that they almost gave up all hope for themselves. Finally, they realized that there was no escape from GOD, except to Him. He then redeemed them that they may repent. GOD is the Redeemer, Most Merciful.
O you who believe, you shall reverence GOD, and be among the truthful.
Neither the dwellers of the city, nor the Arabs around them, shall seek to stay behind the messenger of GOD (when he mobilizes for war). Nor shall they give priority to their own affairs over supporting him. This is because they do not suffer any thirst, or any effort, or hunger in the cause of GOD, or take a single step that enrages the disbelievers, or inflict any hardship upon the enemy, without having it written down for them as a credit. GOD never fails to recompense those who work righteousness.
Nor do they incur any expense, small or large, nor do they cross any valley, without having the credit written down for them. GOD will surely reward them generously for their works.
When the believers mobilize, not all of them shall do so. A few from each group shall mobilize by devoting their time to studying the religion. Thus, they can pass the knowledge on to their people when they return, that they may remain religiously informed.
O you who believe, you shall fight the disbelievers who attack you-let them find you stern-and know that GOD is with the righteous.
When a sura was revealed, some of them would say, "Did this sura strengthen the faith of anyone among you?" Indeed, it did strengthen the faith of those who believed, and they rejoice in any revelation.
As for those who harbored doubts in their hearts, it actually added unholiness to their unholiness, and they died as disbelievers.
Do they not see that they suffer from exacting trials every year once or twice? Yet, they consistently fail to repent, and fail to take heed?
Whenever a sura was revealed, some of them would look at each other as if to say: "Does anyone see you?" Then they left. Thus, GOD has diverted their hearts, for they are people who do not comprehend.
N/A
N/A
A.L.R. These (letters) are the proofs of this book of wisdom.
Is it too much of a wonder for the people that we inspired a man like them? He (was inspired to say), "You shall warn the people, and give good news to those who believe that they have attained a position of prominence at their Lord." The disbelievers said, "This is a clever magician!"
Your only Lord is GOD; the One who created the heavens and the earth in six days, then assumed all authority. He controls all matters. There is no intercessor, except in accordance with His will. Such is GOD your Lord. You shall worship Him. Would you not take heed?
To Him is your ultimate return, all of you. This is GOD's truthful promise. He initiates the creation, then repeats it, in order to reward those who believe and lead a righteous life, equitably. As for those who disbelieve, they incur hellish drinks, and a painful retribution for their disbelieving.
He is the One who rendered the sun radiant, and the moon a light, and He designed its phases that you may learn to count the years and to calculate. GOD did not create all this, except for a specific purpose. He explains the revelations for people who know.
Surely, in the alternation of night and day, and what GOD created in the heavens and the earth, there are proofs for people who are righteous.
Those who are not expecting to meet us, and are preoccupied with this worldly life, and are content with it, and refuse to heed our proofs;
these have incurred Hell as their ultimate abode, as a consequence of their own works.
As for those who believe and lead a righteous life, their Lord guides them, by virtue of their belief. Rivers will flow beneath them in the gardens of bliss.
Their prayer therein is: "Be You glorified, our god," their greeting therein is, "Peace," and their ultimate prayer is: "Praise be to GOD, Lord of the universe."
If GOD hastened the retribution incurred by the people, the way they demand provisions, they would have been annihilated long ago. However, we leave those who do not believe in meeting us in their transgressions, blundering.
When adversity touches the human being, he implores us while lying down, or sitting, or standing up. But as soon as we relieve his adversity, he goes on as if he never implored us to relieve any hardship! The works of the transgressors are thus adorned in their eyes.
Many a generation we have annihilated before you when they transgressed. Their messengers went to them with clear proofs, but they refused to believe. We thus requite the guilty people.
Then we made you inheritors of the earth after them, to see how you will do.
When our revelations are recited to them, those who do not expect to meet us say, "Bring a Quran other than this, or change it!" Say, "I cannot possibly change it on my own. I simply follow what is revealed to me. I fear, if I disobey my Lord, the retribution of an awesome day."
Say, "Had GOD willed, I would not have recited it to you, nor would you have known anything about it. I have lived among you a whole life before this (and you have known me as a sane, truthful person). Do you not understand?"
Who is more evil than one who fabricates lies about GOD, or rejects His revelations. Certainly, the transgressors never succeed.
They worship beside GOD idols that possess no power to harm them or benefit them, and they say, "These are our intercessors at GOD!" Say, "Are you informing GOD of something He does not know in the heavens or the earth?" Be He glorified. He is the Most High; far above needing partners.
The people used to be one congregation, then they disputed. If it were not for a predetermined word from your Lord, they would have been judged immediately regarding their disputes.
They say, "How come no miracle came down to him from his Lord?" Say, "The future belongs to GOD; so wait, and I am waiting along with you."
When we bestow mercy upon the people, after adversity had afflicted them, they immediately scheme against our revelations! Say, "GOD's scheming is far more effective. For our messengers are recording everything you scheme."
He is the One who moves you across the land and sea. You get onto the ships, and they sail smoothly in a nice breeze. Then, while rejoicing therein, violent wind blows, and the waves surround them from every side. This is when they implore GOD, sincerely devoting their prayers to Him alone: "If You only save us this time, we will be eternally appreciative."
But as soon as He saves them, they transgress on earth, and oppose the truth. O people, your transgression is only to the detriment of your own souls. You remain preoccupied with this worldly life, then to us is your ultimate return, then we inform you of everything you had done.
The analogy of this worldly life is like this: we send down water from the sky to produce with it all kinds of plants from the earth, and to provide food for the people and the animals. Then, just as the earth is perfectly adorned, and its people think that they are in control thereof, our judgment comes by night or by day, leaving it completely barren, as if nothing existed the previous day. We thus explain the revelations for people who reflect.
GOD invites to the abode of peace, and guides whoever wills (to be guided) in a straight path.
For the righteous, the reward will be multiplied manifold. Their faces will never experience any deprivation or shame. These are the dwellers of Paradise; they abide therein forever.
As for those who earned sins, their requital is equivalent to their sin. Humiliation is their lot, and no one beside GOD can protect them. Their faces will seem overwhelmed by masses of dark night. They will be the dwellers of Hell; they abide therein forever.
On the day when we summon them all, we will say to those who worshiped idols, "We have summoned you, together with your idols." We will have them confront each other, and their idols will say to them, "We had no idea that you idolized us.
"GOD suffices as a witness between us and you, that we were completely unaware of your worshiping us."
That is when each soul will examine everything it had done. They will be returned to GOD, their rightful Lord and Master, and the idols they had fabricated will disown them.
Say, "Who provides for you from the heaven and the earth? Who controls all the hearing and the eyesight? Who produces the living from the dead, and the dead from the living? Who is in control of all things?" They would say, "GOD." Say, "Why then do you not observe the commandments?"
Such is GOD, your rightful Lord. What is there after the truth, except falsehood? How could you disregard all this?
This is what your Lord's decision does to those who choose to be wicked: they cannot believe.
Say, "Can any of your idols initiate creation, then repeat it?" Say, "GOD initiates the creation, then repeats it."
Say, "Does any of your idols guide to the truth?" Say, "GOD guides to the truth. Is one who guides to the truth more worthy of being followed, or one who does not guide, and needs guidance for himself? What is wrong with your judgment?"
Most of them follow nothing but conjecture, and conjecture is no substitute for the truth. GOD is fully aware of everything they do.
This Quran could not possibly be authored by other than GOD. It confirms all previous messages, and provides a fully detailed scripture. It is infallible, for it comes from the Lord of the universe.
If they say, "He fabricated it," say, "Then produce one sura like these, and invite whomever you wish, other than GOD, if you are truthful."
Indeed, they have rejected this without studying and examining it, and before understanding it. Thus did those before them disbelieve. Therefore, note the consequences for the transgressors.
Some of them believe (in this scripture), while others disbelieve in it. Your Lord is fully aware of the evildoers.
If they reject you, then say, "I have my works, and you have your works. You are innocent of anything I do, and I am innocent of anything you do."
Some of them listen to you, but can you make the deaf hear, even though they cannot understand?
Some of them look at you, but can you guide the blind, even though they do not see?
GOD never wrongs the people; it is the people who wrong their own souls.
On the day when He summons all of them, they will feel as if they lasted in this world one hour of the day, during which they met. Losers indeed are those who disbelieved in meeting GOD; and chose to be misguided.
Whether we show you some (of the retribution) we promise them, or terminate your life before that, to us is their ultimate return. GOD witnesses everything they do.
To each community, a messenger. After their messenger comes, they are judged equitably, without the least injustice.
They challenge: "When will this prophecy come to pass, if you are telling the truth?"
Say, "I possess no power to harm myself, or benefit myself; only what GOD wills takes place." Each community has a predetermined life span. Once their interim comes to an end, they cannot delay it by one hour, nor advance it.
Say,"Whether His retribution comes to you by night or by day, why are the transgressors in such a hurry?
"If it does happen, will you believe then? Why should you believe then? You used to challenge it to come?"
It will be said to the transgressors, "Taste the eternal retribution. Are you not requited precisely for what you have earned?"
They challenge you to prophesy: "Is this really what will happen?" Say, "Yes indeed, by my Lord, this is the truth, and you can never escape."
If any wicked soul possessed everything on earth, it would readily offer it as ransom. They will be ridden with remorse when they see the retribution. They will be judged equitably, without the least injustice.
Absolutely, to GOD belongs everything in the heavens and the earth. Absolutely, GOD's promise is truth, but most of them do not know.
He controls life and death, and to Him you will be returned.
O people, enlightenment has come to you herein from your Lord, and healing for anything that troubles your hearts, and guidance, and mercy for the believers.
Say, "With GOD's grace and with His mercy they shall rejoice." This is far better than any wealth they can accumulate.
Say, "Did you note how GOD sends down to you all kinds of provisions, then you render some of them unlawful, and some lawful?" Say, "Did GOD give you permission to do this? Or, do you fabricate lies and attribute them to GOD?"
Does it ever occur to those who fabricate lies about GOD that they will have to face Him on the Day of Resurrection? Certainly, GOD showers the people with His grace, but most of them are unappreciative.
You do not get into any situation, nor do you recite any Quran, nor do you do anything, without us being witnesses thereof as you do it. Not even an atom's weight is out of your Lord's control, be it in the heavens or the earth. Nor is there anything smaller than an atom, or larger, that is not recorded in a profound record.
Absolutely, GOD's allies have nothing to fear, nor will they grieve.
They are those who believe and lead a righteous life.
For them, joy and happiness in this world, as well as in the Hereafter. This is GOD's unchangeable law. Such is the greatest triumph.
Do not be saddened by their utterances. All power belongs to GOD. He is the Hearer, the Omniscient.
Absolutely, to GOD belongs everyone in the heavens and everyone on earth. Those who set up idols beside GOD are really following nothing. They only think that they are following something. They only guess.
He is the One who rendered the night for your rest, and rendered the day lighted. These are proofs for people who can hear.
They said, "GOD has begotten a son!" Be He glorified. He is the Most Rich. To Him belongs everything in the heavens and everything on earth. You have no proof to support such a blasphemy. Are you saying about GOD what you do not know?
Proclaim: "Those who fabricate lies about GOD will never succeed."
They get their temporary share in this world, then to us is their ultimate return, then we commit them to severe retribution for their disbelieving.
Recite for them the history of Noah. He said to his people, "O my people, if you find my position and my reminding you of GOD's revelations too much for you, then I put my trust in GOD. You should get together with your leaders, agree on a final decision among yourselves, then let me know it without delay.
"If you turn away, then I have not asked you for any wage. My wage comes from GOD. I have been commanded to be a submitter."
They rejected him and, consequently, we saved him and those who joined him in the ark; we made them the inheritors. And we drowned those who rejected our revelations. Note the consequences; they have been warned.
Then we sent after him messengers to their people, and they showed them clear proofs. But they were not to believe in what they had rejected in the past. We thus seal the hearts of the transgressors.
Then we sent after them Moses and Aaron to Pharaoh and his group, with our proofs. But they turned arrogant; and were transgressing people.
When the truth came to them from us, they said, "This is obviously magic!"
Moses said, "Is this how you describe the truth when it comes to you? Is this magic? How can any magicians prevail?"
They said, "Did you come to divert us from what we found our parents doing, and to attain positions of prominence for yourselves? We will never join you as believers."
Pharaoh said, "Bring to me every experienced magician."
When the magicians came, Moses said to them, "Throw whatever you are going to throw."
When they threw, Moses said, "What you have produced is magic, and GOD will make it fail. GOD does not support the transgressors' work."
GOD establishes the truth with His words, despite the criminals.
None believed with Moses except a few of his people, while fearing the tyranny of Pharaoh and his elders. Surely, Pharaoh was much too arrogant on earth, and a real tyrant.
Moses said, "O my people, if you have really believed in GOD, then put your trust in Him, if you are really submitters."
They said, "We trust in GOD. Our Lord, save us from the persecution of these oppressive people.
"Deliver us, with Your mercy, from the disbelieving people."
We inspired Moses and his brother. "Maintain your homes in Egypt for the time being, turn your homes into synagogues, and maintain the Contact Prayers (Salat). Give good news to the believers."
Moses said, "Our Lord, you have given Pharaoh and his elders luxuries and wealth in this world. Our Lord, they only use them to repulse others from Your path. Our Lord, wipe out their wealth, and harden their hearts to prevent them from believing, until they see the painful retribution."
He said, "Your prayer has been answered (O Moses and Aaron), so be steadfast, and do not follow the ways of those who do not know."
We delivered the Children of Israel across the sea. Pharaoh and his troops pursued them, aggressively and sinfully. When drowning became a reality for him, he said, "I believe that there is no god except the One in whom the Children of Israel have believed; I am a submitter."
"Too late! For you have rebelled already, and chose to be a transgressor.
"Today, we will preserve your body, to set you up as a lesson for future generations." Unfortunately, many people are totally oblivious to our signs.
We have endowed the Children of Israel with a position of honor, and blessed them with good provisions. Yet, they disputed when this knowledge came to them. Your Lord will judge them on the Day of Resurrection regarding everything they disputed.
If you have any doubt regarding what is revealed to you from your Lord, then ask those who read the previous scripture. Indeed, the truth has come to you from your Lord. Do not be with the doubters.
Nor shall you join those who rejected GOD's revelations, lest you be with the losers.
Surely, those condemned by a decree from your Lord cannot believe.
No matter what kind of proof you show them, (they cannot believe), until they see the painful retribution.
Any community that believes will surely be rewarded for believing. For example, the people of Jonah: when they believed, we relieved the humiliating retribution they had been suffering in this world, and we made them prosperous.
Had your Lord willed, all the people on earth would have believed. Do you want to force the people to become believers?
No soul can believe except in accordance with GOD's will. For He places a curse upon those who refuse to understand.
Say, "Look at all the signs in the heavens and the earth." All the proofs and all the warnings can never help people who decided to disbelieve.
Can they expect other than the fate of their counterparts in the past? Say, "Just wait, and, along with you, I am also waiting."
We ultimately save our messengers and those who believe. It is our immutable law that we save the believers.
Say, "O people, if you have any doubt regarding my religion, I do not worship what you worship beside GOD. I worship GOD alone; the One who will terminate your lives. I am commanded to be a believer."
I was commanded: "Keep yourself devoted to the religion of monotheism; you shall not practice idol worship.
"You shall not worship beside GOD what possesses no power to benefit you or harm you. If you do, you will be a transgressor."
If GOD touches you with a hardship, none can relieve it except He. And when He blesses you, no force can prevent His grace. He bestows it upon whomever He chooses from among His servants. He is the Forgiver, Most Merciful.
Proclaim: "O people, the truth has come to you herein from your Lord. Whoever is guided is guided for his own good. And whoever goes astray, goes astray to his own detriment. I am not a guardian over you."
Follow what is revealed to you, and be patient until GOD issues His judgment; He is the best judge.
A.L.R. This is a scripture whose verses have been perfected, then elucidated. It comes from a Most Wise, Most Cognizant.
Proclaiming: "You shall not worship except GOD. I come to you from Him as a warner, as well as a bearer of good news.
"You shall seek your Lord's forgiveness, then repent to Him. He will then bless you generously for a predetermined period, and bestow His grace upon those who deserve it. If you turn away, then I fear for you the retribution of an awesome day."
To GOD is your ultimate return, and He is Omnipotent.
Indeed, they hide their innermost thoughts, as if to keep Him from knowing them. In fact, as they cover themselves with their clothes, He knows all their secrets and declarations. He knows the innermost thoughts.
There is not a creature on earth whose provision is not guaranteed by GOD. And He knows its course and its final destiny. All are recorded in a profound record.
He is the One who created the heavens and the earth in six days- and His (earthly) domain was completely covered with water- in order to test you, to distinguish those among you who work righteousness. Yet, when you say, "You will be resurrected after death," those who disbelieve would say, "This is clearly witchcraft."
And if we delay the retribution they have incurred-for we reserve it for a specific community-they say, "What is keeping Him?" In fact, once it comes to them, nothing can stop it, and their mocking will come back to haunt them.
Whenever we bless the human being with mercy from us, then remove it, he turns despondent, unappreciative.
Whenever we bless him, after adversity had afflicted him, he says, "All adversity has gone away from me;" he becomes excited, proud.
As for those who steadfastly persevere, and lead a righteous life, they deserve forgiveness and a generous recompense.
You may wish to disregard some of that which is revealed to you, and you may be annoyed by it. Also, they may say, "How come no treasure comes down to him, or an angel?" You are only a warner; GOD controls all things.
If they say, "He fabricated (the Quran)," tell them, "Then produce ten suras like these, fabricated, and invite whomever you can, other than GOD, if you are truthful."
If they fail to meet your challenge, then know that this is revealed with GOD's knowledge, and that there is no god except He. Will you then submit?
Those who pursue this worldly life and its material vanities, we will pay them for their works in this life, without the least reduction.
It is they who gave up their share in the Hereafter, and, consequently, Hell is their lot. All their works are in vain; everything they have done is nullified.
As for those who are given solid proof from their Lord, reported by a witness from Him, and before it, the book of Moses has set a precedent and a mercy, they will surely believe. As for those who disbelieve among the various groups, Hell is awaiting them. Do not harbor any doubt; this is the truth from your Lord, but most people disbelieve.
Who are more evil than those who fabricate lies about GOD? They will be presented before their Lord, and the witnesses will say, "These are the ones who lied about their Lord. GOD's condemnation has befallen the transgressors."
They repel from the way of GOD and seek to make it crooked, and they are disbelievers in the Hereafter.
These will never escape, nor will they find any lords or masters to help them against GOD. Retribution will be doubled for them. They have failed to hear, and they have failed to see.
These are the ones who lose their souls, and the idols they had fabricated will disown them.
There is no doubt that, in the Hereafter, they will be the worst losers.
As for those who believe and lead a righteous life, and devote themselves to their Lord, they are the dwellers of Paradise; they abide therein forever.
The example of these two groups is like the blind and deaf, compared to the seer and hearer. Are they equal? Would you not take heed?
We sent Noah to his people, saying, "I come to you as a clear warner.
"You shall not worship except GOD. I fear for you the retribution of a painful day."
The leaders who disbelieved among his people said, "We see that you are no more than a human being like us, and we see that the first people to follow you are the worst among us. We see that you do not possess any advantage over us. Indeed, we think you are liars."
He said, "O my people, what if I have a solid proof from my Lord? What if He has blessed me out of His mercy, though you cannot see it? Are we going to force you to believe therein?
"O my people, I do not ask you for any money; my wage comes only from GOD. I am not dismissing those who believed; they will meet their Lord (and He alone will judge them). I see that you are ignorant people.
"O my people, who can support me against GOD, if I dismiss them? Would you not take heed?
"I do not claim that I possess the treasures of GOD, nor do I know the future, nor do I claim to be an angel. Nor do I say to those despised by your eyes that GOD will not bestow any blessings upon them. GOD knows best what is in their innermost thoughts. (If I did this,) I would be a transgressor."
They said, "O Noah, you have argued with us, and kept on arguing. We challenge you to bring the doom you threaten us with, if you are truthful."
He said, "GOD is the One who brings it to you, if He so wills, then you cannot escape.
"Even if I advised you, my advice cannot benefit you if it is GOD's will to send you astray. He is your Lord, and to Him you will be returned."
If they say, "He made up this story," then say, "If I made it up, then I am responsible for my crime, and I am innocent of any crime you commit."
Noah was inspired: "No more of your people are going to believe, beyond those who already believe. Do not be saddened by their actions.
"Build the ark under our watchful eyes, and with our inspiration, and do not implore Me on behalf of those who have transgressed; they are destined to drown."
While he was building the ark, whenever some of his people passed by him they laughed at him. He said, "You may be laughing at us, but we are laughing at you, just as you are laughing.
"You will surely find out who will suffer a shameful retribution, and incur an everlasting punishment."
When our judgment came, and the atmosphere boiled over, we said, "Carry on it a pair of each kind, together with your family, except those who are condemned. Carry with you those who have believed," and only a few have believed with him.
He said, "Come on board. In the name of GOD shall be its sailing, and its mooring. My Lord is Forgiver, Most Merciful."
As it sailed with them in waves like hills, Noah called his son, who was isolated: "O my son, come ride with us; do not be with the disbelievers."
He said, "I will take refuge on top of a hill, to protect me from the water." He said, "Nothing can protect anyone today from GOD's judgment; only those worthy of His mercy (will be saved)." The waves separated them, and he was among those who drowned.
It was proclaimed: "O earth, swallow your water," and "O sky, cease." The water then subsided; the judgment was fulfilled. The ark finally rested on the hills of Judea. It was then proclaimed: "The transgressors have perished."
Noah implored his Lord: "My Lord, my son is a member of my family, and Your promise is the truth. You are the wisest of the wise."
He said, "O Noah, he is not of your family. It is unrighteous to ask Me for something you do not know. I enlighten you, lest you be like the ignorant."
He said, "My Lord, I seek refuge in You, lest I implore You again for something I do not know. Unless You forgive me, and have mercy on me, I will be with the losers."
It was proclaimed: "O Noah, disembark, with peace and blessings upon you, and upon nations who will descend from your companions. As for the other nations descending from you, we will bless them for awhile, then commit them to painful retribution."
This is news from the past that we reveal to you. You had no knowledge about them-neither you, nor your people-before this. Therefore, be patient. The ultimate victory belongs to the righteous.
To 'Ad we sent their brother Hud. He said, "O my people, worship GOD; you have no other god besides Him. You are inventing.
"O my people, I do not ask you for any wage. My wage comes only from the One who initiated me. Do you not understand?
"O my people, seek forgiveness from your Lord, then repent to Him. He will then shower you with provisions from the sky, and augment your strength. Do not turn back into transgressors."
They said, "O Hud, you did not show us any proof, and we are not abandoning our gods on account of what you say. We will never be believers with you.
"We believe that some of our gods have afflicted you with a curse." He said, "I bear witness before GOD, and you bear witness as well, that I disown the idols you have set up-
"beside Him. So, give me your collective decision, without delay.
"I have put my trust in GOD, my Lord and your Lord. There is not a creature that He does not control. My Lord is on the right path.
"If you turn away, I have delivered to you what I was sent with. My Lord will substitute other people in your place; you cannot harm Him in the least. My Lord is in control of all things."
When our judgment came, we saved Hud and those who believed with him, by mercy from us. We saved them from a terrible retribution.
Such was 'Ad-they disregarded the revelations of their Lord, disobeyed His messengers, and followed the ways of every stubborn tyrant.
Consequently, they incurred condemnation in this world, and on the Day of Resurrection. Indeed, 'Ad rejected their Lord. Indeed, 'Ad, the people of Hud, have perished.
To Thamud we sent their brother Saleh. He said, "O my people, worship GOD; you have no other god beside Him. He initiated you from the earth, then settled you in it. You shall seek His forgiveness, then repent to Him. My Lord is always near, responsive."
They said, "O Saleh, you used to be popular among us before this. Are you enjoining us from worshiping what our parents are worshiping? We are full of doubt concerning everything you have told us."
He said, "O my people, what if I have solid proof from my Lord, and mercy from Him? Who would support me against GOD, if I disobeyed Him? You can only augment my loss.
"O my people, this is GOD's camel to serve as a proof for you. You shall let her eat from GOD's earth, and do not touch her with any harm, lest you incur an immediate retribution."
They slaughtered her. He then said, "You have only three days to live. This is a prophecy that is inevitable."
When our judgment came, we saved Saleh and those who believed with him by mercy from us, from the humiliation of that day. Your Lord is the Most Powerful, the Almighty.
Those who transgressed were annihilated by the disaster, leaving them in their homes, dead.
It was as if they never lived there. Indeed, Thamud have rejected their Lord. Absolutely, Thamud have incurred their annihilation.
When our messengers went to Abraham with good news, they said, "Peace." He said, "Peace," and soon brought a roasted calf.
When he saw that their hands did not touch it, he became suspicious and fearful of them. They said, "Do not be afraid, we are being dispatched to the people of Lot."
His wife was standing, and she laughed when we gave her the good news about Isaac, and after Isaac, Jacob.
She said, "Woe to me, how could I bear a child at my age, and here is my husband, an old man? This is really strange!"
They said,"Do you find it strange for GOD? GOD has bestowed His mercy and blessings upon you, O inhabitants of the shrine. He is Praiseworthy, Glorious."
When Abraham's fear subsided, and the good news was delivered to him, he proceeded to argue with us on behalf of Lot's people.
Indeed, Abraham was clement, extremely kind, and obedient.
"O Abraham, refrain from this. Your Lord's judgment has been issued; they have incurred unavoidable retribution."
When our messengers went to Lot, they were mistreated, and he was embarrassed by their presence. He said, "This is a difficult day."
His people came rushing; they had grown accustomed to their sinful acts. He said, "O my people, it would be purer for you, if you take my daughters instead. You shall reverence GOD; do not embarrass me with my guests. Have you not one reasonable man among you?"
They said, "You know well that we have no need for your daughters; you know exactly what we want."
He said, "I wish I were strong enough, or had a powerful ally!"
(The angels) said, "O Lot, we are your Lord's messengers, and these people cannot touch you. You shall leave with your family during the night, and let not anyone of you look back, except your wife; she is condemned along with those who are condemned. Their appointed time is the morning. Is not the morning soon enough?"
When our judgment came, we turned it upside down, and we showered it with hard, devastating rocks.
Such rocks were designated by your Lord to strike the transgressors.
To Midyan we sent their brother Shu'aib. He said, "O my people, worship GOD; you have no other god beside Him. Do not cheat when you measure or weigh. I see that you are prosperous, and I fear for you the retribution of an overwhelming day.
"O my people, you shall give full measure and full weight, equitably. Do not cheat the people out of their rights, and do not roam the earth corruptingly.
"Whatever GOD provides for you, no matter how small, is far better for you, if you are really believers. I am not a guardian over you."
They said, "O Shu'aib, does your religion dictate upon you that we must abandon our parents' religion, or running our businesses in any manner we choose? Surely, you are known for being clement, wise."
He said, "O my people, what if I have solid proof from my Lord; what if He has provided me with a great blessing? It is not my wish to commit what I enjoin you from. I only wish to correct as many wrongs as I can. My guidance depends totally on GOD; I have put my trust in Him. To Him I have totally submitted.
"And, O my people, do not be provoked by your opposition to me into incurring the same disasters as the people of Noah, or the people of Hud, or the people of Saleh; and the people of Lot are not too far from you.
"You shall implore your Lord for forgiveness, then repent to Him. My Lord is Most Merciful, Kind."
They said, "O Shu'aib, we do not comprehend many of the things you are telling us, and we see that you are powerless among us. If it were not for your tribe, we would have stoned you. You have no value for us."
He said, "O my people, does my tribe command a greater respect than GOD? Is this why you have been heedless of Him? My Lord is fully aware of everything you do.
"O my people, go on doing what you wish, and so will I. You will certainly find out which of us will incur shameful retribution; you will find out who the liar is. Just wait in anticipation, and I will wait in anticipation along with you."
When our judgment came, we saved Shu'aib and those who believed with him, by mercy from us. As for the evil ones, they were struck by a disaster that left them dead in their homes.
It was as though they never existed. Thus, Midyan perished, just like Thamud had perished before that.
We sent Moses with our signs and a profound authority.
To Pharaoh and his elders. But they followed the command of Pharaoh, and Pharaoh's command was not wise.
He will lead his people on the Day of Resurrection, all the way to Hell; what a miserable abode to live in!
They have incurred condemnation in this life, as well as on the Day of Resurrection; what a miserable path to follow!
This is news from the past communities that we narrate to you. Some are still standing, and some have vanished.
We never wronged them; they wronged their own souls. Their gods, whom they invoked beside GOD, could not help them in the least when the judgment of your Lord came. In fact, they only ensured their doom.
Such was the retribution enforced by your Lord when the communities transgressed. Indeed, His retribution is painful, devastating.
This should be a lesson for those who fear the retribution of the Hereafter. That is a day when all the people will be summoned- a day to be witnessed.
We have appointed a specific time for it to take place.
The day it comes to pass, no soul will utter a single word, except in accordance with His will. Some will be miserable, and some will be happy.
As for the miserable ones, they will be in Hell, wherein they sigh and wail.
Eternally they abide therein, for as long as the heavens and the earth endure, in accordance with the will of your Lord. Your Lord is doer of whatever He wills.
As for the fortunate ones, they will be in Paradise. Eternally they abide therein, for as long as the heavens and the earth endure, in accordance with the will of your Lord-an everlasting reward.
Do not have any doubt regarding what these people worship; they worship exactly as they found their parents worshiping. We will requite them their due share fully, without reduction.
We have given Moses the scripture, but it was disputed, and if it were not for a predetermined word decreed by your Lord, they would have been judged immediately. They are full of doubt about this, suspicious.
Your Lord will surely recompense everyone for their works. He is fully Cognizant of everything they do.
Therefore, continue on the path you have been enjoined to follow, together with those who repented with you, and do not transgress. He is Seer of everything you do.
Do not lean towards those who have transgressed, lest you incur Hell, and find no allies to help you against GOD, then end up losers.
You shall observe the Contact Prayers (Salat) at both ends of the day, and during the night. The righteous works wipe out the evil works. This is a reminder for those who would take heed.
You shall steadfastly persevere, for GOD never fails to recompense the righteous.
If only some of those among the previous generations possessed enough intelligence to forbid evil! Only a few of them deserved to be saved by us. As for the transgressors, they were preoccupied with their material luxuries; they were guilty.
Your Lord never annihilates any community unjustly, while its people are righteous.
Had your Lord willed, all the people would have been one congregation (of believers). But they will always dispute (the truth).
Only those blessed with mercy from your Lord (will not dispute the truth). This is why He created them. The judgment of your Lord has already been issued: "I will fill Hell with jinns and humans, all together."
We narrate to you enough history of the messengers to strengthen your heart. The truth has come to you herein, as well as enlightenments and reminders for the believers.
Say to those who disbelieve, "Do whatever you can, and so will we.
"Then wait; we too will wait."
To GOD belongs the future of the heavens and the earth, and all matters are controlled by Him. You shall worship Him and trust in Him. Your Lord is never unaware of anything you do.
A.L.R. These (letters) are proofs of this profound scripture.
We have revealed it an Arabic Quran, that you may understand.
We narrate to you the most accurate history through the revelation of this Quran. Before this, you were totally unaware.
Recall that Joseph said to his father, "O my father, I saw eleven planets, and the sun, and the moon; I saw them prostrating before me."
He said, "My son, do not tell your brothers about your dream, lest they plot and scheme against you. Surely, the devil is man's worst enemy.
"Your Lord has thus blessed you, and has given you good news through your dream. He has perfected His blessings upon you and upon the family of Jacob, as He did for your ancestors Abraham and Isaac before that. Your Lord is Omniscient, Most Wise."
In Joseph and his brothers there are lessons for the seekers.
They said, "Joseph and his brother are favored by our father, and we are in the majority. Indeed, our father is far astray.
"Let us kill Joseph, or banish him, that you may get some attention from your father. Afterwards, you can be righteous people."
One of them said, "Do not kill Joseph; let us throw him into the abyss of the well. Perhaps some caravan can pick him up, if this is what you decide to do."
They said, "Our father, why do you not trust us with Joseph? We will take good care of him.
"Send him with us tomorrow to run and play. We will protect him."
He said, "I worry lest you go away with him, then the wolf may devour him while you are not watching him."
They said, "Indeed, if the wolf devours him, with so many of us around, then we are really losers."
When they went away with him, and unanimously decided to throw him into the abyss of the well, we inspired him: "Some day, you will tell them about all this, while they have no idea."
They came back to their father in the evening, weeping.
They said, "Our father, we went racing with each other, leaving Joseph with our equipment, and the wolf devoured him. You will never believe us, even if we were telling the truth."
They produced his shirt with fake blood on it. He said, "Indeed, you have conspired with each other to commit a certain scheme. All I can do is resort to a quiet patience. May GOD help me in the face of your conspiracy."
A caravan passed by, and soon sent their waterer. He let down his bucket, then said, "How lucky! There is a boy here!" They took him along as merchandise, and GOD was fully aware of what they did.
They sold him for a cheap price- a few dirhams-for they did not have any need for him.
The one who bought him in Egypt said to his wife, "Take good care of him. Maybe he can help us, or maybe we can adopt him." We thus established Joseph on earth, and we taught him the interpretation of dreams. GOD's command is always done, but most people do not know.
When he reached maturity, we endowed him with wisdom and knowledge. We thus reward the righteous.
The lady of the house where he lived tried to seduce him. She closed the doors and said, "I am all yours." He said, "May GOD protect me. He is my Lord, who gave me a good home. The transgressors never succeed."
She almost succumbed to him, and he almost succumbed to her, if it were not that he saw a proof from his Lord. We thus diverted evil and sin away from him, for he was one of our devoted servants.
The two of them raced towards the door, and, in the process, she tore his garment from the back. They found her husband at the door. She said, "What should be the punishment for one who wanted to molest your wife, except imprisonment or a painful punishment?"
He said, "She is the one who tried to seduce me." A witness from her family suggested: "If his garment is torn from the front, then she is telling the truth and he is a liar.
"And if his garment is torn from the back, then she lied, and he is telling the truth."
When her husband saw that his garment was torn from the back, he said, "This is a woman's scheme. Indeed, your scheming is formidable.
"Joseph, disregard this incident. As for you (my wife), you should seek forgiveness for your sin. You have committed an error."
Some women in the city gossiped: "The governor's wife is trying to seduce her servant. She is deeply in love with him. We see that she has gone astray."
When she heard of their gossip, she invited them, prepared for them a comfortable place, and gave each of them a knife. She then said to him, "Enter their room." When they saw him, they so admired him, that they cut their hands. They said, "Glory be to GOD, this is not a human being; this is an honorable angel."
She said, "This is the one you blamed me for falling in love with. I did indeed try to seduce him, and he refused. Unless he does what I command him to do, he will surely go to prison, and will be debased."
He said, "My Lord, the prison is better than giving in to them. Unless You divert their scheming from me, I may desire them and behave like the ignorant ones."
His Lord answered his prayer and diverted their scheming from him. He is the Hearer, the Omniscient.
Later, they saw to it, despite the clear proofs, that they should imprison him for awhile.
Two young men were in the prison with him. One of them said, "I saw (in my dream) that I was making wine," and the other said, "I saw myself carrying bread on my head, from which the birds were eating. Inform us of the interpretation of these dreams. We see that you are righteous."
He said, "If any food is provided to you, I can inform you about it before you receive it. This is some of the knowledge bestowed upon me by my Lord. I have forsaken the religion of people who do not believe in GOD, and with regard to the Hereafter, they are really disbelievers.
"And I followed instead the religion of my ancestors, Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob. We never set up any idols beside GOD. Such is the blessing from GOD upon us and upon the people, but most people are unappreciative.
"O my prison mates, are several gods better, or GOD alone, the One, the Supreme?
"You do not worship beside Him except innovations that you have made up, you and your parents. GOD has never authorized such idols. All ruling belongs to GOD, and He has ruled that you shall not worship except Him. This is the perfect religion, but most people do not know.
"O my prison mates, one of you will be the wine butler for his lord, while the other will be crucified- the birds will eat from his head. This settles the matter about which you have inquired."
He then said to the one to be saved "Remember me at your lord." Thus, the devil caused him to forget his Lord, and, consequently, he remained in prison a few more years.
The king said, "I saw seven fat cows being devoured by seven skinny cows, and seven green spikes (of wheat), and others shriveled. O my elders, advise me regarding my dream, if you know how to interpret the dreams."
They said, "Nonsense dreams. When it comes to the interpretation of dreams, we are not knowledgeable."
The one who was saved (from the prison) said, now that he finally remembered, "I can tell you its interpretation, so send me (to Joseph)."
"Joseph my friend, inform us about seven fat cows being devoured by seven skinny cows, and seven green spikes, and others shriveled. I wish to go back with some information for the people."
He said, "What you cultivate during the next seven years, when the time of harvest comes, leave the grains in their spikes, except for what you eat.
"After that, seven years of drought will come, which will consume most of what you stored for them.
"After that, a year will come that brings relief for the people, and they will, once again, press juice."
The king said, "Bring him to me." When the messenger came to him, he said, "Go back to your lord and ask him to investigate the women who cut their hands. My Lord is fully aware of their schemes."
(The king) said (to the women), "What do you know about the incident when you tried to seduce Joseph?" They said, "GOD forbid; we did not know of anything evil committed by him." The wife of the governor said, "Now the truth has prevailed. I am the one who tried to seduce him, and he was the truthful one.
"I hope that he will realize that I never betrayed him in his absence, for GOD does not bless the schemes of the betrayers.
"I do not claim innocence for myself. The self is an advocate of vice, except for those who have attained mercy from my Lord. My Lord is Forgiver, Most Merciful."
The king said, "Bring him to me, so I can hire him to work for me." When he talked with him, he said, "Today, you have a prominent position with us."
He said, "Make me the treasurer, for I am experienced in this area and knowledgeable."
We thus established Joseph on earth, ruling as he wished. We shower our mercy upon whomever we will, and we never fail to recompense the righteous.
Additionally, the reward in the Hereafter is even better for those who believe and lead a righteous life.
Joseph's brothers came; when they entered, he recognized them, while they did not recognize him.
After he provided them with their provisions, he said, "Next time, bring with you your half-brother. Do you not see that I give full measure, and treat you generously?
"If you fail to bring him to me, you will get no share from me; you will not even come close."
They said, "We will negotiate with his father about him. We will surely do this."
He then instructed his assistants: "Put their goods back in their bags. When they find them upon their return to their family, they may come back sooner."
When they returned to their father, they said, "Our father, we can no longer get any provisions, unless you send our brother with us. We will take good care of him."
He said, "Shall I trust you with him, as I trusted you with his brother before that? GOD is the best Protector, and, of all the merciful ones, He is the Most Merciful."
When they opened their bags, they found their goods returned to them. They said, "Our father, what more can we ask for? Here are our goods returned to us. We can thus provide for our family, protect our brother, and receive one more camel-load. This is certainly a profitable deal."
He said, "I will not send him with you, unless you give me a solemn pledge before GOD that you will bring him back, unless you are utterly overwhelmed." When they gave him their solemn pledge, he said, "GOD is witnessing everything we say."
And he said, "O my sons, do not enter from one door; enter through separate doors. However, I cannot save you from anything that is predetermined by GOD. To GOD belongs all judgments. I trust in Him, and in Him shall all the trusters put their trust."
When they went (to Joseph), they entered in accordance with their father's instructions. Although this could not change anything decreed by GOD, Jacob had a private reason for asking them to do this. For he possessed certain knowledge that we taught him, but most people do not know.
When they entered Joseph's place, he brought his brother closer to him and said, "I am your brother; do not be saddened by their actions."
When he provided them with their provisions, he placed the drinking cup in his brother's bag, then an announcer announced: "The owners of this caravan are thieves."
They said, as they came towards them, "What did you lose?"
They said, "We lost the king's cup. Anyone who returns it will receive an extra camel-load; I personally guarantee this."
They said, "By GOD, you know full well that we did not come here to commit evil, nor are we thieves."
They said, "What is the punishment for the thief, if you are liars?"
They said, "The punishment, if it is found in his bag, is that the thief belongs to you. We thus punish the guilty."
He then started by inspecting their containers, before getting to his brother's container, and he extracted it out of his brother's container. We thus perfected the scheme for Joseph; he could not have kept his brother if he applied the king's law. But that was the will of GOD. We exalt whomever we choose to higher ranks. Above every knowledgeable one, there is one who is even more knowledgeable.
They said, "If he stole, so did a brother of his in the past." Joseph concealed his feelings in himself, and did not give them any clue. He said (to himself), "You are really bad. GOD is fully aware of your accusations."
They said, "O you noble one, he has a father who is elderly; would you take one of us in his place? We see that you are a kind man."
He said, "GOD forbid that we should take other than the one in whose possession we found our goods. Otherwise, we would be unjust."
When they despaired of changing his mind, they conferred together. Their eldest said, "Do you realize that your father has taken a solemn pledge from you before GOD? In the past you lost Joseph. I am not leaving this place until my father gives me permission, or until GOD judges for me; He is the best Judge.
"Go back to your father and tell him... 'Our father, your son has committed a theft. We know for sure, because this is what we have witnessed. This was an unexpected occurrence.
'You may ask the community where we were, and the caravan that came back with us. We are telling the truth.' "
He said, "Indeed, you have conspired to carry out a certain scheme. Quiet patience is my only recourse. May GOD bring them all back to me. He is the Omniscient, Most Wise."
He turned away from them, saying, "I am grieving over Joseph." His eyes turned white from grieving so much; he was truly sad.
They said, "By GOD, you will keep on grieving over Joseph until you become ill, or until you die."
He said, "I simply complain to GOD about my dilemma and grief, for I know from GOD what you do not know.
"O my sons, go fetch Joseph and his brother, and never despair of GOD's grace. None despairs of GOD's grace except the disbelieving people."
When they entered (Joseph's) quarters, they said, "O you noble one, we have suffered a lot of hardship, along with our family, and we have brought inferior goods. But we hope that you will give us full measure and be charitable to us. GOD rewards the charitable."
He said, "Do you recall what you did to Joseph and his brother when you were ignorant?"
They said, "You must be Joseph." He said, "I am Joseph, and here is my brother. GOD has blessed us. That is because if one leads a righteous life, and steadfastly perseveres, GOD never fails to reward the righteous."
They said, "By GOD, GOD has truly preferred you over us. We were definitely wrong."
He said, "There is no blame upon you today. May GOD forgive you. Of all the merciful ones, He is the Most Merciful.
"Take this shirt of mine; when you throw it on my father's face, his vision will be restored. Bring your whole family and come back to me."
Even before the caravan arrived, their father said, "I can sense the smell of Joseph. Will someone enlighten me?"
They said, "By GOD, you are still in your old confusion."
When the bearer of good news arrived, he threw (the shirt) on his face, whereupon his vision was restored. He said, "Did I not tell you that I knew from GOD what you did not know?"
They said, "Our father, pray for our forgiveness; we were wrong indeed."
He said, "I will implore my Lord to forgive you; He is the Forgiver, Most Merciful."
When they entered Joseph's quarters, he embraced his parents, saying, "Welcome to Egypt. GOD willing, you will be safe here."
He raised his parents upon the throne. They fell prostrate before him. He said, "O my father, this is the fulfillment of my old dream. My Lord has made it come true. He has blessed me, delivered me from the prison, and brought you from the desert, after the devil had driven a wedge between me and my brothers. My Lord is Most Kind towards whomever He wills. He is the Knower, the Most Wise."
"My Lord, You have given me kingship and taught me the interpretation of dreams. Initiator of the heavens and the earth; You are my Lord and Master in this life and in the Hereafter. Let me die as a submitter, and count me with the righteous."
This is news from the past that we reveal to you. You were not present when they made their unanimous decision (to throw Joseph in the well), as they conspired together.
Most people, no matter what you do, will not believe.
You are not asking them for any money; you simply deliver this reminder for all the people.
So many proofs in the heavens and the earth are given to them, but they pass by them, heedlessly!
The majority of those who believe in GOD do not do so without committing idol worship.
Have they guaranteed that an overwhelming retribution from GOD will not strike them, or the Hour will not come to them suddenly, when they least expect it?
Say, "This is my path: I invite to GOD, on the basis of a clear proof, and so do those who follow me. GOD be glorified. I am not an idol worshiper."
We did not send before you except men whom we inspired, chosen from the people of various communities. Did they not roam the earth and see the consequences for those before them? The abode of the Hereafter is far better for those who lead a righteous life. Would you then understand?
Just when the messengers despair, and think that they had been rejected, our victory comes to them. We then save whomever we choose, while our retribution for the guilty people is unavoidable.
In their history, there is a lesson for those who possess intelligence. This is not fabricated Hadith; this (Quran) confirms all previous scriptures, provides the details of everything, and is a beacon and mercy for those who believe.
A. L. M. R. These (letters) are proofs of this scripture. What is revealed to you from your Lord is the truth, but most people do not believe.
GOD is the One who raised the heavens without pillars that you can see, then assumed all authority. He committed the sun and the moon, each running (in its orbit) for a predetermined period. He controls all things, and explains the revelations, that you may attain certainty about meeting your Lord.
He is the One who constructed the earth and placed on it mountains and rivers. And from the different kinds of fruits, He made them into pairs-males and females. The night overtakes the day. These are solid proofs for people who think.
On earth, there are adjacent lots that produce orchards of grapes, crops, palm trees-dioecious and non-dioecious. Although they are irrigated with the same water, we prefer some of them over others in eating. These are solid proofs for people who understand.
If you ever wonder, the real wonder is their saying: "After we turn into dust, do we get recreated anew?" These are the ones who have disbelieved in their Lord. These are the ones who have incurred shackles around their necks. These are the ones who have incurred Hell, wherein they abide forever.
They challenge you to bring doom upon them, rather than turning righteous! Sufficient precedents have been set for them in the past. Indeed, your Lord is full of forgiveness towards the people, in spite of their transgressions, and your Lord is also strict in enforcing retribution.
Those who disbelieved say, "If only a miracle could come down to him from his Lord (we will then believe)." You are simply a warner- every community receives a guiding teacher.
GOD knows what every female bears, and what every womb releases, or gains. Everything He does is perfectly measured.
The Knower of all secrets and declarations; the Supreme, the Most High.
It is the same whether you conceal your thoughts, or declare them, or hide in the darkness of the night, or act in the daylight.
Shifts (of angels) take turns, staying with each one of you-they are in front of you and behind you. They stay with you, and guard you in accordance with GOD's commands. Thus, GOD does not change the condition of any people unless they themselves make the decision to change. If GOD wills any hardship for any people, no force can stop it. For they have none beside Him as Lord and Master.
He is the One who shows you the lightning as a source of fear, as well as hope, and He initiates the loaded clouds.
The thunder praises His glory, and so do the angels, out of reverence for Him. He sends the lightning bolts, which strike in accordance with His will. Yet, they argue about GOD, though His power is awesome.
Imploring Him is the only legitimate supplication, while the idols they implore beside Him cannot ever respond. Thus, they are like those who stretch their hands to the water, but nothing reaches their mouths. The supplications of the disbelievers are in vain.
To GOD prostrates everyone in the heavens and the earth, willingly or unwillingly, and so do their shadows in the mornings and the evenings.
Say, "Who is the Lord of the heavens and the earth?" Say, "GOD." Say, "Why then do you set up besides Him masters who do not possess any power to benefit or harm even themselves?" Say, "Is the blind the same as the seer? Is darkness the same as the light?" Have they found idols besides GOD who created creations similar to His creations, to the point of not distinguishing the two creations? Say, "GOD is the Creator of all things, and He is the One, the Supreme."
He sends down water from the sky, causing the valleys to overflow, then the rapids produce abundant foam. Similarly, when they use fire to refine metals for their jewelry or equipment, foam is produced. GOD thus cites analogies for the truth and falsehood. As for the foam, it goes to waste, while that which benefits the people stays close to the ground. GOD thus cites the analogies.
Those who respond to their Lord deserve the good rewards. As for those who failed to respond to Him, if they possessed everything on earth- even twice as much-they would readily give it up as ransom. They have incurred the worst reckoning, and their final abode is Hell; what a miserable destiny.
Is one who recognizes that your Lord's revelations to you are the truth equal to one who is blind? Only those who possess intelligence will take heed.
They are the ones who fulfill their pledge to GOD, and do not violate the covenant.
They join what GOD has commanded to be joined, reverence their Lord, and fear the dreadful reckoning.
They steadfastly persevere in seeking their Lord, observe the Contact Prayers (Salat), spend from our provisions to them secretly and publicly, and counter evil with good. These have deserved the best abode.
They enter the gardens of Eden, together with the righteous among their parents, their spouses, and their children. The angels will enter in to them from every door.
"Peace be upon you, because you steadfastly persevered. What a joyous destiny."
As for those who violate GOD's covenant after pledging to keep it, and sever what GOD has commanded to be joined, and commit evil, they have incurred condemnation; they have incurred the worst destiny.
GOD is the One who increases the provision for whomever He wills, or withholds it. They have become preoccupied with this life; and this life, compared to the Hereafter, is nil.
Those who disbelieve would say, "If only a miracle could come down to him from his Lord (we would believe)." Say, "GOD sends astray whomever He wills, and guides to Him only those who obey."
They are the ones whose hearts rejoice in remembering GOD. Absolutely, by remembering GOD, the hearts rejoice.
Those who believe and lead a righteous life have deserved happiness and a joyous destiny.
We have sent you (O Rashad) to this community, just as we did for other communities in the past. You shall recite to them what we reveal to you, for they have disbelieved in the Most Gracious. Say, "He is my Lord. There is no god except He. I put my trust in Him alone; to Him is my ultimate destiny."
Even if a Quran caused mountains to move, or the earth to tear asunder, or the dead to speak (they will not believe). GOD controls all things. Is it not time for the believers to give up and realize that if GOD willed, He could have guided all the people? The disbelievers will continue to suffer disasters, as a consequence of their own works, or have disasters strike close to them, until GOD's promise is fulfilled. GOD will never change the predetermined destiny.
Messengers before you have been ridiculed; I permitted the disbelievers to carry on, then I punished them. How terrible was My retribution!
Is there any equal to the One who controls every single soul? Yet, they set up idols to rival GOD. Say, "Name them. Are you informing Him of something on earth that He does not know? Or, are you fabricating empty statements?" Indeed, the schemes of those who disbelieve have been adorned in their eyes. They are thus diverted from the right path. Whomever GOD sends astray can never find a guiding teacher.
They have incurred retribution in this life, and the retribution in the Hereafter is far worse. Nothing can protect them against GOD.
The allegory of Heaven, which is promised for the righteous, is flowing streams, inexhaustible provisions, and cool shade. Such is the destiny for those who observe righteousness, while the destiny for the disbelievers is Hell.
Those who received the scripture rejoice in what was revealed to you; some others may reject parts of it. Say, "I am simply enjoined to worship GOD, and never associate any idols with Him. I invite to Him, and to Him is my ultimate destiny."
We revealed these laws in Arabic, and if you ever acquiesce to their wishes, after this knowledge has come to you, you will have no ally, nor a protector, against GOD.
We have sent messengers before you (O Rashad), and we made them husbands with wives and children. No messenger can produce a miracle without GOD's authorization, and in accordance with a specific, predetermined time.
GOD erases whatever He wills, and fixes (whatever He wills). With Him is the original Master Record.
Whether we show you what we promise them, or terminate your life before that, your sole mission is to deliver (the message). It is us who will call them to account.
Do they not see that every day on earth, brings them closer to the end, and that GOD decides their life span, irrevocably? He is the most efficient Reckoner.
Others before them have schemed, but to GOD belongs the ultimate scheming. He knows what everyone is doing. The disbelievers will find out who the ultimate winners are.
Those who disbelieved will say, "You are not a messenger!" Say, "GOD suffices as a witness between me and you, and those who possess knowledge of the scripture."
A.L.R. A scripture that we revealed to you, in order to lead the people out of darkness into the light in accordance with the will of their Lord-to the path of the Almighty, the Praiseworthy.
(The path of) GOD; the One who possesses everything in the heavens and everything on earth. Woe to the disbelievers; they have incurred a terrible retribution.
They are the ones who give priority to this life over the Hereafter, repel from the way of GOD, and seek to make it crooked; they have gone far astray.
We did not send any messenger except (to preach) in the tongue of his people, in order to clarify things for them. GOD then sends astray whomever He wills, and guides whomever He wills. He is the Almighty, the Most Wise.
Thus, we sent Moses with our miracles, saying, "Lead your people out of darkness into the light, and remind them of the days of GOD." These are lessons for every steadfast, appreciative person.
Recall that Moses said to his people, "Remember GOD's blessings upon you. He saved you from Pharaoh's people who inflicted the worst persecution upon you, slaughtering your sons and sparing your daughters. That was an exacting trial from your Lord."
Your Lord has decreed: "The more you thank Me, the more I give you." But if you turn unappreciative, then My retribution is severe.
Moses said, "If you disbelieve, along with all the people on earth, GOD is in no need, Praiseworthy."
Have you not heard about those before you-the people of Noah, 'Ad, Thamud, and others who came after them and known only to GOD? Their messengers went to them with clear proofs, but they treated them with contempt and said, "We disbelieve in what you are sent with. We are skeptical about your message; full of doubt."
Their messengers said, "Do you have doubts about GOD; the Initiator of the heavens and the earth? He invites you only to forgive your sins, and to give you another chance to redeem yourselves." They said, "You are no more than humans like us, who want to repel us from the way our parents used to worship. Show us some profound authority."
Their messengers said to them, "We are no more than humans like you, but GOD blesses whomever He chooses from among His servants. We could not possibly show you any kind of authorization, except in accordance with GOD's will. In GOD the believers shall trust.
"Why should we not trust in GOD, when He has guided us in our paths? We will steadfastly persevere in the face of your persecution. In GOD all the trusters shall trust."
Those who disbelieved said to their messengers, "We will banish you from our land, unless you revert to our religion." Their Lord inspired them: "We will inevitably annihilate the transgressors.
"And we will let you dwell in their land after them. This is (the reward) for those who reverence My majesty, and reverence My promise."
They issued a challenge, and consequently, every stubborn tyrant ended up doomed.
Awaiting him is Hell, wherein he will drink putrid water.
He will gulp it down, though he cannot stand it, as death comes to him from every direction, but he will never die. Awaiting him is a terrible retribution.
The allegory of those who disbelieve in their Lord: their works are like ashes in a violent wind, on a stormy day. They gain nothing from whatever they earn; such is the farthest straying.
Do you not realize that GOD has created the heavens and the earth for a specific purpose? If He wills, He can remove you, and substitute a new creation in your place.
This is not too difficult for GOD.
When they all stand before GOD, the followers will say to the leaders, "We used to follow you. Can you spare us even a little bit of GOD's retribution?" They will say, "Had GOD guided us, we would have guided you. Now it is too late, whether we grieve or resort to patience, there is no exit for us."
And the devil will say, after the judgment had been issued, "GOD has promised you the truthful promise, and I promised you, but I broke my promise. I had no power over you; I simply invited you, and you accepted my invitation. Therefore, do not blame me, and blame only yourselves. My complaining cannot help you, nor can your complaining help me. I have disbelieved in your idolizing me. The transgressors have incurred a painful retribution."
As for those who believe and lead a righteous life, they will be admitted into gardens with flowing streams. They abide therein forever, in accordance with the will of their Lord. Their greeting therein is: "Peace."
Do you not see that GOD has cited the example of the good word as a good tree whose root is firmly fixed, and its branches are high in the sky?
It produces its crop every season, as designed by its Lord. GOD thus cites the examples for the people, that they may take heed.
And the example of the bad word is that of a bad tree chopped at the soil level; it has no roots to keep it standing.
GOD strengthens those who believe with the proven word, in this life and in the Hereafter. And GOD sends the transgressors astray. Everything is in accordance with GOD's will.
Have you noted those who responded to GOD's blessings by disbelieving, and thus brought disaster upon their own families?
Hell is their destiny, wherein they burn; what a miserable end!
They set up rivals to rank with GOD and to divert others from His path. Say, "Enjoy for awhile; your final destiny is Hell."
Exhort My servants who believed to observe the Contact Prayers (Salat), and to give (to charity) from our provisions to them, secretly and publicly, before a day comes where there is neither trade, nor nepotism.
GOD is the One who created the heavens and the earth, and He sends down from the sky water to produce all kinds of fruit for your sustenance. He has committed the ships to serve you on the sea in accordance with his command. He has committed the rivers as well to serve you.
He has committed the sun and the moon in your service, continuously. He has committed the night and the day to serve you.
And He gives you all kinds of things that you implore Him for. If you count GOD's blessings, you can never encompass them. Indeed, the human being is transgressing, unappreciative.
Recall that Abraham said, "My Lord, make this a peaceful land, and protect me and my children from worshiping idols.
"My Lord, they have misled so many people. As for those who follow me, they belong with me. As for those who disobey me, You are Forgiver, Most Merciful.
"Our Lord, I have settled part of my family in this plantless valley, at Your Sacred House. Our Lord, they are to observe the Contact Prayers (Salat), so let throngs of people converge upon them, and provide for them all kinds of fruits, that they may be appreciative.
"Our Lord, You know whatever we conceal and whatever we declare- nothing is hidden from GOD on earth, nor in the heavens.
"Praise be to GOD for granting me, despite my old age, Ismail and Isaac. My Lord answers the prayers.
"My Lord, make me one who consistently observes the Contact Prayers (Salat), and also my children. Our Lord, please answer my prayers.
"My Lord, forgive me and my parents, and the believers, on the day when the reckoning takes place."
Do not ever think that GOD is unaware of what the transgressors are doing. He only respites them until a day where the eyes stare in horror.
As they rush (out of the graves), their faces will be looking upward, their eyes will not even blink, and their minds will be horrified.
You shall warn the people of the day when the retribution comes to them. Those who transgressed will say, "Our Lord, give us one more respite. We will then respond to Your call and follow the messengers." Did you not swear in the past that you will last forever?
You dwelled in the homes of those before you, who wronged their souls, and you have seen clearly what we did to them. We have set many precedents for you.
They schemed their schemes, and GOD is fully aware of their schemes. Indeed, their schemes were sufficient to erase mountains.
Do not think that GOD will ever break His promise to His messengers. GOD is Almighty, Avenger.
The day will come when this earth will be substituted with a new earth, and also the heavens, and everyone will be brought before GOD, the One, the Supreme.
And you will see the guilty on that day chained in shackles.
Their garments will be made of tar, and fire will overwhelm their faces.
For GOD will pay each soul for whatever it earned; GOD is the most efficient reckoner.
This is a proclamation for the people, to be warned herewith, and to let them know that He is only one god, and for those who possess intelligence to take heed.
A.L.R. These (letters) are proofs of this scripture; a profound Quran.
Certainly, those who disbelieved will wish they were submitters.
Let them eat, enjoy, and remain blinded by wishful thinking; they will find out.
We never annihilated any community, except in accordance with a specific, predetermined time.
The end of any community can never be advanced, nor delayed.
They said, "O you who received this reminder, you are crazy.
"Why do you not bring down the angels, if you are truthful?"
We do not send down the angels except for specific functions. Otherwise, no one will be respited.
Absolutely, we have revealed the reminder, and, absolutely, we will preserve it.
We have sent (messengers) before you to the communities in the past.
Every time a messenger went to them, they ridiculed him.
We thus control the minds of the guilty.
Consequently, they cannot believe in him. This has been the system since the past generations.
Even if we opened for them a gate into the sky, through which they climb;
they will say, "Our eyes have been deceived. We have been bewitched."
We placed galaxies in the sky, and adorned it for the beholders.
And we guarded it against every rejected devil.
If any of them sneaks around to listen, a mighty projectile will chase him back.
As for the earth, we constructed it, and placed on it stabilizers (mountains), and we grew on it a perfect balance of everything.
We made it habitable for you, and for creatures you do not provide for.
There is nothing that we do not own infinite amounts thereof. But we send it down in precise measure.
And we send the winds as pollinators, and cause water to come down from the sky for you to drink. Otherwise, you could not keep it palatable.
It is we who control life and death, and we are the ultimate inheritors.
And we fully know those among you who advance, and we fully know those who regress.
Your Lord will surely summon them. He is Most Wise, Omniscient.
We created the human being from aged mud, like the potter's clay.
As for the jinns, we created them, before that, from blazing fire.
Your Lord said to the angels, "I am creating a human being from aged mud, like the potter's clay.
"Once I perfect him, and blow into him from My spirit, you shall fall prostrate before him."
The angels fell prostrate; all of them,
except Iblis (Satan). He refused to be with the prostrators.
He said, "O Iblis (Satan), why are you not with the prostrators?"
He said, "I am not to prostrate before a human being, whom You created from aged mud, like the potter's clay."
He said, "Therefore, you must get out; you are banished.
"You have incurred My condemnation until the Day of Judgment."
He said, "My Lord, respite me until the day they are resurrected."
He said, "You are respited.
"Until the specified day and time."
He said, "My Lord, since You have willed that I go astray, I will surely entice them on earth; I will send them all astray.
"Except those among Your worshipers who are devoted absolutely to You alone."
He said, "This is a law that is inviolable.
"You have no power over My servants. You only have power over the strayers who follow you.
"And Hell awaits them all.
"It will have seven gates. Each gate will get a specific share of them."
As for the righteous, they will enjoy gardens and springs.
Enter therein, peaceful and secure.
We remove all jealousy from their hearts. Like one family, they will be on adjacent furnishings.
Never will they suffer any fatigue therein; never will they be evicted therefrom.
Inform My servants that I am the Forgiver, Most Merciful.
And that My retribution is the most painful retribution.
Inform them about Abraham's guests.
When they entered his quarters, they said, "Peace." He said, "We are apprehensive about you."
They said, "Do not be apprehensive. We have good news for you: an enlightened son."
He said, "How can you give me such good news, when I am so old? Do you still give me this good news?"
They said, "The good news we give you is true; do not despair."
He said, "None despairs of his Lord's mercy, except the strayers."
He said, "What is your mission, O messengers?"
They said, "We are being dispatched to guilty people.
"As for Lot's family, we will save them all.
"But not his wife; she is destined to be with the doomed."
The messengers went to Lot's town.
He said, "You are unknown people."
They said, "We bring to you what they have been doubting.
"We bring to you the truth; we are truthful.
"You shall take your family during the night. Stay behind them, and make sure that none of you looks back. Go straight as commanded."
We delivered to him this command: those people are to be annihilated in the morning.
The people of the city came joyfully.
He said, "These are my guests; do not embarrass me.
"Fear GOD, and do not shame me."
They said, "Did we not enjoin you from contacting anyone?"
He said, "Here are my daughters, if you must."
But, alas, they were totally blinded by their lust.
Consequently, the disaster struck them in the morning.
We turned it upside down, and showered them with devastating rocks.
This is a lesson for those who possess intelligence.
This will always be the system.
This is a sign for the believers.
The people of the woods also were transgressors.
Consequently, we avenged from them, and both communities are fully documented.
The people of Al-Hijr disbelieved the messengers.
We gave them our revelations, but they disregarded them.
They used to carve secure homes out of the mountains.
The disaster hit them in the morning.
What they hoarded did not help them.
We did not create the heavens and the earth, and everything between them, except for a specific purpose. The end of the world will come, so treat them with benign neglect.
Your Lord is the Creator, the Omniscient.
We have given you the seven pairs, and the great Quran.
Do not be jealous of what we bestowed upon the other (messengers), and do not be saddened (by the disbelievers), and lower your wing for the believers.
And proclaim: "I am the manifest warner."
We will deal with the dividers.
They accept the Quran only partially.
By your Lord, we will question them all,
about everything they have done.
Therefore, carry out the orders given to you, and disregard the idol worshipers.
We will spare you the mockers,
who set up another god beside GOD. They will surely find out.
We know full well that you may be annoyed by their utterances.
You shall sing the praises of your Lord, and be with the prostrators.
And worship your Lord, in order to attain certainty.
GOD's command has already been issued (and everything has already been written), so do not rush it. Be He glorified; the Most High, far above any idols they set up.
He sends down the angels with the revelations, carrying His commands, to whomever He chooses from among His servants: "You shall preach that there is no other god beside Me; You shall reverence Me."
He created the heavens and the earth for a specific purpose. He is much too High, far above any idols they set up.
He created the human from a tiny drop, then he turns into an ardent opponent.
And He created the livestock for you, to provide you with warmth, and many other benefits, as well as food.
They also provide you with luxury during your leisure, and when you travel.
And they carry your loads to lands that you could not reach without a great hardship. Surely, your Lord is Compassionate, Most Merciful.
And (He created) the horses, the mules, and the donkeys for you to ride, and for luxury. Additionally, He creates what you do not know.
GOD points out the paths, including the wrong ones. If He willed, He could have guided all of you.
He sends down from the sky water for your drink, and to grow trees for your benefit.
With it, He grows for you crops, olives, date palms, grapes, and all kinds of fruits. This is (sufficient) proof for people who think.
And He commits, in your service, the night and the day, as well as the sun and the moon. Also, the stars are committed by His command. These are (sufficient) proofs for people who understand.
And (He created) for you on earth things of various colors. This is a (sufficient) proof for people who take heed.
And He committed the sea to serve you; you eat from it tender meat, and extract jewelry which you wear. And you see the ships roaming it for your commercial benefits, as you seek His bounties, that you may be appreciative.
And He placed stabilizers (mountains) on earth, lest it tumbles with you, as well as rivers and roads, that you may be guided.
And landmarks, as well as the stars; to be used for navigation.
Is One who creates like one who does not create? Would you now take heed?
If you count GOD's blessings, you cannot possibly encompass them. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
And GOD knows whatever you conceal and whatever you declare.
As for the idols they set up beside GOD, they do not create anything; they themselves were created.
They are dead, not alive, and they have no idea how or when they will be resurrected.
Your god is one god. As for those who do not believe in the Hereafter, their hearts are denying, and they are arrogant.
Absolutely, GOD knows everything they conceal and everything they declare. He does not love those who are arrogant.
When they are asked, "What do you think of these revelations from your Lord," they say, "Tales from the past."
They will be held responsible for their sins on the Day of Resurrection, all of them, in addition to sins of all those whom they misled by their ignorance. What a miserable load!
Others like them have schemed in the past, and consequently, GOD destroyed their building at the foundation, causing the roof to fall on them. The retribution struck them when they least expected.
Then, on the Day of Resurrection, He will disgrace them and ask, "Where are My partners that you had set up beside Me, and had opposed Me for their sake?" Those blessed with knowledge will say, "Today, the shame and misery have befallen the disbelievers."
The angels put them to death in a state of wronging their souls. That is when they finally submit, and say, "We did not do anything wrong!" Yes indeed. GOD is fully aware of everything you have done.
Therefore, enter the gates of Hell, wherein you abide forever. What a miserable destiny for the arrogant ones.
As for the righteous, when they are asked, "What do you think of these revelations from your Lord," they say, "Good." For those who lead a righteous life, happiness; and the abode of the Hereafter is even better. What a blissful abode for the righteous.
The gardens of Eden are reserved for them, wherein rivers flow. They have anything they wish therein. GOD thus rewards the righteous.
The angels terminate their lives in a state of righteousness, saying, "Peace be upon you. Enter Paradise (now) as a reward for your works."
Are they waiting for the angels to come to them, or until your Lord's judgment comes to pass? Those before them did the same thing. GOD is not the One who wronged them; they are the ones who wronged their own souls.
They have incurred the consequences of their evil works, and the very things they ridiculed came back to haunt them.
The idol worshipers say, "Had GOD willed, we would not worship any idols besides Him, nor would our parents. Nor would we prohibit anything besides His prohibitions." Those before them have done the same. Can the messengers do anything but deliver the complete message?
We have sent a messenger to every community, saying, "You shall worship GOD, and avoid idolatry." Subsequently, some were guided by GOD, while others were committed to straying. Roam the earth and note the consequences for the rejectors.
No matter how hard you try to guide them, GOD does not guide the ones He had committed to straying. Thus, no one can help them.
They swore solemnly by GOD: "GOD will not resurrect the dead." Absolutely, such is His inviolable promise, but most people do not know.
He will then point out to everyone all the things they had disputed, and will let those who disbelieved know that they were liars.
To have anything done, we simply say to it, "Be," and it is.
Those who emigrated for the sake of GOD, because they were persecuted, we will surely make it up to them generously in this life, and the recompense of the Hereafter is even greater, if they only knew.
This is because they steadfastly persevere, and in their Lord they trust.
We did not send before you except men whom we inspired. Ask those who know the scripture, if you do not know.
We provided them with the proofs and the scriptures. And we sent down to you this message, to proclaim for the people everything that is sent down to them, perhaps they will reflect.
Did those who scheme evil schemes guarantee that GOD will not cause the earth to swallow them, or that the retribution will not come to them when they least expect it?
It may strike them while they are asleep; they can never escape.
Or it may strike them while they are fearfully expecting it. Your Lord is Compassionate, Most Merciful.
Have they not seen all the things created by GOD? Their shadows surround them right and left, in total submission to GOD, and willingly.
To GOD prostrates everything in the heavens and everything on earth- every creature-and so do the angels; without the least arrogance.
They reverence their Lord, high above them, and they do what they are commanded to do.
GOD has proclaimed: "Do not worship two gods; there is only one god. You shall reverence Me alone."
To Him belongs everything in the heavens and the earth and therefore, the religion shall be devoted absolutely to Him alone. Would you worship other than GOD?
Any blessing you enjoy is from GOD. Yet, whenever you incur any adversity you immediately complain to Him.
Yet, as soon as He relieves your affliction, some of you revert to idol worship.
Let them disbelieve in what we have given them. Go ahead and enjoy temporarily; you will surely find out.
They designate for the idols they set up out of ignorance, a share of the provisions we bestow upon them. By GOD, you will be held accountable for your innovations.
They even assign daughters to GOD, be He glorified, while they prefer for themselves what they like.
When one of them gets a baby girl, his face becomes darkened with overwhelming grief.
Ashamed, he hides from the people, because of the bad news given to him. He even ponders: should he keep the baby grudgingly, or bury her in the dust. Miserable indeed is their judgment.
Those who do not believe in the Hereafter set the worst examples, while to GOD belongs the most sublime examples. He is the Almighty, the Most Wise.
If GOD punished the people for their transgressions, He would have annihilated every creature on earth. But He respites them for a specific, predetermined time. Once their interim ends, they cannot delay it by one hour, nor advance it.
They ascribe to GOD what they dislike for themselves, then utter the lie with their own tongues that they are righteous! Without any doubt, they have incurred Hell, for they have rebelled.
By GOD, we have sent (messengers) to communities before you, but the devil adorned their works in their eyes. Consequently, he is now their lord, and they have incurred a painful retribution.
We have revealed this scripture to you, to point out for them what they dispute, and to provide guidance and mercy for people who believe.
GOD sends down from the sky water to revive the land after it had died. This should be (sufficient) proof for people who hear.
And in the livestock there is a lesson for you: we provide you with a drink from their bellies. From the midst of digested food and blood, you get pure milk, delicious for the drinkers.
And from the fruits of date palms and grapes you produce intoxicants, as well as good provisions. This should be (sufficient) proof for people who understand.
And your Lord inspired the bee: build homes in mountains and trees, and in (the hives) they build for you.
Then eat from all the fruits, following the design of your Lord, precisely. From their bellies comes a drink of different colors, wherein there is healing for the people. This should be (sufficient) proof for people who reflect.
GOD created you, then He terminates your lives. He lets some of you live to the oldest age, only to find out that there is a limit to the knowledge they can acquire. GOD is Omniscient, Omnipotent.
GOD has provided for some of you more than others. Those who are given plenty would never give their properties to their subordinates to the extent of making them partners. Would they give up GOD's blessings?
And GOD made for you spouses from among yourselves, and produced for you from your spouses children and grandchildren, and provided you with good provisions. Should they believe in falsehood, and turn unappreciative of GOD's blessings?
Yet, they worship beside GOD what possesses no provisions for them in the heavens, nor on earth, nor can provide them with anything.
Therefore, do not cite the examples for GOD; GOD knows while you do not know.
GOD cites the example of a slave who is owned, and is totally powerless, compared to one whom we blessed with good provisions, from which he gives to charity secretly and publicly. Are they equal? Praise be to GOD, most of them do not know.
And GOD cites the example of two men: one is dumb, lacks the ability to do anything, is totally dependent on his master-whichever way he directs him, he cannot produce anything good. Is he equal to one who rules with justice, and is guided in the right path?
To GOD belongs the future of the heavens and the earth. As far as He is concerned, the end of the world (the Hour) is a blink of an eye away, or even closer. GOD is Omnipotent.
GOD brought you out of your mothers' bellies knowing nothing, and He gave you the hearing, the eyesight, and the brains, that you may be appreciative.
Do they not see the birds committed to fly in the atmosphere of the sky? None holds them up in the air except GOD. This should be (sufficient) proof for people who believe.
And GOD provided for you stationary homes where you can live. And He provided for you portable homes made of the hides of livestock, so you can use them when you travel, and when you settle down. And from their wools, furs, and hair, you make furnishings and luxuries for awhile.
And GOD provided for you shade through things which He created, and provided for you shelters in the mountains, and provided for you garments that protect you from heat, and garments that protect when you fight in wars. He thus perfects His blessings upon you, that you may submit.
If they still turn away, then your sole mission is the clear delivery (of the message).
They fully recognize GOD's blessings, then deny them; the majority of them are disbelievers.
The day will come when we raise from every community a witness, then those who disbelieved will not be permitted (to speak), nor will they be excused.
Once those who transgressed see the retribution, it will be too late; it will not be commuted for them, nor will they be respited.
And when those who committed idol worship see their idols, they will say, "Our Lord, these are the idols we had set up beside You." The idols will then confront them and say, "You are liars."
They will totally submit to GOD on that day, and the idols they had invented will disown them.
Those who disbelieve and repel from the path of GOD, we augment their retribution by adding more retribution, due to their transgressions.
The day will come when we will raise from every community a witness from among them, and bring you as the witness of these people. We have revealed to you this book to provide explanations for everything, and guidance, and mercy, and good news for the submitters.
GOD advocates justice, charity, and regarding the relatives. And He forbids evil, vice, and transgression. He enlightens you, that you may take heed.
You shall fulfill your covenant with GOD when you make such a covenant. You shall not violate the oaths after swearing (by God) to carry them out, for you have made GOD a guarantor for you. GOD knows everything you do.
Do not be like the knitter who unravels her strong knitting into piles of flimsy yarn. This is your example if you abuse the oaths to take advantage of one another. Whether one group is larger than the other, GOD thus puts you to the test. He will surely show you on the Day of Resurrection everything you had disputed.
Had GOD willed, He could have made you one congregation. But He sends astray whoever chooses to go astray, and He guides whoever wishes to be guided. You will surely be asked about everything you have done.
Do not abuse the oaths among you, lest you slide back after having a strong foothold, then you incur misery. Such is the consequence of repelling from the path of GOD (by setting a bad example); you incur a terrible retribution.
Do not sell your oaths short before GOD. What GOD possesses is far better for you, if you only knew.
What you possess runs out, but what GOD possesses lasts forever. We will surely reward those who steadfastly persevere; we will recompense them for their righteous works.
Anyone who works righteousness, male or female, while believing, we will surely grant them a happy life in this world, and we will surely pay them their full recompense (on the Day of Judgment) for their righteous works.
When you read the Quran, you shall seek refuge in GOD from Satan the rejected.
He has no power over those who believe and trust in their Lord.
His power is limited to those who choose him as their master, those who choose him as their god.
When we substitute one revelation in place of another, and GOD is fully aware of what He reveals, they say, "You made this up!" Indeed, most of them do not know.
Say, "The Holy Spirit has brought it down from your Lord, truthfully, to assure those who believe, and to provide a beacon and good news for the submitters."
We are fully aware that they say, "A human being is teaching him!" The tongue of the source they hint at is non-Arabic, and this is a perfect Arabic tongue.
Surely, those who do not believe in GOD's revelations, GOD does not guide them. They have incurred a painful retribution.
The only ones who fabricate false doctrines are those who do not believe in GOD's revelations; they are the real liars.
Those who disbelieve in GOD, after having acquired faith, and become fully content with disbelief, have incurred wrath from GOD. The only ones to be excused are those who are forced to profess disbelief, while their hearts are full of faith.
This is because they have given priority to this life over the Hereafter, and GOD does not guide such disbelieving people.
Those are the ones whom GOD has sealed their hearts, and their hearing, and their eyesight. Consequently, they remain unaware.
Without a doubt, they will be the losers in the Hereafter.
As for those who emigrate because of persecution, then continue to strive and steadfastly persevere, your Lord, because of all this, is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
The day will come when every soul will serve as its own advocate, and every soul will be paid fully for whatever it had done, without the least injustice.
GOD cites the example of a community that used to be secure and prosperous, with provisions coming to it from everywhere. But then, it turned unappreciative of GOD's blessings. Consequently, GOD caused them to taste the hardships of starvation and insecurity. Such is the requital for what they did.
A messenger had gone to them from among them, but they rejected him. Consequently, the retribution struck them for their transgression.
Therefore, you shall eat from GOD's provisions everything that is lawful and good, and be appreciative of GOD's blessings, if you do worship Him alone.
He only prohibits for you dead animals, blood, the meat of pigs, and food which is dedicated to other than GOD. If one is forced (to eat these), without being deliberate or malicious, then GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
You shall not utter lies with your own tongues stating: "This is lawful, and this is unlawful," to fabricate lies and attribute them to GOD. Surely, those who fabricate lies and attribute them to GOD will never succeed.
They enjoy briefly, then suffer painful retribution.
For the Jews, we prohibited what we narrated to you previously. It was not us who wronged them; they are the ones who wronged their own souls.
Yet, as regards those who fall in sin out of ignorance then repent thereafter and reform, your Lord, after this is done, is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
Abraham was indeed an exemplary vanguard in his submission to GOD, a monotheist who never worshiped idols.
Because he was appreciative of His Lord's blessings, He chose him and guided him in a straight path.
We granted him happiness in this life, and in the Hereafter he will be with the righteous.
Then we inspired you (Muhammad) to follow the religion of Abraham, the monotheist; he never was an idol worshiper.
The Sabbath was decreed only for those who ended up disputing it (Jews & Christians). Your Lord is the One who will judge them on the Day of Resurrection regarding their disputes.
You shall invite to the path of your Lord with wisdom and kind enlightenment, and debate with them in the best possible manner. Your Lord knows best who has strayed from His path, and He knows best who are the guided ones.
And if you punish, you shall inflict an equivalent punishment. But if you resort to patience (instead of revenge), it would be better for the patient ones.
You shall resort to patience-and your patience is attainable only with GOD's help. Do not grieve over them, and do not be annoyed by their schemes.
GOD is with those who lead a righteous life, and those who are charitable.
Most glorified is the One who summoned His servant (Muhammad) during the night, from the Sacred Masjid (of Mecca) to the farthest place of prostration, whose surroundings we have blessed, in order to show him some of our signs. He is the Hearer, the Seer.
Similarly, we gave Moses the scripture, and rendered it a beacon for the Children of Israel that: "You shall not set up any idol as a Lord and Master beside Me."
They are descendants of those whom we carried with Noah; he was an appreciative servant.
We addressed the Children of Israel in the scripture: "You will commit gross evil on earth, twice. You are destined to fall into great heights of arrogance.
"When the first time comes to pass, we will send against you servants of ours who possess great might, and they will invade your homes. This is a prophecy that must come to pass.
"Afterwards, we will give you a turn over them, and will supply you with a lot of wealth and children; we will give you the upper hand.
"If you work righteousness, you work righteousness for your own good, but if you commit evil you do so to your own detriment. Thus, when the second time comes to pass, they will defeat you and enter the masjid, just as they did the first time. They will wipe out all the gains you had accomplished."
Your Lord showers you with His mercy. But if you revert to transgression, we will counter with retribution. We have designated Gehenna as a final abode for the disbelievers.
This Quran guides to the best path, and brings good news to the believers who lead a righteous life, that they have deserved a great recompense.
As for those who disbelieve in the Hereafter, we have prepared for them a painful retribution.
The human being often prays for something that may hurt him, thinking that he is praying for something good. The human being is impatient.
We rendered the night and the day two signs. We made the night dark, and the day lighted, that you may seek provisions from your Lord therein. This also establishes for you a timing system, and the means of calculation. We thus explain everything in detail.
We have recorded the fate of every human being; it is tied to his neck. On the Day of Resurrection we will hand him a record that is accessible.
Read your own record. Today, you suffice as your own reckoner.
Whoever is guided, is guided for his own good, and whoever goes astray does so to his own detriment. No sinner will bear the sins of anyone else. We never punish without first sending a messenger.
If we are to annihilate any community, we let the leaders commit vast corruption therein. Once they deserve retribution, we annihilate it completely.
Many a generation have we annihilated after Noah. Your Lord is most efficient in dealing with the sins of His servants; He is fully Cognizant, Seer.
Anyone who chooses this fleeting life as his priority, we will rush to him what we decide to give him, then we commit him to Gehenna, where he suffers forever, despised and defeated.
As for those who choose the Hereafter as their priority, and work righteousness, while believing, their efforts will be appreciated.
For each one of them we provide; we provide for those and these from your Lord's bounties. Your Lord's bounties are inexhaustible.
Note how we preferred some people above others (in this life). The differences in the Hereafter are far greater and far more significant.
You shall not set up any other god beside GOD, lest you end up despised and disgraced.
Your Lord has decreed that you shall not worship except Him, and your parents shall be honored. As long as one or both of them live, you shall never say to them, "Uff" (the slightest gesture of annoyance), nor shall you shout at them; you shall treat them amicably.
And lower for them the wings of humility, and kindness, and say, "My Lord, have mercy on them, for they have raised me from infancy."
Your Lord is fully aware of your innermost thoughts. If you maintain righteousness, He is Forgiver of those who repent.
You shall give the due alms to the relatives, the needy, the poor, and the traveling alien, but do not be excessive, extravagant.
The extravagant are brethren of the devils, and the devil is unappreciative of his Lord.
Even if you have to turn away from them, as you pursue the mercy of your Lord, you shall treat them in the nicest manner.
You shall not keep your hand stingily tied to your neck, nor shall you foolishly open it up, lest you end up blamed and sorry.
For your Lord increases the provision for anyone He chooses, and reduces it. He is fully Cognizant of His creatures, Seer.
You shall not kill your children due to fear of poverty. We provide for them, as well as for you. Killing them is a gross offense.
You shall not commit adultery; it is a gross sin, and an evil behavior.
You shall not kill any person-for GOD has made life sacred-except in the course of justice. If one is killed unjustly, then we give his heir authority to enforce justice. Thus, he shall not exceed the limits in avenging the murder; he will be helped.
You shall not touch the orphans' money except for their own good, until they reach maturity. You shall fulfill your covenants, for a covenant is a great responsibility.
You shall give full measure when you trade, and weigh equitably. This is better and more righteous.
You shall not accept any information, unless you verify it for yourself. I have given you the hearing, the eyesight, and the brain, and you are responsible for using them.
You shall not walk proudly on earth- you cannot bore through the earth nor can you be as tall as the mountains.
All bad behavior is condemned by your Lord.
This is some of the wisdom inspired to you by your Lord. You shall not set up another god beside GOD, lest you end up in Gehenna, blamed and defeated.
Has your Lord given you boys, while giving Himself the angels as daughters?! How could you utter such a blasphemy?
We have cited in this Quran (all kinds of examples), that they may take heed. But it only augments their aversion.
Say, "If there were any other gods beside Him, as they claim, they would have tried to overthrow the Possessor of the throne."
Be He glorified, He is much too exalted, far above their utterances.
Glorifying Him are the seven universes, the earth, and everyone in them. There is nothing that does not glorify Him, but you do not understand their glorification. He is Clement, Forgiver.
When you read the Quran, we place between you and those who do not believe in the Hereafter an invisible barrier.
We place shields around their minds, to prevent them from understanding it, and deafness in their ears. And when you preach your Lord, using the Quran alone, they run away in aversion.
We are fully aware of what they hear, when they listen to you, and when they conspire secretly-the disbelievers say, "You are following a crazy man."
Note how they describe you, and how this causes them to stray off the path.
They said, "After we turn into bones and fragments, we get resurrected anew?!"
Say, "Even if you turn into rocks or iron.
"Even if you turn into any kind of creation that you deem impossible." They will then say, "Who will bring us back?" Say, "The One who created you in the first place." They will then shake their heads and say, "When will that be?" Say, "It may be closer than you think."
The day He summons you, you will respond by praising Him, and you will then realize that you had lasted in this life but a short while.
Tell My servants to treat each other in the best possible manner, for the devil will always try to drive a wedge among them. Surely, the devil is man's most ardent enemy.
Your Lord knows you best. According to His knowledge, He may shower you with mercy, or He may requite you. We did not send you to be their advocate.
Your Lord is the best knower of everyone in the heavens and the earth. In accordance with this knowledge, we preferred some prophets over others. For example, we gave David the Psalms.
Say, "Implore whatever idols you have set up beside Him." They have no power to relieve your afflictions, nor can they prevent them.
Even the idols that they implore are seeking the ways and means towards their Lord. They pray for His mercy, and fear His retribution. Surely, the retribution of your Lord is dreadful.
There is not a community that we will not annihilate before the Day of Resurrection, or inflict severe retribution upon them. This is already written down in the book.
What stopped us from sending the miracles is that the previous generations have rejected them. For example, we showed Thamud the camel, a profound (miracle), but they transgressed against it. We sent the miracles only to instill reverence.
We informed you that your Lord fully controls the people, and we rendered the vision that we showed you a test for the people, and the tree that is accursed in the Quran. We showed them solid proofs to instill reverence in them, but this only augmented their defiance.
When we said to the angels, "Fall prostrate before Adam," they fell prostrate, except Satan. He said, "Shall I prostrate to one You created from mud?"
He said, "Since You have honored him over me, if You respite me till the Day of Resurrection, I will possess all his descendants, except a few."
He said, "Then go; you and those who follow you will end up in Hell as your requital; an equitable requital.
"You may entice them with your voice, and mobilize all your forces and all your men against them, and share in their money and children, and promise them. Anything the devil promises is no more than an illusion.
"As for My servants, you have no power over them." Your Lord suffices as an advocate.
Your Lord is the One who causes the ships to float on the ocean, that you may seek His bounties. He is Most Merciful towards you.
If you are afflicted in the middle of the sea, you forget your idols and sincerely implore Him alone. But as soon as He saves you to the shore, you revert. Indeed, the human being is unappreciative.
Have you guaranteed that He will not cause the land, on shore, to swallow you? Or, that He will not send upon you a tempest, then you find no protector?
Have you guaranteed that He will not return you to the sea another time, then send upon you a storm that drowns you because of your disbelief? Once this happens, we will not give you another chance.
We have honored the children of Adam, and provided them with rides on land and in the sea. We provided for them good provisions, and we gave them greater advantages than many of our creatures.
The day will come when we summon every people, together with their record. As for those who are given a record of righteousness, they will read their record and will not suffer the least injustice.
As for those who are blind in this life, they will be blind in the Hereafter; even a lot worse.
They almost diverted you from the revelations we have given you. They wanted you to fabricate something else, in order to consider you a friend.
If it were not that we strengthened you, you almost leaned towards them just a little bit.
Had you done that, we would have doubled the retribution for you in this life, and after death, and you would have found no one to help you against us.
They almost banished you from the land to get rid of you, so they could revert as soon as you left.
This has been consistently the case with all the messengers that we sent before you, and you will find that our system never changes.
You shall observe the Contact Prayer (Salat) when the sun declines from its highest point at noon, as it moves towards sunset. You shall also observe (the recitation of) the Quran at dawn. (Reciting) the Quran at dawn is witnessed.
During the night, you shall meditate for extra credit, that your Lord may raise you to an honorable rank.
And say, "My Lord, admit me an honorable admittance, and let me depart an honorable departure, and grant me from You a powerful support."
Proclaim, "The truth has prevailed, and falsehood has vanished; falsehood will inevitably vanish."
We send down in the Quran healing and mercy for the believers. At the same time, it only increases the wickedness of the transgressors.
When we bless the human being, he becomes preoccupied and heedless. But when adversity strikes him, he turns despondent.
Say, "Everyone works in accordance with his belief, and your Lord knows best which ones are guided in the right path."
They ask you about the revelation. Say, "The revelation comes from my Lord. The knowledge given to you is minute."
If we will, we can take back what we revealed to you, then you will find no protector against us.
This is but mercy from your Lord. His blessings upon you have been great.
Say, "If all the humans and all the jinns banded together in order to produce a Quran like this, they could never produce anything like it, no matter how much assistance they lent one another."
We have cited for the people in this Quran all kinds of examples, but most people insist upon disbelieving.
They said, "We will not believe you unless you cause a spring to gush out of the ground.
"Or unless you own a garden of date palms and grapes, with rivers running through it.
"Or unless you cause masses from the sky, as you claimed, to fall on us. Or unless you bring GOD and the angels before our eyes.
"Or unless you own a luxurious mansion, or unless you climb into the sky. Even if you do climb, we will not believe unless you bring a book that we can read." Say, "Glory be to my Lord. Am I any more than a human messenger?"
What prevented the people from believing when the guidance came to them is their saying, "Did GOD send a human being as a messenger?"
Say, "If the earth were inhabited by angels, we would have sent down to them from the sky an angel messenger."
Say, "GOD suffices as a witness between me and you. He is fully Cognizant of His worshipers, Seer."
Whomever GOD guides is the truly guided one. And whomever He sends astray, you will never find for them any lords and masters beside Him. We will summon them on the Day of Resurrection forcibly; blind, dumb, and deaf. Their destination is Hell; whenever it cools down, we will increase their fire.
Such is their just retribution, since they rejected our revelations. They said, "After we turn into bones and fragments, do we get resurrected into a new creation?"
Could they not see that the GOD who created the heavens and the earth is able to create the same creations? (That) He has predetermined for them an irrevocable life span? Yet, the disbelievers insist upon disbelieving.
Proclaim, "If you possessed my Lord's treasures of mercy, you would have withheld them, fearing that you might exhaust them. The human being is stingy."
We supported Moses with nine profound miracles-ask the Children of Israel. When he went to them, Pharaoh said to him, "I think that you, Moses, are bewitched."
He said, "You know full well that no one can manifest these except, obviously, the Lord of the heavens and the earth. I think that you, Pharaoh, are doomed."
When he pursued them, as he chased them out of the land, we drowned him, together with those who sided with him, all of them.
And we said to the Children of Israel afterwards, "Go live into this land. When the final prophecy comes to pass, we will summon you all in one group."
Truthfully, we sent it down, and with the truth it came down. We did not send you except as a bearer of good news, as well as a warner.
A Quran that we have released slowly, in order for you to read it to the people over a long period, although we sent it down all at once.
Proclaim, "Believe in it, or do not believe in it. " Those who possess knowledge from the previous scriptures, when it is recited to them, they fall down to their chins, prostrating.
They say, "Glory be to our Lord. This fulfills our Lord's prophecy."
They fall down on their chins, prostrating and weeping, for it augments their reverence.
Say, "Call Him GOD, or call Him the Most Gracious; whichever name you use, to Him belongs the best names."
And proclaim: "Praise be to GOD, who has never begotten a son, nor does He have a partner in His kingship, nor does He need any ally out of weakness," and magnify Him constantly.
Praise GOD, who revealed to His servant this scripture, and made it flawless.
A perfect (scripture) to warn of severe retribution from Him, and to deliver good news to the believers who lead a righteous life, that they have earned a generous recompense.
Wherein they abide forever.
And to warn those who said, "GOD has begotten a son!"
They possess no knowledge about this, nor did their parents. what a blasphemy coming out of their mouths! What they utter is a gross lie.
You may blame yourself on account of their response to this narration, and their disbelieving in it; you may be saddened.
We have adorned everything on earth, in order to test them, and thus distinguish those among them who work righteousness.
Inevitably, we will wipe out everything on it, leaving it completely barren.
Why else do you think we are telling you about the people of the cave, and the numbers connected with them? They are among our wondrous signs.
When the youths took refuge in the cave, they said, "Our Lord, shower us with Your mercy, and bless our affairs with Your guidance."
We then sealed their ears in the cave for a predetermined number of years.
Then we resurrected them to see which of the two parties could count the duration of their stay therein.
We narrate to you their history, truthfully. They were youths who believed in their Lord, and we increased their guidance.
We strengthened their hearts when they stood up and proclaimed: "Our only Lord is the Lord of the heavens and the earth. We will never worship any other god beside Him. Otherwise, we would be far astray.
"Here are our people setting up gods beside Him. If only they could provide any proof to support their stand! Who is more evil than the one who fabricates lies and attributes them to GOD?
"Since you wish to avoid them, and their worshiping of other than GOD, let us take refuge in the cave. May your Lord shower you with His mercy and direct you to the right decision."
You could see the sun when it rose coming from the right side of their cave, and when it set, it shone on them from the left, as they slept in the hollow thereof. This is one of GOD's portents. Whomever GOD guides is the truly guided one, and whomever He sends astray, you will not find for him a guiding teacher.
You would think that they were awake, when they were in fact asleep. We turned them to the right side and the left side, while their dog stretched his arms in their midst. Had you looked at them, you would have fled from them, stricken with terror.
When we resurrected them, they asked each other, "How long have you been here?" "We have been here one day or part of the day," they answered. "Your Lord knows best how long we stayed here, so let us send one of us with this money to the city. Let him fetch the cleanest food, and buy some for us. Let him keep a low profile, and attract no attention.
"If they discover you, they will stone you, or force you to revert to their religion, then you can never succeed."
We caused them to be discovered, to let everyone know that GOD's promise is true, and to remove all doubt concerning the end of the world. The people then disputed among themselves regarding them. Some said, "Let us build a building around them." Their Lord is the best knower about them. Those who prevailed said, "We will build a place of worship around them."
Some would say, "They were three; their dog being the fourth," while others would say, "Five; the sixth being their dog," as they guessed. Others said, "Seven," and the eighth was their dog. Say, "My Lord is the best knower of their number." Only a few knew the correct number. Therefore, do not argue with them; just go along with them. You need not consult anyone about this.
You shall not say that you will do anything in the future,
without saying, "GOD willing." If you forget to do this, you must immediately remember your Lord and say, "May my Lord guide me to do better next time."
They stayed in their cave three hundred years, increased by nine.
Say, "GOD is the best knower of how long they stayed there." He knows all secrets in the heavens and the earth. By His grace you can see; by His grace you can hear. There is none beside Him as Lord and Master, and He never permits any partners to share in His kingship.
You shall recite what is revealed to you of your Lord's scripture. Nothing shall abrogate His words, and you shall not find any other source beside it.
You shall force yourself to be with those who worship their Lord day and night, seeking Him alone. Do not turn your eyes away from them, seeking the vanities of this world. Nor shall you obey one whose heart we rendered oblivious to our message; one who pursues his own desires, and whose priorities are confused.
Proclaim: "This is the truth from your Lord," then whoever wills let him believe, and whoever wills let him disbelieve. We have prepared for the transgressors a fire that will completely surround them. When they scream for help, they will be given a liquid like concentrated acid that scalds the faces. What a miserable drink! What a miserable destiny!
As for those who believe and lead a righteous life, we never fail to recompense those who work righteousness.
They have deserved gardens of Eden wherein rivers flow. They will be adorned therein with bracelets of gold, and will wear clothes of green silk and velvet, and will rest on comfortable furnishings. What a wonderful reward; what a wonderful abode!
Cite for them the example of two men: we gave one of them two gardens of grapes, surrounded by date palms, and placed other crops between them.
Both gardens produced their crops on time, and generously, for we caused a river to run through them.
Once, after harvesting, he boastfully told his friend: "I am far more prosperous than you, and I command more respect from the people."
When he entered his garden, he wronged his soul by saying, "I do not think that this will ever end.
"Moreover, I think this is it; I do not think that the Hour (the Hereafter) will ever come to pass. Even if I am returned to my Lord, I will (be clever enough to) possess an even better one over there."
His friend said to him, as he debated with him, "Have you disbelieved in the One who created you from dust, then from a tiny drop, then perfected you into a man?
"As for me, GOD is my Lord, and I will never set up any other god besides my Lord.
"When you entered your garden, you should have said, 'This is what GOD has given me (Ma Sha Allah). No one possesses power except GOD (La Quwwata Ella Bellah).' You may see that I possess less money and less children than you.
"My Lord may grant me better than your garden. He may send a violent storm from the sky that wipes out your garden, leaving it completely barren.
"Or, its water may sink deeper, out of your reach."
Indeed, his crops were wiped out, and he ended up sorrowful, lamenting what he had spent on it in vain, as his property lay barren. He finally said, "I wish I never set up my property as a god beside my Lord."
No force on earth could have helped him against GOD, nor was it possible for him to receive any help.
That is because the only true Lord and master is GOD; He provides the best recompense, and with Him is the best destiny.
Cite for them the example of this life as water that we send down from the sky to produce plants of the earth, then they turn into hay that is blown away by the wind. GOD is able to do all things.
Money and children are the joys of this life, but the righteous works provide an eternal recompense from your Lord, and a far better hope.
The day will come when we wipe out the mountains, and you will see the earth barren. We will summon them all, not leaving out a single one of them.
They will be presented before your Lord in a row. You have come to us as individuals, just as we created you initially. Indeed, this is what you claimed will never happen.
The record will be shown, and you will see the guilty fearful of its contents. They will say, "Woe to us. How come this book leaves nothing, small or large, without counting it?" They will find everything they had done brought forth. Your Lord is never unjust towards anyone.
We said to the angels, "Fall prostrate before Adam." They fell prostrate, except Satan. He became a jinn, for he disobeyed the order of His Lord. Will you choose him and his descendants as lords instead of Me, even though they are your enemies? What a miserable substitute!
I never permitted them to witness the creation of the heavens and the earth, nor the creation of themselves. Nor do I permit the wicked to work in My kingdom.
The day will come when He says, "Call upon My partners, whom you claimed to be gods beside Me," they will call on them, but they will not respond to them. An insurmountable barrier will separate them from each other.
The guilty will see Hell, and will realize that they will fall into it. They will have no escape therefrom.
We have cited in this Quran every kind of example, but the human being is the most argumentative creature.
Nothing prevented the people from believing, when the guidance came to them, and from seeking the forgiveness of their Lord, except that they demanded to see the sme (kind of miracles) as the previous generations, or challenged to see the retribution beforehand.
We only send the messengers as simply deliverers of good news, as well as warners. Those who disbelieve argue with falsehood to defeat the truth, and they take My proofs and warnings in vain.
Who are more evil than those who are reminded of their Lord's proofs, then disregard them, without realizing what they are doing. Consequently, we place shields on their hearts to prevent them from understanding it (the Quran), and deafness in their ears. Thus, no matter what you do to guide them, they can never ever be guided.
Yet, your Lord is the Forgiver, full of mercy. If He called them to account for their deeds, He would annihilate them right there and then. Instead, He gives them a respite until a specific, predetermined time; then they can never escape.
Many a community we annihilated because of their transgressions; we designated a specific time for their annihilation.
Moses said to his servant, "I will not rest until I reach the point where the two rivers meet, no matter how long it takes."
When they reached the point where they met, they forgot their fish, and it found its way back to the river, sneakily.
After they passed that point, he said to his servant, "Let us have lunch. All this traveling has thoroughly exhausted us."
He said, "Remember when we sat by the rock back there? I paid no attention to the fish. It was the devil who made me forget it, and it found its way back to the river, strangely."
(Moses) said, "That was the place we were looking for." They traced their steps back.
They found one of our servants, whom we blessed with mercy, and bestowed upon him from our own knowledge.
Moses said to him, "Can I follow you, that you may teach me some of the knowledge and the guidance bestowed upon you?"
He said, "You cannot stand to be with me.
"How can you stand that which you do not comprehend?"
He said, "You will find me, GOD willing, patient. I will not disobey any command you give me."
He said, "If you follow me, then you shall not ask me about anything, unless I choose to tell you about it."
So they went. When they boarded a ship, he bore a hole in it. He said, "Did you bore a hole in it to drown its people? You have committed something terrible."
He said, "Did I not say that you cannot stand to be with me?"
He said, "I am sorry. Do not punish me for my forgetfulness; do not be too harsh with me."
So they went. When they met a young boy, he killed him. He said, "Why did you kill such an innocent person, who did not kill another person? You have committed something horrendous."
He said, "Did I not tell you that you cannot stand to be with me?"
He said, "If I ask you about anything else, then do not keep me with you. You have seen enough apologies from me."
So they went. When they reached a certain community, they asked the people for food, but they refused to host them. Soon, they found a wall about to collapse, and he fixed it. He said, "You could have demanded a wage for that!"
He said, "Now we have to part company. But I will explain to you everything you could not stand.
"As for the ship, it belonged to poor fishermen, and I wanted to render it defective. There was a king coming after them, who was confiscating every ship, forcibly.
"As for the boy, his parents were good believers, and we saw that he was going to burden them with his transgression and disbelief.
"We willed that your Lord substitute in his place another son; one who is better in righteousness and kindness.
"As for the wall, it belonged to two orphan boys in the city. Under it, there was a treasure that belonged to them. Because their father was a righteous man, your Lord wanted them to grow up and attain full strength, then extract their treasure. Such is mercy from your Lord. I did none of that of my own volition. This is the explanation of the things you could not stand."
They ask you about Zul-Qarnain. Say, "I will narrate to you some of his history."
We granted him authority on earth, and provided him with all kinds of means.
Then, he pursued one way.
When he reached the far west, he found the sun setting in a vast ocean, and found people there. We said, "O Zul-Qarnain, you can rule as you wish; either punish, or be kind to them."
He said, "As for those who transgress, we will punish them; then, when they return to their Lord, He will commit them to more retribution.
"As for those who believe and lead a righteous life, they receive a good reward; we will treat them kindly."
Then he pursued another way.
When he reached the far east, he found the sun rising on people who had nothing to shelter them from it.
Naturally, we were fully aware of everything he found out.
He then pursued another way.
When he reached the valley between two palisades, he found people whose language was barely understandable.
They said, "O Zul-Qarnain, Gog and Magog are corruptors of the earth. Can we pay you to create a barrier between us and them?"
He said, "My Lord has given me great bounties. If you cooperate with me, I will build a dam between you and them.
"Bring to me masses of iron." Once he filled the gap between the two palisades, he said, "Blow." Once it was red hot, he said, "Help me pour tar on top of it."
Thus, they could not climb it, nor could they bore holes in it.
He said, "This is mercy from my Lord. When the prophecy of my Lord comes to pass, He will cause the dam to crumble. The prophecy of my Lord is truth."
At that time, we will let them invade with one another, then the horn will be blown, and we will summon them all together.
We will present Hell, on that day, to the disbelievers.
They are the ones whose eyes were too veiled to see My message. Nor could they hear.
Do those who disbelieve think that they can get away with setting up My servants as gods beside Me? We have prepared for the disbelievers Hell as an eternal abode.
Say, "Shall I tell you who the worst losers are?
"They are the ones whose works in this life are totally astray, but they think that they are doing good."
Such are the ones who disbelieved in the revelations of their Lord and in meeting Him. Therefore, their works are in vain; on the Day of Resurrection, they have no weight.
Their just requital is Hell, in return for their disbelief, and for mocking My revelations and My messengers.
As for those who believe and lead a righteous life, they have deserved a blissful Paradise as their abode.
Forever they abide therein; they will never want any other substitute.
Say, "If the ocean were ink for the words of my Lord, the ocean would run out, before the words of my Lord run out, even if we double the ink supply."
Say, "I am no more than a human like you, being inspired that your god is one god. Those who hope to meet their Lord shall work righteousness, and never worship any other god beside his Lord."
K. H. Y. 'A. S. (Kaf Ha Ya 'Ayn Sad)
A narration about your Lord's mercy towards His servant Zachariah.
He called his Lord, a secret call.
He said, "My Lord, the bones have turned brittle in my body, and my hair is aflame with gray. As I implore You, my Lord, I never despair.
"I worry about my dependants after me, and my wife has been sterile. Grant me, from You, an heir.
"Let him be my heir and the heir of Jacob's clan, and make him, my Lord, acceptable."
"O Zachariah, we give you good news; a boy whose name shall be John (Yahya). We never created anyone like him before."
He said, "My Lord, will I have a son despite my wife's sterility, and despite my old age?"
He said, "Thus said your Lord: 'It is easy for Me to do. I created you before that, and you were nothing.' "
He said, "My Lord, give me a sign." He said, "Your sign is that you will not speak to the people for three consecutive nights."
He came out to his family, from the sanctuary, and signaled to them: "Meditate (on God) day and night."
"O John, you shall uphold the scripture, strongly." We endowed him with wisdom, even in his youth.
And (we endowed him with) kindness from us and purity, for he was righteous.
He honored his parents, and was never a disobedient tyrant.
Peace be upon him the day he was born, the day he dies, and the day he is resurrected back to life.
Mention in the scripture Mary. She isolated herself from her family, into an eastern location.
While a barrier separated her from them, we sent to her our Spirit. He went to her in the form of a human being.
She said, "I seek refuge in the Most Gracious, that you may be righteous."
He said, "I am the messenger of your Lord, to grant you a pure son."
She said, "How can I have a son, when no man has touched me; I have never been unchaste."
He said, "Thus said your Lord, 'It is easy for Me. We will render him a sign for the people, and mercy from us. This is a predestined matter.' "
When she bore him, she isolated herself to a faraway place.
The birth process came to her by the trunk of a palm tree. She said, "(I am so ashamed;) I wish I were dead before this happened, and completely forgotten."
(The infant) called her from beneath her, saying, "Do not grieve. Your Lord has provided you with a stream.
"If you shake the trunk of this palm tree, it will drop ripe dates for you.
"Eat and drink, and be happy. When you see anyone, say, 'I have made a vow of silence; I am not talking today to anyone.' "
She came to her family, carrying him. They said, "O Mary, you have committed something that is totally unexpected.
"O descendant of Aaron, your father was not a bad man, nor was your mother unchaste."
She pointed to him. They said, "How can we talk with an infant in the crib?"
(The infant spoke and) said, "I am a servant of GOD. He has given me the scripture, and has appointed me a prophet.
"He made me blessed wherever I go, and enjoined me to observe the Contact Prayers (Salat) and the obligatory charity (Zakat) for as long as I live.
"I am to honor my mother; He did not make me a disobedient rebel.
"And peace be upon me the day I was born, the day I die, and the day I get resurrected."
That was Jesus, the son of Mary, and this is the truth of this matter, about which they continue to doubt.
It does not befit GOD that He begets a son, be He glorified. To have anything done, He simply says to it, "Be," and it is.
He also proclaimed, "GOD is my Lord and your Lord; you shall worship Him alone. This is the right path."
The various parties disputed among themselves (regarding the identity of Jesus). Therefore, woe to those who disbelieve from the sight of a terrible day.
Wait till you hear them and see them when they come to face us. The transgressors on that day will be totally lost.
Warn them about the day of remorse, when judgment will be issued. They are totally oblivious; they do not believe.
We are the ones who inherit the earth and everyone on it; to us everyone will be returned.
Mention in the scripture Abraham; he was a saint, a prophet.
He said to his father, "O my father, why do you worship what can neither hear, nor see, nor help you in any way?
"O my father, I have received certain knowledge that you did not receive. Follow me, and I will guide you in a straight path.
"O my father, do not worship the devil. The devil has rebelled against the Most Gracious.
"O my father, I fear lest you incur retribution from the Most Gracious, then become an ally of the devil."
He said, "Have you forsaken my gods, O Abraham? Unless you stop, I will stone you. Leave me alone."
He said, "Peace be upon you. I will implore my Lord to forgive you; He has been Most Kind to me.
"I will abandon you and the gods you worship beside GOD. I will worship only my Lord. By imploring my Lord alone, I cannot go wrong."
Because he abandoned them and the gods they worshiped beside GOD, we granted him Isaac and Jacob, and we made each of them a prophet.
We showered them with our mercy, and we granted them an honorable position in history.
Mention in the scripture Moses. He was devoted, and he was a messenger prophet.
We called him from the right side of Mount Sinai. We brought him close, to confer with him.
And we granted him, out of our mercy, his brother Aaron as a prophet.
And mention in the scripture Ismail. He was truthful when he made a promise, and he was a messenger prophet.
He used to enjoin his family to observe the Contact Prayers (Salat) and the obligatory charity (Zakat); he was acceptable to his Lord.
And mention in the scripture Idris. He was a saint, a prophet.
We raised him to an honorable rank.
These are some of the prophets whom GOD blessed. They were chosen from among the descendants of Adam, and the descendants of those whom we carried with Noah, and the descendants of Abraham and Israel, and from among those whom we guided and selected. When the revelations of the Most Gracious are recited to them, they fall prostrate, weeping.
After them, He substituted generations who lost the Contact Prayers (Salat), and pursued their lusts. They will suffer the consequences.
Only those who repent, believe, and lead a righteous life will enter Paradise, without the least injustice.
The gardens of Eden await them, as promised by the Most Gracious for those who worship Him, even in even in privacy. Certainly, His promise must come to pass.
They will not hear any nonsense therein; only peace. They receive their provisions therein, day and night.
Such is Paradise; we grant it to those among our servants who are righteous.
We do not come down except by the command of your Lord. To Him belongs our past, our future, and everything between them. Your Lord is never forgetful.
The Lord of the heavens and the earth, and everything between them; you shall worship Him and steadfastly persevere in worshiping Him. Do you know of anyone who equals Him?
The human being asks, "After I die, do I come back to life?"
Did the human being forget that we created him already, and he was nothing?
By your Lord, we will certainly summon them, together with the devils, and will gather them around Hell, humiliated.
Then we will pick out from each group the most ardent opponent of the Most Gracious.
We know full well those who are most deserving of burning therein.
Every single one of you must see it; this is an irrevocable decision of your Lord.
Then we rescue the righteous, and leave the transgressors in it, humiliated.
When our revelations are recited to them, clearly, those who disbelieve say to those who believe, "Which of us is more prosperous? Which of us is in the majority?"
Many a generation have we annihilated before them; they were more powerful, and more prosperous.
Say, "Those who choose to go astray, the Most Gracious will lead them on, until they see what is promised for them- either the retribution or the Hour. That is when they find out who really is worse off, and weaker in power."
GOD augments the guidance of those who choose to be guided. For the good deeds are eternally rewarded by your Lord, and bring far better returns.
Have you noted the one who rejected our revelations then said, "I will be given wealth and children"?!
Has he seen the future? Has he taken such a pledge from the Most Gracious?
Indeed, we will record what he utters, then commit him to ever-increasing retribution.
Then we inherit everything he possessed, and he comes back to us all alone.
They worship beside GOD other gods that (they think) may be of help to them.
On the contrary, they will reject their idolatry, and will be their enemies.
Do you not see how we unleash the devils upon the disbelievers to stir them up?
Do not be impatient; we are preparing for them some preparation.
The day will come when we summon the righteous before the Most Gracious in a group.
And we will herd the guilty to Hell, to be their eternal abode.
No one will possess the power to intercede, except those who conform to the laws of the Most Gracious.
They said, "The Most Gracious has begotten a son"!
You have uttered a gross blasphemy.
The heavens are about to shatter, the earth is about to tear asunder, and the mountains are about to crumble.
Because they claim that the Most Gracious has begotten a son.
It is not befitting the Most Gracious that He should beget a son.
Every single one in the heavens and the earth is a servant of the Most Gracious.
He has encompassed them, and has counted them one by one.
All of them will come before Him on the Day of Resurrection as individuals.
Surely, those who believe and lead a righteous life, the Most Gracious will shower them with love.
We thus made this (Quran) elucidated in your tongue, in order to deliver good news to the righteous, and to warn with it the opponents.
Many a generation before them we annihilated; can you perceive any of them, or hear from them any sound?
T. H.
We did not reveal the Quran to you, to cause you any hardship.
Only to remind the reverent.
A revelation from the Creator of the earth and the high heavens.
The Most Gracious; He has assumed all authority.
To Him belongs everything in the heavens, and the earth, and everything between them, and everything beneath the ground.
Whether you declare your convictions (or not) He knows the secret, and what is even more hidden.
GOD: there is no other god besides Him. To Him belong the most beautiful names.
Have you noted the history of Moses?
When he saw a fire, he said to his family, "Stay here. I have seen a fire. Maybe I can bring you some of it, or find some guidance at the fire."
When he came to it, he was called, "O, Moses.
"I am your Lord; remove your sandals. You are in the sacred valley, Tuwa.
"I have chosen you, so listen to what is being revealed.
"I am GOD; there is no other god beside Me. you shall worship Me alone, and observe the Contact Prayers (Salat) to remember Me.
"The Hour (end of the world) is surely coming; I will keep it almost hidden, for each soul must be paid for its works.
"Do not be diverted therefrom by those who do do not believe in it-those who pursue their own opinions-lest you fall.
"What is this in your right hand, Moses?"
He said, "This is my staff. I lean on it, herd my sheep with it, and I use it for other purposes."
He said, "Throw it down, Moses."
He threw it down, whereupon it turned into a moving serpent.
He said, "Pick it up; do not be afraid. We will return it to its original state.
"And hold your hand under your wing; it will come out white without a blemish; another proof.
"We thus show you some of our great portents.
"Go to Pharaoh, for he has transgressed."
He said, "My Lord, cool my temper.
"And make this matter easy for me.
"And untie a knot from my tongue.
"So they can understand my speech.
"And appoint an assistant for me from my family.
"My brother Aaron.
"Strengthen me with him.
"Let him be my partner in this matter.
"That we may glorify You frequently.
"And commemorate You frequently.
"You are Seer of us."
He said, "Your request is granted, O Moses.
"We have blessed you another time.
"When we revealed to your mother what we revealed.
"Saying: 'Throw him into the box, then throw him into the river. The river will throw him onto the shore, to be picked up by an enemy of Mine and an enemy of his.' I showered you with love from Me, and I had you made before My watchful eye.
"Your sister walked to them and said, 'I can tell you about a nursing mother who can take good care of him.' We thus returned you to your mother, that she may be happy and stop worrying. And when you killed a person, we saved you from the grievous consequences; indeed we tested you thoroughly. You stayed years with the people of Midyan, and now you have come back in accordance with a precise plan.
"I have made you just for Me.
"Go with your brother, supported by My signs, and do not waver in remembering Me.
"Go to Pharaoh, for he transgressed.
"Speak to him nicely; he may take heed, or become reverent."
They said, "Our Lord, we fear lest he may attack us, or transgress."
He said, "Do not be afraid, for I will be with you, listening and watching.
"Go to him and say, 'We are two messengers from your Lord. Let the Children of Israel go. You must refrain from persecuting them. We bring a sign from your Lord, and peace is the lot of those who heed the guidance.
"'We have been inspired that the retribution will inevitably afflict those who disbelieve and turn away.' "
He said, "Who is your Lord, O Moses."
He said, "Our Lord is the One who granted everything its existence, and its guidance."
He said, "What about the past generations?"
He said, "The knowledge thereof is with my Lord in a record. My Lord never errs, nor does He forget."
He is the One who made the earth habitable for you, and paved in it roads for you. And He sends down from the sky water with which we produce many different kinds of plants.
Eat and raise your livestock. These are sufficient proofs for those who possess intelligence.
From it we created you, into it we return you, and from it we bring you out once more.
We showed him all our proofs, but he disbelieved and refused.
He said, "Did you come here to take us out of our land with your magic, O Moses?
"We will surely show you similar magic. Therefore, set an appointment that neither we, nor you will violate; in a neutral place."
He said, "Your appointed time shall be the day of festivities. Let us all meet in the forenoon."
Pharaoh summoned his forces, then came.
Moses said to them, "Woe to you. Do you fabricate lies to fight GOD and thus incur His retribution? Such fabricators will surely fail."
They disputed among themselves, as they conferred privately.
They said, "These two are no more than magicians who wish to take you out of your land with their magic, and to destroy your ideal way of life.
"Let us agree upon one scheme and face them as a united front. The winner today will have the upper hand."
They said, "O Moses, either you throw, or we will be the first to throw."
He said, "You throw." Whereupon, their ropes and sticks appeared to him, because of their magic, as if they were moving.
Moses harbored some fear.
We said, "Have no fear. You will prevail.
"Throw what you hold in your right hand, and it will swallow what they fabricated. What they fabricated is no more than the scheming of a magician. The magician's work will not succeed."
The magicians fell prostrate, saying, "We believe in the Lord of Aaron and Moses."
He said, "Did you believe in him without my permission? He must be your chief; the one who taught you magic. I will surely sever your hands and feet on alternate sides. I will crucify you on the palm trunks. You will find out which of us can inflict the worst retribution, and who outlasts whom."
They said, "We will not prefer you over the clear proofs that came to us, and over the One who created us. Therefore, issue whatever judgment you wish to issue. You can only rule in this lowly life.
"We have believed in our Lord, that He may forgive us our sins, and the magic that you forced us to perform. GOD is far better and Everlasting."
Anyone who comes to his Lord guilty will incur Hell, wherein he never dies, nor stays alive.
As for those who come to Him as believers who had led a righteous life, they attain the high ranks.
The gardens of Eden, beneath which rivers flow, will be their abode forever. Such is the reward for those who purify themselves.
We inspired Moses: "Lead My servants out, and strike for them a dry road across the sea. You shall not fear that you may get caught, nor shall you worry."
Pharaoh pursued them with his troops, but the sea overwhelmed them, as it was destined to overwhelm them.
Thus, Pharaoh misled his people; he did not guide them.
O Children of Israel, we delivered you from your enemy, summoned you to the right side of Mount Sinai, and we sent down to you manna and quails.
Eat from the good things we provided for you, and do not transgress, lest you incur My wrath. Whoever incurs My wrath has fallen.
I am surely Forgiving for those who repent, believe, lead a righteous life, and steadfastly remain guided.
"Why did you rush away from your people, O Moses?"
He said, "They are close behind me. I have rushed to You my Lord, that You may be pleased."
He said, "We have put your people to the test after you left, but the Samarian misled them."
Moses returned to his people, angry and disappointed, saying, "O my people, did your Lord not promise you a good promise? Could you not wait? Did you want to incur wrath from your Lord? Is this why you broke your agreement with me?"
They said, "We did not break our agreement with you on purpose. But we were loaded down with jewelry, and decided to throw our loads in. This is what the Samarian suggested."
He produced for them a sculpted calf, complete with a calf's sound. They said, "This is your god, and the god of Moses." Thus, he forgot.
Could they not see that it neither responded to them, nor possessed any power to harm them, or benefit them?
And Aaron had told them, "O my people, this is a test for you. Your only Lord is the Most Gracious, so follow me, and obey my commands."
They said, "We will continue to worship it, until Moses comes back."
(Moses) said, "O Aaron, what is it that prevented you, when you saw them go astray,
"from following my orders? Have you rebelled against me?"
He said, "O son of my mother; do not pull me by my beard and my head. I was afraid that you might say, 'You have divided the Children of Israel, and disobeyed my orders.' "
He said, "What is the matter with you, O Samarian?"
He said, "I saw what they could not see. I grabbed a fistful (of dust) from the place where the messenger stood, and used it (to mix into the golden calf). This is what my mind inspired me to do."
He said, "Then go, and, throughout your life, do not even come close. You have an appointed time (for your final judgment) that you can never evade. Look at your god that you used to worship; we will burn it and throw it into the sea, to stay down there forever."
Your only god is GOD; the One beside whom there is no other god. His knowledge encompasses all things.
We thus narrate to you some news from the past generations. We have revealed to you a message from us.
Those who disregard it will bear a load (of sins) on the Day of Resurrection.
Eternally they abide therein; what a miserable load on the Day of Resurrection!
That is the day when the horn is blown, and we summon the guilty on that day blue.
Whispering among themselves, they will say, "You have stayed (in the first life) no more than ten days!"
We are fully aware of their utterances. The most accurate among them will say, "You stayed no more than a day."
They ask you about the mountains. Say, "My Lord will wipe them out.
"He will leave them like a barren, flat land.
"Not even the slightest hill will you see therein, nor a dip."
On that day, everyone will follow the caller, without the slightest deviation. All sounds will be hushed before the Most Gracious; you will hear nothing but whispers.
On that day, intercession will be useless, except for those permitted by the Most Gracious, and whose utterances conform to His will.
He knows their past and their future, while none encompasses His knowledge.
All faces will submit to the Living, the Eternal, and those who are burdened by their transgressions will fail.
As for those who worked righteousness, while believing, they will have no fear of injustice or adversity.
We thus revealed it, an Arabic Quran, and we cited in it all kinds of prophecies, that they may be saved, or it may cause them to take heed.
Most Exalted is GOD, the only true King. Do not rush into uttering the Quran before it is revealed to you, and say, "My Lord, increase my knowledge."
We tested Adam in the past, but he forgot, and we found him indecisive.
Recall that we said to the angels, "Fall prostrate before Adam." They fell prostrate, except Satan; he refused.
We then said, "O Adam, this is an enemy of you and your wife. Do not let him evict you from Paradise, lest you become miserable.
"You are guaranteed never to hunger therein, nor go unsheltered.
"Nor will you thirst therein, nor suffer from any heat."
But the devil whispered to him, saying, "O Adam, let me show you the tree of eternity and unending kingship."
They ate from it, whereupon their bodies became visible to them, and they tried to cover themselves with the leaves of Paradise. Adam thus disobeyed his Lord, and fell.
Subsequently, his Lord chose him, redeemed him, and guided him.
He said, "Go down therefrom, all of you. You are enemies of one another. When guidance comes to you from Me, anyone who follows My guidance will not go astray, nor suffer any misery.
"As for the one who disregards My message, he will have a miserable life, and we resurrect him, on the Day of Resurrection, blind."
He will say, "My Lord, why did you summon me blind, when I used to be a seer?"
He will say, "Because you forgot our revelations when they came to you, you are now forgotten."
We thus requite those who transgress and refuse to believe in the revelations of their Lord. The retribution in the Hereafter is far worse and everlasting.
Does it ever occur to them how many previous generations we have annihilated? They are now walking in the homes of those before them. These are signs for those who possess intelligence.
If it were not for your Lord's predetermined plan, they would have been judged immediately.
Therefore, be patient in the face of their utterances, and praise and glorify your Lord before sunrise and before sunset. And during the night glorify Him, as well as at both ends of the day, that you may be happy.
And do not covet what we bestowed upon any other people. Such are temporary ornaments of this life, whereby we put them to the test. What your Lord provides for you is far better, and everlasting.
You shall enjoin your family to observe the contact prayers (Salat), and steadfastly persevere in doing so. We do not ask you for any provisions; we are the ones who provide for you. The ultimate triumph belongs to the righteous.
They said, "If he could only show us a miracle from his Lord!" Did they not receive sufficient miracles with the previous messages?
Had we annihilated them before this, they would have said, "Our Lord, had You sent a messenger to us, we would have followed Your revelations, and would have avoided this shame and humiliation."
Say, "All of us are waiting, so wait; you will surely find out who are on the correct path, and who are truly guided."
Fast approaching is the reckoning for the people, but they are oblivious, averse.
When a proof comes to them from their Lord, that is new, they listen to it heedlessly.
Their minds are heedless. And the transgressors confer secretly: "Is he not just a human being like you? Would you accept the magic that is presented to you?"
He said, "My Lord knows every thought in the heaven and the earth. He is the Hearer, the Omniscient."
They even said, "Hallucinations," "He made it up," and, "He is a poet. Let him show us a miracle like those of the previous messengers."
We never annihilated a believing community in the past. Are these people believers?
We did not send before you except men whom we inspired. Ask those who know the scripture, if you do not know.
We did not give them bodies that did not eat, nor were they immortal.
We fulfilled our promise to them; we saved them together with whomever we willed, and annihilated the transgressors.
We have sent down to you a scripture containing your message. Do you not understand?
Many a community we terminated because of their transgression, and we substituted other people in their place.
When our requital came to pass, they started to run.
Do not run, and come back to your luxuries and your mansions, for you must be held accountable.
They said, "Woe to us. We were really wicked."
This continued to be their proclamation, until we completely wiped them out.
We did not create the heavens and the earth, and everything between them just for amusement.
If we needed amusement, we could have initiated it without any of this, if that is what we wanted to do.
Instead, it is our plan to support the truth against falsehood, in order to defeat it. Woe to you for the utterances you utter.
To Him belongs everyone in the heavens and the earth, and those at Him are never too arrogant to worship Him, nor do they ever waver.
They glorify night and day, without ever tiring.
Have they found gods on earth who can create?
If there were in them (the heavens and the earth) other gods beside GOD, there would have been chaos. Glory be to GOD; the Lord with absolute authority. He is high above their claims.
He is never to be asked about anything He does, while all others are questioned.
Have they found other gods beside Him? Say, "Show me your proof. This is the message to my generation, consummating all previous messages." Indeed, most of them do not recognize the truth; this is why they are so hostile.
We did not send any messenger before you except with the inspiration: "There is no god except Me; you shall worship Me alone."
Yet, they said, "The Most Gracious has begotten a son!" Glory be to Him. All (messengers) are (His) honored servants.
They never speak on their own, and they strictly follow His commands.
He knows their future and their past. They do not intercede, except for those already accepted by Him, and they are worried about their own necks.
If any of them claims to be a god beside Him, we requite him with Hell; we thus requite the wicked.
Do the unbelievers not realize that the heaven and the earth used to be one solid mass that we exploded into existence? And from water we made all living things. Would they believe?
And we placed on earth stabilizers, lest it tumbles with them, and we placed straight roads therein, that they may be guided.
And we rendered the sky a guarded ceiling. Yet, they are totally oblivious to all the portents therein.
And He is the One who created the night and the day, and the sun and the moon; each floating in its own orbit.
We never decreed immortality for anyone before you; should you die, are they immortal?
Every person will taste death, after we put you to the test through adversity and prosperity, then to us you ultimately return.
When those who disbelieve see you, they ridicule you: "Is this the one who challenges your gods?" Meanwhile, they remain totally heedless of the message from the Most Gracious.
The human being is impatient by nature. I will inevitably show you My signs; do not be in such a hurry.
They challenge: "Where is that (retribution), if you are truthful?"
If only those who disbelieve could envision themselves when they try to ward off the fire- off their faces and their backs! No one will help them then.
Indeed, it will come to them suddenly, and they will be utterly stunned. They can neither avoid it, nor can they receive any respite.
Messengers before you have been ridiculed, and, consequently, those who ridiculed them incurred the retribution for their ridiculing.
Say, "Who can protect you from the Most Gracious during the night or during the day?" Indeed, they are totally oblivious to the message of their Lord.
Do they have gods who can protect them from us? They cannot even help themselves. Nor can they accompany one another when they are summoned to face us.
We have provided for these people and their ancestors, up until an old age. Do they not see that every day on earth brings them closer to the end? Can they reverse this process?
Say, "I am warning you in accordance with divine inspiration." However, the deaf cannot hear the call, when they are warned.
When a sample of your Lord's retribution afflicts them, they readily say, "We were indeed wicked."
We will establish the scales of justice on the Day of Resurrection. No soul will suffer the least injustice. Even the equivalent of a mustard seed will be accounted for. We are the most efficient reckoners.
We gave Moses and Aaron the Statute Book, a beacon, and a reminder for the righteous.
The ones who reverence their Lord, even when alone in their privacy, and they worry about the Hour.
This too is a blessed reminder that we sent down. Are you denying it?
Before that, we granted Abraham his guidance and understanding, for we were fully aware of him.
He said to his father and his people, "What are these statues to which you are devoting yourselves?"
They said, "We found our parents worshiping them."
He said, "Indeed, you and your parents have gone totally astray."
They said, "Are you telling us the truth, or are you playing?"
He said, "Your only Lord is the Lord of the heavens and the earth, who created them. This is the testimony to which I bear witness.
"I swear by GOD, I have a plan to deal with your statues, as soon as you leave."
He broke them into pieces, except for a big one, that they may refer to it.
They said, "Whoever did this to our gods is really a transgressor."
They said, "We heard a youth threaten them; he is called Abraham."
They said, "Bring him before the eyes of all the people, that they may bear witness."
They said, "Did you do this to our gods, O Abraham?"
He said, "It is that big one who did it. Go ask them, if they can speak."
They were taken aback, and said to themselves, "Indeed, you are the ones who have been transgressing."
Yet, they reverted to their old ideas: "You know full well that these cannot speak."
He said, "Do you then worship beside GOD what possesses no power to benefit you or harm you?
"You have incurred shame by worshiping idols beside GOD. Do you not understand?"
They said, "Burn him and support your gods, if this is what you decide to do."
We said, "O fire, be cool and safe for Abraham."
Thus, they schemed against him, but we made them the losers.
We saved him, and we saved Lot, to the land that we blessed for all the people.
And we granted him Isaac and Jacob as a gift, and we made them both righteous.
We made them imams who guided in accordance with our commandments, and we taught them how to work righteousness, and how to observe the Contact Prayers (Salat) and the obligatory charity (Zakat). To us, they were devoted worshipers.
As for Lot, we granted him wisdom and knowledge, and we saved him from the community that practiced abominations; they were wicked and evil people.
We admitted him into our mercy, for he was righteous.
And, before that, Noah called and we responded to him. We saved him and his family from the great disaster.
We supported him against the people who rejected our revelations. They were evil people, so we drowned them all.
And David and Solomon, when they once ruled with regard to someone's crop that was destroyed by another's sheep, we witnessed their judgment.
We granted Solomon the correct understanding, though we endowed both of them with wisdom and knowledge. We committed the mountains to serve David in glorifying (God), as well as the birds. This is what we did.
And we taught him the skill of making shields to protect you in war. Are you then thankful?
For Solomon, we committed the wind gusting and blowing at his disposal. He could direct it as he wished, to whatever land he chose, and we blessed such land for him. We are fully aware of all things.
And of the devils there were those who would dive for him (to harvest the sea), or do whatever else he commanded them to do. We committed them in his service.
And Job implored his Lord: "Adversity has befallen me, and, of all the merciful ones, You are the Most Merciful."
We responded to him, relieved his adversity, and restored his family for him, even twice as much. That was a mercy from us, and a reminder for the worshipers.
Also, Ismail, Idris, Zal-Kifl; all were steadfast, patient.
We admitted them into our mercy, for they were righteous.
And Zan-Noon (Jonah, "the one with an 'N' in his name"), abandoned his mission in protest, thinking that we could not control him. He ended up imploring from the darkness (of the big fish's belly): "There is no god other than You. Be You glorified. I have committed a gross sin."
We responded to him, and saved him from the crisis; we thus save the believers.
And Zachariah implored his Lord: "My Lord, do not keep me without an heir, though You are the best inheritor."
We responded to him and granted him John; we fixed his wife for him. That is because they used to hasten to work righteousness, and implored us in situations of joy, as well as fear. To us, they were reverent.
As for the one who maintained her virginity, we blew into her from our spirit, and thus, we made her and her son a portent for the whole world.
Your congregation is but one congregation, and I alone am your Lord; you shall worship Me alone.
However, they divided themselves into disputing religions. All of them will come back to us (for judgment).
As for those who work righteousness, while believing, their work will not go to waste; we are recording it.
It is forbidden for any community we had annihilated to return.
Not until Gog and Magog reap- pear, will they then return-they will come from every direction.
That is when the inevitable prophecy will come to pass, and the disbelievers will stare in horror: "Woe to us; we have been oblivious. Indeed, we have been wicked."
You and the idols you worship besides GOD will be fuel for Hell; this is your inevitable destiny.
If those were gods, they would not have ended up in Hell. All its inhabitants abide in it forever.
They will sigh and groan therein, and they will have no access to any news.
As for those who deserved our magnificent rewards, they will be protected from it.
They will not hear its hissing. They will enjoy an abode where they can get everything they desire, forever.
The great horror will not worry them, and the angels will receive them joyfully: "This is your day, that has been promised to you."
On that day, we will fold the heaven, like the folding of a book. Just as we initiated the first creation, we will repeat it. This is our promise; we will certainly carry it out.
We have decreed in the Psalms, as well as in other scriptures, that the earth shall be inherited by My righteous worshipers.
This is a proclamation for people who are worshipers.
We have sent you out of mercy from us towards the whole world.
Proclaim, "I have been given divine inspiration that your god is one god. Will you then submit?"
If they turn away, then say, "I have warned you sufficiently, and I have no idea how soon or late (the retribution) will come to you.
"He is fully aware of your public utterances, and He is fully aware of everything you conceal.
"For all that I know, this world is a test for you, and a temporary enjoyment."
Say, "My Lord, Your judgment is the absolute justice. Our Lord is the Most Gracious; only His help is sought in the face of your claims."
O people, you shall reverence your Lord, for the quaking of the Hour is something horrendous.
The day you witness it, even a nursing mother will discard her infant, and a pregnant woman will abort her fetus. You will see the people staggering, as if they are intoxicated, even though they are not intoxicated. This is because GOD's retribution is so awesome.
Among the people, there are those who argue about GOD without knowledge, and follow every rebellious devil.
It is decreed that anyone who allies himself with him, he will mislead him and guide him to the agony of Hell.
O people, if you have any doubt about resurrection, (remember that) we created you from dust, and subsequently from a tiny drop, which turns into a hanging (embryo), then it becomes a fetus that is given life or deemed lifeless. We thus clarify things for you. We settle in the wombs whatever we will for a predetermined period. We then bring you out as infants, then you reach maturity. While some of you die young, others live to the worst age, only to find out that no more knowledge can be attained beyond a certain limit. Also, you look at a land that is dead, then as soon as we shower it with water, it vibrates with life and grows all kinds of beautiful plants.
This proves that GOD is the Truth, and that He revives the dead, and that He is Omnipotent.
And that the Hour is coming, no doubt about it, and that GOD resurrects those who are in the graves.
Among the people there is the one who argues about GOD without knowledge, and without guidance, and without an enlightening scripture.
Arrogantly he strives to divert the people from the path of GOD. He thus incurs humiliation in this life, and we commit him on the Day of Resurrection to the agony of burning.
This is what your hands have sent ahead for you. GOD is never unjust towards the people.
Among the people there is the one who worships GOD conditionally. If things go his way, he is content. But if some adversity befalls him, he makes an about-face. Thus, he loses both this life and the Hereafter. Such is the real loss.
He idolizes beside GOD what possesses no power to harm him or benefit him; such is the real straying.
He idolizes what is more apt to harm him than benefit him. What a miserable lord! What a miserable companion!
GOD admits those who believe and lead a righteous life into gardens with flowing streams. Everything is in accordance with GOD's will.
If anyone thinks that GOD cannot support him in this life and in the Hereafter, let him turn completely to (his creator in) heaven, and sever (his dependence on anyone else). He will then see that this plan eliminates anything that bothers him.
We have thus revealed clear revelations herein, then GOD guides whoever wills (to be guided).
Those who believe, those who are Jewish, the converts, the Christians, the Zoroastrians, and the idol worshipers, GOD is the One who will judge among them on the Day of Resurrection. GOD witnesses all things.
Do you not realize that to GOD prostrates everyone in the heavens and the earth, and the sun, and the moon, and the stars, and the mountains, and the trees, and the animals, and many people? Many others among the people are committed to doom. Whomever GOD shames, none will honor him. Everything is in accordance with GOD's will.
Here are two parties feuding with regard to their Lord. As for those who disbelieve, they will have clothes of fire tailored for them. Hellish liquid will be poured on top of their heads.
It will cause their insides to melt, as well as their skins.
They will be confined in iron pots.
Whenever they try to exit such misery, they will be forced back in: "Taste the agony of burning."
GOD will admit those who believe and lead a righteous life into gardens with flowing streams. They will be adorned therein with bracelets of gold, and pearls, and their garments therein will be silk.
They have been guided to the good words; they have been guided in the path of the Most Praised.
Surely, those who disbelieve and repulse others from the path of GOD, and from the Sacred Masjid that we designated for all the people- be they natives or visitors- and seek to pollute it and corrupt it, we will afflict them with painful retribution.
We appointed Abraham to establish the Shrine: "You shall not idolize any other god beside Me, and purify My shrine for those who visit it, those who live near it, and those who bow and prostrate.
"And proclaim that the people shall observe Hajj pilgrimage. They will come to you walking or riding on various exhausted (means of transportation). They will come from the farthest locations."
They may seek commercial benefits, and they shall commemorate GOD's name during the specified days for providing them with livestock. "Eat therefrom and feed the despondent and the poor."
They shall complete their obligations, fulfill their vows, and visit the ancient shrine.
Those who reverence the rites decreed by GOD have deserved a good reward at their Lord. All livestock is made lawful for your food, except for those specifically prohibited for you. You shall avoid the abomination of idol worship, and avoid bearing false witness.
You shall maintain your devotion absolutely to GOD alone. Anyone who sets up any idol beside GOD is like one who fell from the sky, then gets snatched up by vultures, or blown away by the wind into a deep ravine.
Indeed, those who reverence the rites decreed by GOD demonstrate the righteousness of their hearts.
The (livestock) provide you with many benefits for a period, before being donated to the ancient shrine.
For each congregation we have decreed rites whereby they commemorate the name of GOD for providing them with the livestock. Your god is one and the same god; you shall all submit to Him. Give good news to the obedient.
They are the ones whose hearts tremble upon mentioning GOD, they steadfastly persevere during adversity, they observe the Contact Prayers (Salat), and from our provisions to them, they give to charity.
The animal offerings are among the rites decreed by GOD for your own good. You shall mention GOD's name on them while they are standing in line. Once they are offered for sacrifice, you shall eat therefrom and feed the poor and the needy. This is why we subdued them for you, that you may show your appreciation.
Neither their meat, nor their blood reaches GOD. What reaches Him is your righteousness. He has subdued them for you, that you may show your appreciation by glorifying GOD for guiding you. Give good news to the charitable.
GOD defends those who believe. GOD does not love any betrayer, unappreciative.
Permission is granted to those who are being persecuted, since injustice has befallen them, and GOD is certainly able to support them.
They were evicted from their homes unjustly, for no reason other than saying, "Our Lord is GOD." If it were not for GOD's supporting of some people against others, monasteries, churches, synagogues, and masjids-where the name of GOD is commemorated frequently- would have been destroyed. Absolutely, GOD supports those who support Him. GOD is Powerful, Almighty.
They are those who, if we appointed them as rulers on earth, they would establish the Contact Prayers (Salat) and the obligatory charity (Zakat), and would advocate righteousness and forbid evil. GOD is the ultimate ruler.
If they reject you, the people of Noah, 'Ad, and Thamud have also disbelieved before them.
Also the people of Abraham, and the people of Lot.
And the dwellers of Midyan. Moses was also rejected. I led all those people on, then I called them to account; how (devastating) was My requital!
Many a community we have annihilated because of their wickedness. They ended up in ruins, stilled wells, and great empty mansions.
Did they not roam the earth, then use their minds to understand, and use their ears to hear? Indeed, the real blindness is not the blindness of the eyes, but the blindness of the hearts inside the chests.
They challenge you to bring retribution, and GOD never fails to fulfill His prophecy. A day of your Lord is like a thousand of your years.
Many a community in the past committed evil, and I led them on for awhile, then I punished them. To Me is the ultimate destiny.
Say, "O people, I have been sent to you as a profound warner."
Those who believe and lead a righteous life have deserved forgiveness and a generous recompense.
As for those who strive to challenge our revelations, they incur Hell.
We did not send before you any messenger, nor a prophet, without having the devil interfere in his wishes. GOD then nullifies what the devil has done. GOD perfects His revelations. GOD is Omniscient, Most Wise.
He thus sets up the devil's scheme as a test for those who harbor doubts in their hearts, and those whose hearts are hardened. The wicked must remain with the opposition.
Those who are blessed with knowledge will recognize the truth from your Lord, then believe in it, and their hearts will readily accept it. Most assuredly, GOD guides the believers in the right path.
As for those who disbelieve, they will continue to harbor doubts until the Hour comes to them suddenly, or until the retribution of a terrible day comes to them.
All sovereignty on that day belongs to GOD, and He will judge among them. As for those who believe and lead a righteous life, they have deserved the gardens of bliss.
While those who disbelieved and rejected our revelations have incurred a shameful retribution.
Those who emigrate for the sake of GOD, then get killed, or die, GOD will surely shower them with good provisions. GOD is certainly the best Provider.
Most assuredly, He will admit them an admittance that will please them. GOD is Omniscient, Clement.
It is decreed that if one avenges an injustice that was inflicted upon him, equitably, then he is persecuted because of this, GOD will surely support him. GOD is Pardoner, Forgiving.
It is a fact that GOD merges the night into the day, and merges the day into the night, and that GOD is Hearer, Seer.
It is a fact that GOD is the Truth, while the setting up of any idols beside Him constitutes a falsehood, and that GOD is the Most High, the Supreme.
Do you not see that GOD sends down from the sky water that turns the land green? GOD is Sublime, Cognizant.
To Him belongs everything in the heavens and everything on earth. Absolutely, GOD is the Most Rich, Most Praiseworthy.
Do you not see that GOD has committed in your service everything on earth? The ships run in the ocean by His command. He prevents the heavenly bodies from crashing onto the earth, except in accordance with His command. GOD is Most Kind towards the people, Most Merciful.
He is the One who granted you life, then He puts you to death, then He brings you back to life. Surely, the human being is unappreciative.
For each congregation, we have decreed a set of rites that they must uphold. Therefore, they should not dispute with you. You shall continue to invite everyone to your Lord. Most assuredly, you are on the right path.
If they argue with you, then say, "GOD is fully aware of everything you do."
GOD will judge among you on the Day of Resurrection regarding all your disputes.
Do you not realize that GOD knows everything in the heavens and everything on earth? All this is recorded in a record. This is easy for GOD to do.
Yet, they idolize beside GOD idols wherein He placed no power, and they know nothing about them. The transgressors have no helper.
When our revelations are recited to them, clearly, you recognize wickedness on the faces of those who disbelieve. They almost attack those who recite our revelations to them. Say, "Shall I inform you of something much worse? Hell is promised by GOD for those who disbelieve; what a miserable destiny."
O people, here is a parable that you must ponder carefully: the idols you set up beside GOD can never create a fly, even if they banded together to do so. Furthermore, if the fly steals anything from them, they cannot recover it; weak is the pursuer and the pursued.
They do not value GOD as He should be valued. GOD is the Most Powerful, the Almighty.
GOD chooses from among the angels messengers, as well as from among the people. GOD is Hearer, Seer.
He knows their past and their future. To GOD belongs the ultimate control of all matters.
O you who believe, you shall bow, prostrate, worship your Lord, and work righteousness, that you may succeed.
You shall strive for the cause of GOD as you should strive for His cause. He has chosen you and has placed no hardship on you in practicing your religion-the religion of your father Abraham. He is the one who named you "Submitters" originally. Thus, the messenger shall serve as a witness among you, and you shall serve as witnesses among the people. Therefore, you shall observe the Contact Prayers (Salat) and give the obligatory charity (Zakat), and hold fast to GOD; He is your Lord, the best Lord and the best Supporter.
Successful indeed are the believers;
who are reverent during their Contact Prayers (Salat).
And they avoid vain talk.
And they give their obligatory charity (Zakat).
And they maintain their chastity.
Only with their spouses, or those who are rightfully theirs, do they have sexual relations; they are not to be blamed.
Those who transgress these limits are the transgressors.
When it comes to deposits entrusted to them, as well as any agreements they make, they are trustworthy.
And they observe their Contact Prayers (Salat) regularly.
Such are the inheritors.
They will inherit Paradise, wherein they abide forever.
We created the human being from a certain kind of mud.
Subsequently, we reproduced him from a tiny drop, that is placed into a well protected repository.
Then we developed the drop into a hanging (embryo), then developed the hanging (embryo) into a bite-size (fetus), then created the bite-size (fetus) into bones, then covered the bones with flesh. We thus produce a new creature. Most blessed is GOD, the best Creator.
Then, later on, you die.
Then, on the Day of Resurrection, you will be resurrected.
We created above you seven universes in layers, and we are never unaware of a single creature in them.
We send down from the sky water, in exact measure, then we store it in the ground. Certainly, we can let it escape.
With it, we produce for you orchards of date palms, grapes, all kinds of fruits, and various foods.
Also, a tree native to Sinai produces oil, as well as relish for the eaters.
And the livestock should provide you with a lesson. We let you drink (milk) from their bellies, you derive other benefits from them, and some of them you use for food.
On them, and on the ships, you ride.
We sent Noah to his people, saying, "O my people, worship GOD. You have no other god beside Him. Would you not be righteous?"
The leaders who disbelieved among his people said, "This is no more than a human like you, who wants to gain prominence among you. Had GOD willed, He could have sent down angels. We never heard of anything like this from our ancestors.
"He is simply a man gone crazy. Just ignore him for awhile."
He said, "My Lord, grant me victory, for they have disbelieved me."
We then inspired him: "Make the watercraft under our watchful eyes, and in accordance with our inspiration. When our command comes, and the atmosphere boils up, put on it a pair of every kind (of your domesticated animals), and your family, except those condemned to be doomed.Do not speak to Me on behalf of those who transgressed; they will be drowned.
"Once you are settled, together with those who are with you, on the watercraft, you shall say, 'Praise GOD for saving us from the evil people.'
"And say, 'My Lord, let me disembark onto a blessed location; You are the best deliverer.' "
These should provide sufficient proofs for you. We will certainly put you to the test.
Subsequently, we established another generation after them.
We sent to them a messenger from among them, saying, "You shall worship GOD. You have no other god beside Him. Would you not be righteous?"
The leaders among his people who disbelieved and rejected the idea of the Hereafter-although we provided for them generously in this life-said, "This is no more than a human being like you. He eats from what you eat, and drinks as you drink.
"If you obey a human being like you, then you are really losers.
"Does he promise you that, after you die and turn into dust and bones, you will come out again?
"Impossible, impossible indeed is what is promised to you.
"We only live this life-we live and die-and we will never be resurrected.
"He is just a man who fabricated lies and attributed them to GOD. We will never believe him."
He said, "My Lord, grant me victory, for they have disbelieved me."
He said, "Soon they will be sorry."
The retribution struck them, equitably, and thus, we turned them into ruins. The wicked people perished.
Subsequently, we established other generations after them.
No community can advance its predetermined fate, nor delay it.
Then we sent our messengers in succession. Every time a messenger went to his community, they disbelieved him. Consequently, we annihilated them, one after the other, and made them history. The people who disbelieved have perished.
Then we sent Moses and his brother Aaron with our revelations and a profound proof.
To Pharaoh and his elders, but they turned arrogant. They were oppressive people.
They said, "Shall we believe for two men whose people are our slaves?"
They rejected the two, and conse- quently, they were annihilated.
We gave Moses the scripture, that they may be guided.
We made the son of Mary and his mother a sign, and we gave them refuge on a mesa with food and drink.
O you messengers, eat from the good provisions, and work righteousness. I am fully aware of everything you do.
Such is your congregation-one congregation-and I am your Lord; you shall reverence Me.
But they tore themselves into disputing factions; each party happy with what they have.
Therefore, just leave them in their confusion, for awhile.
Do they think that, since we provided them with money and children,
we must be showering them with blessings? Indeed, they have no idea.
Surely, those who are reverently conscious of their Lord,
And who believe in the revelations of their Lord,
And who never set up any idols beside their Lord,
As they give their charities, their hearts are fully reverent. For they recognize that they will be summoned before their Lord,
They are eager to do righteous works; they compete in doing them.
We never burden any soul beyond its means, and we keep a record that utters the truth. No one will suffer injustice.
Because their minds are oblivious to this, they commit works that do not conform with this; their works are evil.
Then, when we requite their leaders with retribution, they complain.
Do not complain now; you have given up all help from us.
My proofs have been presented to you, but you turned back on your heels.
You were too arrogant to accept them, and you defiantly disregarded them.
Why do they not reflect upon this scripture? Do they not realize that they have received something never attained by their ancestors?
Have they failed to recognize their messenger? Is this why they are disregarding him?
Have they decided that he is crazy? Indeed, he has brought the truth to them, but most of them hate the truth.
Indeed, if the truth conformed to their wishes, there would be chaos in the heavens and the earth; everything in them would be corrupted. We have given them their proof, but they are disregarding their proof.
Are you asking them for a wage? Your Lord's wage is far better. He is the best Provider.
Most assuredly, you are inviting them to a straight path.
Those who disbelieve in the Hereafter will surely deviate from the right path.
Even when we showered them with mercy, and relieved their problems, they plunged deeper into transgression, and continued to blunder.
Even when we afflicted them with retribution, they never turned to their Lord imploring.
Subsequently, when we requited them with the severe retribution they had incurred, they were shocked.
He is the One who granted you the hearing, the eyesight, and the brains. Rarely are you appreciative.
He is the One who established you on earth, and before Him you will be summoned.
He is the One who controls life and death, and He is the One who alternates the night and day. Do you not understand?
They said what their ancestors said.
They said, "After we die and become dust and bones, we get resurrected?
"Such promises were given to us and to our parents in the past. These are no more than tales from the past."
Say, "To whom belongs the earth and everyone on it, if you know?"
They will say, "To GOD." Say, "Why then do you not take heed?"
Say, "Who is the Lord of the seven universes; the Lord of the great dominion?"
They will say, "GOD." Say, "Why then do you not turn righteous?"
Say, "In whose hand is all sovereignty over all things, and He is the only one who can provide help, but needs no help, if you know?"
They will say, "GOD." Say, "Where did you go wrong?"
We have given them the truth, while they are liars.
GOD has never begotten a son.Nor was there ever any other god beside Him. Otherwise, each god would havedeclared independence with his creations, and they would have competed with each other for dominance. GOD be glorified; far above their claims.
The Knower of all secrets and declarations; be He exalted, far above having a partner.
Say, "My Lord, whether You show me (the retribution) they have incurred (or not),
"My Lord, let me not be one of the transgressing people."
To show you (the retribution) we have reserved for them is something we can easily do.
Therefore, counter their evil works with goodness; we are fully aware of their claims.
Say, "My Lord, I seek refuge inYou from the whispers of the devils.
"And I seek refuge in You, myLord, lest they come near me."
When death comes to one of them, he says, "My Lord, send me back.
"I will then work righteousness in everything I left." Not true. This is a false claim that he makes. A barrier will separate his soul from thisworld until resurrection.
When the horn is blown, no relations among them will exist on that day, nor will they care about one another.
As for those whose weights are heavy, they will be the winners.
Those whose weights are light are the ones who lost their souls; they abide in Hell forever.
Fire will overwhelm their faces, and they last miserably therein.
Were not My revelations recited to you, and you kept on rejecting them?
They will say, "Our Lord, our wickedness overwhelmed us, and we were people gone astray.
"Our Lord, take us out of this; if we return (to our old behavior), then we are really wicked."
He will say, "Abide therein, humiliated, and do not speak to Me.
"A group of My servants used to say, 'Our Lord, we have believed, so forgive us and shower us with mercy. Of all the merciful ones, You are the Most Merciful.'
"But you mocked and ridiculed them, to the extent that you forgot Me. You used to laugh at them.
"I have rewarded them today, in return for their steadfastness, by making them the winners."
He said, "How long have you lasted on earth? How many years?"
They said, "We lasted a day or part of a day. Ask those who counted."
He said, "In fact, you stayed but a brief interim, if you only knew.
"Did you think that we created you in vain; that you were not to be returned to us?"
Most exalted is GOD, the true Sovereign. There is no other god beside Him; the Most Honorable Lord, possessor of all authority.
Anyone who idolizes beside GOD any other god, and without any kind of proof, his reckoning rests with his Lord. The disbelievers never succeed.
Say, "My Lord, shower us with forgiveness and mercy. Of all the merciful ones, You are the Most Merciful."
A sura that we have sent down, and we have decreed as law. We have revealed in it clear revelations, that you may take heed.
The adulteress and the adulterer you shall whip each of them a hundred lashes. Do not be swayed by pity from carrying out GOD's law, if you truly believe in GOD and the Last Day. And let a group of believers witness their penalty.
The adulterer will end up marrying an adulteress or an idol worshiper, and the adulteress will end up marrying an adulterer or an idol worshiper. This is prohibited for the believers.
Those who accuse married women of adultery, then fail to produce four witnesses, you shall whip them eighty lashes, and do not accept any testimony from them; they are wicked.
If they repent afterwards and reform, then GOD is Forgiver, Merciful.
As for those who accuse their own spouses, without any other witnesses, then the testimony may be accepted if he swears by GOD four times that he is telling the truth.
The fifth oath shall be to incur GOD's condemnation upon him, if he was lying.
She shall be considered innocent if she swears by GOD four times that he is a liar.
The fifth oath shall incur GOD's wrath upon her if he was telling the truth.
This is GOD's grace and mercy towards you. GOD is Redeemer, Most Wise.
A gang among you produced a big lie. Do not think that it was bad for you; instead, it was good for you. Meanwhile, each one of them has earned his share of the guilt. As for the one who initiated the whole incident, he has incurred a terrible retribution.
When you heard it, the believing men and the believing women should have had better thoughts about themselves, and should have said, "This is obviously a big lie."
Only if they produced four witnesses (you may believe them). If they fail to produce the witnesses, then they are, according to GOD, liars.
If it were not for GOD's grace towards you, and His mercy in this world and in the Hereafter, you would have suffered a great retribution because of this incident.
You fabricated it with your own tongues, and the rest of you repeated it with your mouths without proof. You thought it was simple, when it was, according to GOD, gross.
When you heard it, you should have said, "We will not repeat this. Glory be to You. This is a gross falsehood."
GOD admonishes you that you shall never do it again, if you are believers.
GOD thus explains the revelations for you. GOD is Omniscient, Wise.
Those who love to see immorality spread among the believers have incurred a painful retribution in this life and in the Hereafter. GOD knows, while you do not know.
GOD showers you with His grace and mercy. GOD is Most Kind towards the believers, Most Merciful.
O you who believe, do not follow the steps of Satan. Anyone who follows the steps of Satan should know that he advocates evil and vice. If it were not for GOD's grace towards you, and His mercy, none of you would have been purified. But GOD purifies whomever He wills. GOD is Hearer, Knower.
Those among you who are blessed with resources and wealth shall be charitable towards their relatives, the poor, and those who have immigrated for the sake of GOD. They shall treat them with kindness and tolerance; do you not love to attain GOD's forgiveness? GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
Surely, those who falsely accuse married women who are pious believers have incurred condemnation in this life and in the Hereafter; they have incurred a horrendous retribution.
The day will come when their own tongues, hands, and feet will bear witness to everything they had done.
On that day, GOD will requite them fully for their works, and they will find out that GOD is the Truth.
The bad women for the bad men, and the bad men for the bad women, and the good women for the good men, and the good men for the good women. The latter are innocent of such accusations. They have attained forgiveness and a generous reward.
O you who believe, do not enter homes other than yours without permission from their inhabitants, and without greeting them. This is better for you, that you may take heed.
If you find no one in them, do not enter them until you obtain permission. If you are told, "Go back," you must go back. This is purer for you. GOD is fully aware of everything you do.
You commit no error by entering uninhabited homes wherein there is something that belongs to you. GOD knows everything you reveal, and everything you conceal.
Tell the believing men that they shall subdue their eyes (and not stare at the women), and to maintain their chastity. This is purer for them. GOD is fully Cognizant of everything they do.
And tell the believing women to subdue their eyes, and maintain their chastity. They shall not reveal any parts of their bodies, except that which is necessary. They shall cover their chests, and shall not relax this code in the presence of other than their husbands, their fathers, the fathers of their husbands, their sons, the sons of their husbands, their brothers, the sons of their brothers, the sons of their sisters, other women, the male servants or employees whose sexual drive has been nullified, or the children who have not reached puberty. They shall not strike their feet when they walk in order to shake and reveal certain details of their bodies. All of you shall repent to GOD, O you believers, that you may succeed.
You shall encourage those of you who are single to get married. They may marry the righteous among your male and female servants, if they are poor. GOD will enrich them from His grace. GOD is Bounteous, Knower.
Those who cannot afford to get married shall maintain morality until GOD provides for them from His grace. Those among your servants who wish to be freed in order to marry, you shall grant them their wish, once you realize that they are honest. And give them from GOD's money that He has bestowed upon you. You shall not force your girls to commit prostitution, seeking the materials of this world, if they wish to be chaste. If anyone forces them, then GOD, seeing that they are forced, is Forgiver, Merciful.
We have revealed to you clarifying revelations, and examples from the past generations, and an enlightenment for the righteous.
GOD is the light of the heavens and the earth. The allegory of His light is that of a concave mirror behind a lamp that is placed inside a glass container. The glass container is like a bright, pearl-like star. The fuel thereof is supplied from a blessed oil-producing tree, that is neither eastern, nor western. Its oil is almost self-radiating; needs no fire to ignite it. Light upon light. GOD guides to His light whoever wills (to be guided). GOD thus cites the parables for the people. GOD is fully aware of all things.
(God's guidance is found) in houses exalted by GOD, for His name is commemorated therein. Glorifying Him therein, day and night-
People who are not distracted by business or trade from commemorating GOD; they observe the Contact Prayers (Salat), and give the obligatory charity (Zakat), and they are conscious of the day when the minds and the eyes will be horrified.
GOD will certainly reward them for their good works, and will shower them with His grace. GOD provides for whomever He wills without limits.
As for those who disbelieve, their works are like a mirage in the desert. A thirsty person thinks that it is water. But when he reaches it, he finds that it is nothing, and he finds GOD there instead, to requite him fully for his works. GOD is the most efficient reckoner.
Another allegory is that of being in total darkness in the midst of a violent ocean, with waves upon waves, in addition to thick fog. Darkness upon darkness-if he looked at his own hand, he could barely see it. Whomever GOD deprives of light, will have no light.
Do you not realize that everyone in the heavens and the earth glorifies GOD, even the birds as they fly in a column? Each knows its prayer and its glorification. GOD is fully aware of everything they do.
To GOD belongs the sovereignty of the heavens and the earth, and to GOD is the final destiny.
Do you not realize that GOD drives the clouds, then then, gathers them together, then piles them on each other, then you see the rain coming out of them? He sends down from the sky loads of snow to cover whomever He wills, while diverting it from whomever He wills. The brightness of the snow almost blinds the eyes.
GOD controls the night and day. This should be a lesson for those who possess eyes.
And GOD created every living creature from water. Some of them walk on their bellies, some walk on two legs, and some walk on four. GOD creates whatever He wills. GOD is Omnipotent.
We have sent down to you clarifying revelations, then GOD guides whoever wills (to be guided) in a straight path.
They say, "We believe in GOD and in the messenger, and we obey," but then some of them slide back afterwards. These are not believers.
When they are invited to GOD and His messenger to judge among them, some of them get upset.
However, if the judgment is in their favor, they readily accept it!
Is there a disease in their hearts? Are they doubtful? Are they afraid that GOD and His messenger may treat them unfairly? In fact, it is they who are unjust.
The only utterance of the believers, whenever invited to GOD and His messenger to judge in their affairs, is to say, "We hear and we obey." These are the winners.
Those who obey GOD and His messenger, and reverence GOD and observe Him, these are the triumphant ones.
They swear by GOD, solemnly, that if you commanded them to mobilize, they would mobilize. Say, "Do not swear. Obedience is an obligation. GOD is fully Cognizant of everything you do."
Say, "Obey GOD, and obey the messenger." If they refuse, then he is responsible for his obligations, and you are responsible for your obligations. If you obey him, you will be guided. The sole duty of the messenger is to deliver (the message).
GOD promises those among you who believe and lead a righteous life, that He will make them sovereigns on earth, as He did for those before them, and will establish for them the religion He has chosen for them, and will substitute peace and security for them in place of fear. All this because they worship Me alone; they never set up any idols beside Me. Those who disbelieve after this are the truly wicked.
You shall observe the Contact Prayers (Salat) and give the obligatory charity (Zakat), and obey the messenger, that you may attain mercy.
Do not think that those who disbelieve will ever get away with it. Their final abode is Hell; what a miserable destiny.
O you who believe, permission must be requested by your servants and the children who have not attained puberty (before entering your rooms). This is to be done in three instances-before the Dawn Prayer, at noon when you change your clothes to rest, and after the Night Prayer. These are three private times for you. At other times, it is not wrong for you or them to mingle with one another. GOD thus clarifies the revelations for you. GOD is Omniscient, Most Wise.
Once the children reach puberty, they must ask permission (before entering) like those who became adults before them have asked permission (before entering). GOD thus clarifies His revelations for you. GOD is Omniscient, Most Wise.
The elderly women who do not expect to get married commit nothing wrong by relaxing their dress code, provided they do not reveal too much of their bodies. To maintain modesty is better for them. GOD is Hearer, Knower.
The blind is not to be blamed, the crippled is not to be blamed, nor is the handicapped to be blamed, just as you are not to be blamed for eating at your homes, or the homes of your fathers, or the homes of your mothers, or the homes of your brothers, or the homes of your sisters, or the homes of your fathers' brothers, or the homes of your fathers' sisters, or the homes of your mothers' brothers, or the homes of your mothers' sisters, or the homes that belong to you and you possess their keys, or the homes of your friends. You commit nothing wrong by eating together or as individuals. When you enter any home, you shall greet each other a greeting from GOD that is blessed and good. GOD thus explains the revelations for you, that you may understand.
The true believers are those who believe in GOD and His messenger, and when they are with him in a community meeting, they do not leave him without permission. Those who ask permission are the ones who do believe in GOD and His messenger. If they ask your permission, in order to tend to some of their affairs, you may grant permission to whomever you wish, and ask GOD to forgive them. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
Do not treat the messenger's requests as you treat each others' requests. GOD is fully aware of those among you who sneak away using flimsy excuses. Let them beware-those who disobey his orders-for a disaster may strike them, or a severe retribution.
Absolutely, to GOD belongs everything in the heavens and the earth. He fully knows every condition you may be in. The day you are returned to Him, He will inform them of everything they had done. GOD is fully aware of all things.
Most blessed is the One who revealed the Statute Book to His servant, so he can serve as a warner to the whole world.
The One to whom belongs all sovereignty of the heavens and the earth. He never had a son, nor does He have any partners in sovereignty. He created everything in exact measure; He precisely designed everything.
Yet, they set up beside Him gods who do not create anything-they themselves are created-and who possess no power to even harm or benefit themselves, nor do they possess any power to control life, or death, or resurrection.
Those who disbelieved said, "This is a fabrication that he produced, with the help of some other people." They have uttered a blasphemy and a falsehood.
They also said, "Tales from the past that he wrote down; they were dictated to him day and night."
Say, "This was revealed by the One who knows the Secret in the heavens and the earth. He is Forgiving, Most Merciful."
And they said, "How come this messenger eats the food and walks in the markets? If only an angel could come down with him, to serve with him as a preacher!"
Or, "If only a treasure could be given to him!" Or, "If only he could possess an orchard from which he eats!" The transgressors also said, "You are following a bewitched man."
Note how they called you all kinds of names, and how this led them astray, never to find their way back.
Most blessed is the One who can, if He wills, give you much better than their demands-gardens with flowing streams, and many mansions.
In fact, they have disbelieved in the Hour (Day of Resurrection), and we have prepared for those who disbelieve in the Hour a flaming Hell.
When it sees them from afar, they will hear its rage and fuming.
And when they are thrown into it, through a narrow place, all shackled, they will declare their remorse.
You will not declare just a single remorse, on that day; you will suffer through a great number of remorses.
Say, "Is this better or the eternal Paradise that is promised for the righteous? It is their well deserved reward; a well deserved destiny."
They get anything they wish therein, forever. This is your Lord's irrevocable promise.
On the day when He summons them, together with the idols they had set up beside GOD, He will say, "Have you misled these servants of Mine, or did they go astray on their own?"
They will say, "Be You glorified, it was not right for us to set up any lords beside You. But You allowed them to enjoy, together with their parents. Consequently, they disregarded the message and thus became wicked people."
They have disbelieved in the message you have given them, and, consequently, you can neither protect them from the retribution they have incurred, nor can you help them in any way. Anyone among you who commits evil, we will commit him to severe retribution.
We did not send any messengers before you who did not eat food and walk in the markets. We thus test you by each other; will you steadfastly persevere? Your Lord is Seer.
Those who do not expect to meet us said, "If only the angels could come down to us, or we could see our Lord (we would then believe)!" Indeed, they have committed a gross arrogance, and have produced a gross blasphemy.
The day they see the angels, it will not be good news for the guilty; they will say, "Now, we are irreversibly confined."
We will look at all the works they have done, and render them null and void.
The dwellers of Paradise are far better on that day; they will hear better news.
The heaven will break apart, into masses of clouds, and the angels will descend in multitudes.
All sovereignty on that day belongs to the Most Gracious. For the disbelievers, it will be a difficult day.
The day will come when the transgressor will bite his hands (in anguish) and say, "Alas, I wish I had followed the path with the messenger.
"Alas, woe to me, I wish I did not take that person as a friend.
"He has led me away from the message after it came to me. Indeed, the devil lets down his human victims."
The messenger said, "My Lord, my people have deserted this Quran."
We also set up against every prophet enemies from among the guilty. Your Lord suffices as a guide, a master.
Those who disbelieved said, "Why did not the Quran come through him all at once?" We have released it to you gradually, in order to fix it in your memory. We have recited it in a specific sequence.
Whatever argument they come up with, we provide you with the truth, and a better understanding.
Those who are forcibly summoned to Hell are in the worst position; they are the farthest from the right path.
We have given Moses the scripture, and appointed his brother Aaron to be his assistant.
We said, "Go, both of you, to the people who rejected our revelations," and subsequently, we utterly annihilated the rejectors.
Similarly, when the people of Noah disbelieved the messengers, we drowned them, and we set them up as a sign for the people. We have prepared for the transgressors a painful retribution.
Also 'Ad, Thamud, the inhabitants of Al-Russ, and many generations between them.
To each of these groups, we delivered sufficient examples, before we annihilated them.
They have passed by the community that was showered with a miserable shower (Sodom). Did they not see it? The fact is, they never believed in resurrection.
When they saw you, they always ridiculed you: "Is this the one chosen by GOD to be a messenger?
"He almost diverted us from our gods, if it were not that we steadfastly persevered with them." They will certainly find out, when they see the retribution, who are the real strayers from the path.
Have you seen the one whose god is his own ego? Will you be his advocate?
Do you think that most of them hear, or understand? They are just like animals; no, they are far worse.
Have you not seen how your Lord designed the shadow? If He willed, He could have made it fixed, then we would have designed the sun accordingly.
But we designed it to move slowly.
He is the One who designed the night to be a cover, and for you to sleep and rest. And He made the day a resurrection.
He is the One who sends the winds with good omens of His mercy, and we send down from the sky pure water.
With it, we revive dead lands and provide drink for our creations- multitudes of animals and humans.
We have distributed it among them in exact measure, that they may take heed. But most people insist upon disbelieving.
If we willed, we could have sent to every community a warner.
Therefore, do not obey the disbelievers, and strive against them with this, a great striving.
He is the One who merges the two seas; one is fresh and palatable, while the other is salty and undrinkable. And He separated them with a formidable, inviolable barrier (evaporation).
He is the One who created from water a human being, then made him reproduce through marriage and mating. Your Lord is Omnipotent.
Yet, they still set up beside GOD idols that cannot benefit them, nor harm them. Indeed, the disbeliever is an enemy of his Lord.
We have sent you (Rashad) as a deliverer of good news, as well as a warner.
Say, "I do not ask you for any money. All I seek is to help you find the right path to your Lord, if this is what you choose."
You shall put your trust in the One who is Alive-the One who never dies-and praise Him and glorify Him. He is fully Cognizant of His creatures' sins.
He is the One who created the heavens and the earth, and everything between them, in six days, then assumed all authority. The Most Gracious; ask about Him those who are well founded in knowledge.
When they are told, "Fall prostrate before the Most Gracious," they say, "What is the Most Gracious? Shall we prostrate before what you advocate?" Thus, it only augments their aversion.
Most blessed is the One who placed constellations in the sky, and placed in it a lamp, and a shining moon.
He is the One who designed the night and the day to alternate: a sufficient proof for those who wish to take heed, or to be appreciative.
The worshipers of the Most Gracious are those who tread the earth gently, and when the ignorant speak to them, they only utter peace.
In the privacy of the night, they meditate on their Lord, and fall prostrate.
And they say, "Our Lord, spare us the agony of Hell; its retribution is horrendous.
"It is the worst abode; the worst destiny."
When they give, they are neither extravagant nor stingy; they give in moderation.
They never implore beside GOD any other god, nor do they kill anyone-for GOD has made life sacred- except in the course of justice. Nor do they commit adultery. Those who commit these offenses will have to pay.
Retribution is doubled for them on the Day of Resurrection, and they abide therein humiliated.
Exempted are those who repent, believe, and lead a righteous life. GOD transforms their sins into credits. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
Those who repent and lead a righteous life, GOD redeems them; a complete redemption.
They do not bear false witness. When they encounter vain talk, they ignore it.
When reminded of their Lord's revelations, they never react to them as if they were deaf and blind.
And they say, "Our Lord, let our spouses and children be a source of joy for us, and keep us in the forefront of the righteous."
These are the ones who attain Paradise in return for their stead- fastness; they are received therein with joyous greetings and peace.
Eternally they abide therein; what a beautiful destiny; what a beautiful abode.
Say, "You attain value at my Lord only through your worship. But if you disbelieve, you incur the inevitable consequences."
T. S. M. (Ta, Seen, Mim)
These (letters) constitute proofs of this clarifying scripture.
You may blame yourself that they are not believers.
If we will, we can send from the sky a sign that forces their necks to bow.
Whenever a reminder from the Most Gracious comes to them, that is new, they turn away in aversion.
Since they disbelieved, they have incurred the consequences of their heedlessness.
Have they not seen the earth, and how many kinds of beautiful plants we have grown thereon?
This should be a sufficient proof for them, but most of them are not believers.
Most assuredly, your Lord is the Almighty, Most Merciful.
Recall that your Lord called Moses: "Go to the transgressing people.
"Pharaoh's people; perhaps they reform."
He said, "My Lord, I fear lest they disbelieve me.
"I may lose my temper. My tongue gets tied; send for my brother Aaron.
"Also, they consider me a fugitive; I fear lest they kill me."
He said, "No, (they will not). Go with My proofs. We will be with you, listening.
"Go to Pharaoh and say, 'We are messengers from the Lord of the universe.'
" 'Let the Children of Israel go.' "
He said, "Did we not raise you from infancy, and you spent many years with us?
"Then you committed the crime that you committed, and you were ungrateful."
He said, "Indeed, I did it when I was astray.
"Then I fled, when I feared you, and my Lord endowed me with wisdom and made me one of the messengers.
"You are boasting that you did me a favor, while enslaving the Children of Israel!"
Pharaoh said, "What is the Lord of the universe?"
He said, "The Lord of the heavens and the earth, and everything between them. You should be certain about this."
He said to those around him, "Did you hear this?"
He said, "Your Lord and the Lord of your ancestors."
He said, "Your messenger who is sent to you is crazy."
He said, "The Lord of the east and the west, and everything between them, if you understand."
He said, "If you accept any god, other than me, I will throw you in the prison."
He said, "What if I show you something profound?"
He said, "Then produce it, if you are truthful."
He then threw his staff, whereupon it became a profound snake.
And he took out his hand, and it was white to the beholders.
He said to the elders around him, "This is an experienced magician.
"He wants to take you out of your land, with his magic. What do you suggest?"
They said, "Respite him and his brother, and send summoners to every town.
"Let them summon every experienced magician."
The magicians were gathered at the appointed time, on the appointed day.
The people were told: "Come one and all; let us gather together here.
"Maybe we will follow the magicians, if they are the winners."
When the magicians came, they said to Pharaoh, "Do we get paid, if we are the winners?"
He said, "Yes indeed; you will even be close to me."
Moses said to them "Throw what you are going to throw."
They threw their ropes and sticks, and said, "By Pharaoh's majesty, we will be the victors."
Moses threw his staff, whereupon it swallowed what they fabricated.
The magicians fell prostrate.
They said, "We believe in the Lord of the universe.
"The Lord of Moses and Aaron."
He said, "Did you believe with him before I give you permission? He must be your teacher, who taught you magic. You will surely find out. I will sever your hands and feet on alternate sides. I will crucify you all."
They said, "This will not change our decision; to our Lord we will return.
"We hope that our Lord will forgive us our sins, especially that we are the first believers."
We inspired Moses: "Travel with My servants; you will be pursued."
Pharaoh sent to the cities callers.
(Proclaiming,) "This is a small gang.
"They are now opposing us.
"Let us all beware of them."
Consequently, we deprived them of gardens and springs.
And treasures and an honorable position.
Then we made it an inheritance for the Children of Israel.
They pursued them towards the east.
When both parties saw each other, Moses' people said, "We will be caught."
He said, "No way. My Lord is with me; He will guide me."
We then inspired Moses: "Strike the sea with your staff," whereupon it parted. Each part was like a great hill.
We then delivered them all.
We thus saved Moses and all those who were with him.
And we drowned the others.
This should be a sufficient proof, but most people are not believers.
Most assuredly, your Lord is the Almighty, Most Merciful.
Narrate to them Abraham's history.
He said to his father and his people, "What is this you are worshiping?"
They said, "We worship statues; we are totally devoted to them."
He said, "Can they hear you when you implore?
"Can they benefit you, or harm you?"
They said, "No; but we found our parents doing this."
He said, "Do you see these idols that you worship.
"You and your ancestors.
"I am against them, for I am devoted only to the Lord of the universe.
"The One who created me, and guided me.
"The One who feeds me and waters me.
"And when I get sick, He heals me.
"The One who puts me to death, then brings me back to life.
"The One who hopefully will forgive my sins on the Day of Judgment.
"My Lord, grant me wisdom, and include me with the righteous.
"Let the example I set for the future generations be a good one.
"Make me one of the inheritors of the blissful Paradise.
"And forgive my father, for he has gone astray.
"And do not forsake me on the Day of Resurrection."
That is the day when neither money, nor children, can help.
Only those who come to GOD with their whole heart (will be saved).
Paradise will be presented to the righteous.
Hell will be set up for the strayers.
They will be asked, "Where are the idols you had worshiped
"beside GOD? Can they help you now? Can they help themselves?"
They will be thrown therein, together with the strayers.
And all of Satan's soldiers.
They will say as they feud therein,
"By GOD, we were far astray.
"How could we set you up to rank with the Lord of the universe?
"Those who misled us were wicked.
"Now we have no intercessors.
"Nor a single close friend.
"If only we could get another chance, we would then believe."
This should be a good lesson. But most people are not believers.
Your Lord is the Almighty, Most Merciful.
The people of Noah disbelieved the messengers.
Their brother Noah said to them, "Would you not be righteous?
"I am an honest messenger to you.
"You shall reverence GOD and obey me.
"I do not ask you for any wage. My wage comes from the Lord of the universe.
"You shall reverence GOD and obey me."
They said, "How can we believe with you, when the worst among us have followed you?"
He said, "How do I know what they did?
"Their judgment rests only with my Lord, if you could perceive.
"I will never dismiss the believers.
"I am no more than a clarifying warner."
They said, "Unless you refrain, O Noah, you will be stoned."
He said, "My Lord, my people have disbelieved me.
"Grant me victory against them, and deliver me and my company of believers."
We delivered him and those who accompanied him in the loaded ark.
Then we drowned the others.
This should be a lesson, but most people are not believers.
Most assuredly, your Lord is the Almighty, Most Merciful.
'Ad disbelieved the messengers.
Their brother Hud said to them, "Would you not be righteous?
"I am an honest messenger to you.
"You shall reverence GOD, and obey me.
"I do not ask you for any wage; my wage comes from the Lord of the universe.
"You build on every hill a mansion for vanity's sake.
"You set up buildings as if you last forever.
"And when you strike, you strike mercilessly.
"You shall reverence GOD and obey me.
"Reverence the One who provided you with all the things you know.
"He provided you with livestock and children.
"And gardens and springs.
"I fear for you the retribution of an awesome day."
They said, "It is the same whether you preach, or do not preach.
"That affliction was limited to our ancestors.
"No retribution will ever befall us."
They thus disbelieved and, consequently, we annihilated them. This should be a lesson, but most people are not believers.
Most assuredly, your Lord is the Almighty, Most Merciful.
Thamud disbelieved the messengers.
Their brother Saleh said to them, "Would you not be righteous?
"I am an honest messenger to you.
"You shall reverence GOD, and obey me.
"I do not ask you for any wage; my wage comes only from the Lord of the universe.
"Do you suppose you will be left forever, secure in this state?
"You enjoy gardens and springs.
"And crops and date palms with delicious fruits.
"You carve out of the mountains luxurious mansions.
"You shall reverence GOD, and obey me.
"Do not obey the transgressors.
"Who commit evil, not good works."
They said, "You are bewitched.
"You are no more than a human like us. Produce a miracle, if you are truthful."
He said, "Here is a camel that will drink only on a day that is assigned to her; a day that is different from your specified days of drinking.
"Do not touch her with any harm, lest you incur retribution on an awesome day."
They slaughtered her, and thus incurred sorrow.
The retribution overwhelmed them. This should be a lesson, but most people are not believers.
Most assuredly, your Lord is the Almighty, Most Merciful.
The people of Lot disbelieved the messengers.
Their brother Lot said to them, "Would you not be righteous?
"I am an honest messenger to you.
"You shall reverence GOD, and obey me.
"I do not ask you for any wage; my wage comes only from the Lord of the universe.
"Do you have sex with the males, of all the people?
"You forsake the wives that your Lord has created for you! Indeed, you are transgressing people."
They said, "Unless you refrain, O Lot, you will be banished."
He said, "I deplore your actions."
"My Lord, save me and my family from their works."
We saved him and all his family.
But not the old woman; she was doomed.
We then destroyed the others.
We showered them with a miserable shower; what a terrible shower for those who had been warned!
This should be a lesson, but most people are not believers.
Most assuredly, your Lord is the Almighty, Most Merciful.
The People of the Woods disbelieved the messengers.
Shu'aib said to them, "Would you not be righteous?
"I am an honest messenger to you.
"You shall reverence GOD, and obey me.
"I do not ask you for any wage; my wage comes only from the Lord of the universe.
"You shall give full measure when you trade; do not cheat.
"You shall weigh with an equitable scale.
"Do not cheat the people out of their rights, and do not roam the earth corruptingly.
"Reverence the One who created you and the previous generations."
They said, "You are bewitched.
"You are no more than a human being like us. In fact, we think you are a liar.
"Let masses from the sky fall on us, if you are truthful."
He said, "My Lord is the One who knows everything you do."
They disbelieved him and, consequently, they incurred the retribution of the Day of the Canopy. It was the retribution of an awesome day.
This should be a lesson, but most people are not believers.
Most assuredly, your Lord is the Almighty, Most Merciful.
This is a revelation from the Lord of the universe.
The Honest Spirit (Gabriel) came down with it.
To reveal it into your heart, that you may be one of the warners.
In a perfect Arabic tongue.
It has been prophesied in the books of previous generations.
Is it not a sufficient sign for them that it was known to the scholars among the Children of Israel?
If we revealed this to people who do not know Arabic.
And had him recite it (in Arabic), they could not possibly believe in it.
We thus render it (like a foreign language) in the hearts of the guilty.
Thus, they cannot believe in it; not until they see the painful retribution.
It will come to them suddenly, when they least expect it.
They will then say, "Can we have a respite?"
Did they not challenge our retribution?
As you see, we allowed them to enjoy for years.
Then the retribution came to them, just as promised.
Their vast resources did not help them in the least.
We never annihilate any community without sending warners.
Therefore, this is a reminder, for we are never unjust.
The devils can never reveal this.
They neither would, nor could.
For they are prevented from hearing.
Therefore, do not idolize beside GOD any other god, lest you incur the retribution.
You shall preach to the people who are closest to you.
And lower your wing for the believers who follow you.
If they disobey you, then say, "I disown what you do."
And put your trust in the Almighty, Most Merciful.
Who sees you when you meditate during the night.
And your frequent prostrations.
He is the Hearer, the Omniscient.
Shall I inform you upon whom the devils descend?
They descend upon every guilty fabricator.
They pretend to listen, but most of them are liars.
As for the poets, they are followed only by the strayers.
Do you not see that their loyalty shifts according to the situation?
And that they say what they do not do?
Exempted are those who believe, lead a righteous life, commemorate GOD frequently, and stand up for their rights. Surely, the transgressors will find out what their ultimate destiny is.
T. S. These (letters) constitute proofs of the Quran; a profound scripture.
A beacon, and good news, for the believers.
Who observe the Contact Prayers (Salat), give the obligatory charity (Zakat), and they are, with regard to the Hereafter, absolutely certain .
Those who do not believe in the Hereafter, we adorn their works in their eyes. Thus, they continue to blunder.
It is these who incur the worst retribution, and in the Hereafter, they will be the worst losers.
Surely, you are receiving the Quran from a Most Wise, Omniscient.
Recall that Moses said to his family, "I see a fire; let me bring you news therefrom, or a torch to warm you."
When he came to it, he was called: "Blessed is the One (who is speaking from) within the fire, and those around it." Glory be to GOD, Lord of the universe.
"O Moses, this is Me, GOD, the Almighty, Most Wise.
"Throw down your staff." When he saw it moving like a demon, he turned around and fled. "O Moses, do not be afraid. My messengers shall not fear.
"Except those who commit a transgression, then substitute righteousness after sinning; I am Forgiving, Most Merciful.
"Put your hand in your pocket; it will come out white, without a blemish. These are among nine miracles to Pharaoh and his people, for they are wicked people."
When our miracles were presented to them, clear and profound, they said, "This is obviously magic."
They rejected them and were utterly convinced of their wrong ways, due to their arrogance. Note the consequences for the evildoers.
We endowed David and Solomon with knowledge, and they said, "Praise GOD for blessing us more than many of His believing servants."
Solomon was David's heir. He said, "O people, we have been endowed with understanding the language of the birds, and all kinds of things have been bestowed upon us. This is indeed a real blessing."
Mobilized in the service of Solomon were his obedient soldiers of jinns and humans, as well as the birds; all at his disposal.
When they approached the valley of the ants, one ant said, "O you ants, go into your homes, lest you get crushed by Solomon and his soldiers, without perceiving."
He smiled and laughed at her statement, and said, "My Lord, direct me to be appreciative of the blessings You have bestowed upon me and my parents, and to do the righteous works that please You. Admit me by Your mercy into the company of Your righteous servants."
He inspected the birds, and noted: "Why do I not see the hoopoe? Why is he missing?
"I will punish him severely or sacrifice him, unless he gives me a good excuse."
He did not wait for long. (The hoopoe) said, "I have news that you do not have. I brought to you from Sheba, some important information.
"I found a woman ruling them, who is blessed with everything, and possesses a tremendous palace.
"I found her and her people prostrating before the sun, instead of GOD. The devil has adorned their works in their eyes, and has repulsed them from the path; consequently, they are not guided."
They should have been prostrating before GOD, the One who manifests all the mysteries in the heavens and the earth, and the One who knows everything you conceal and everything you declare.
GOD: there is no other god beside Him; the Lord with the great dominion.
(Solomon) said, "We will see if you told the truth, or if you are a liar.
"Take this letter from me, give it to them, then watch for their response."
She said, "O my advisers, I have received an honorable letter.
"It is from Solomon, and it is, 'In the name of GOD, Most Gracious, Most Merciful.'
"Proclaiming: 'Do not be arrogant; come to me as submitters.' "
She said, "O my advisers, counsel me in this matter. I am not deciding anything until you advise me."
They said, "We possess the power, we possess the fighting skills, and the ultimate command is in your hand. You decide what to do."
She said, "The kings corrupt any land they invade, and subjugate its dignified people. This is what they usually do.
"I am sending a gift to them; let us see what the messengers come back with."
When the hoopoe returned to Solomon (he told him the news), and he responded (to Sheba's people): "Are you giving me money? What GOD has given me is far better than what He has given you. You are the ones to rejoice in such gifts."
(To the hoopoe, he said,) "Go back to them (and let them know that) we will come to them with forces they cannot imagine. We will evict them, humiliated and debased."
He said, "O you elders, which of you can bring me her mansion, before they arrive here as submitters?"
One afrit from the jinns said, "I can bring it to you before you stand up. I am powerful enough to do this."
The one who possessed knowledge from the book said, "I can bring it to you in the blink of your eye." When he saw it settled in front of him, he said, "This is a blessing from my Lord, whereby He tests me, to show whether I am appreciative or unappreciative. Whoever is appreciative is appreciative for his own good, and if one turns unappreciative, then my Lord is in no need for him, Most Honorable."
He said, "Remodel her mansion for her. Let us see if she will be guided, or continue with the misguided."
When she arrived, she was asked, "Does your mansion look like this?" She said, "It seems that this is it." (Solomon said,) "We knew beforehand what she was going to do, and we were already submitters."
She had been diverted by worshiping idols instead of GOD; she belonged to disbelieving people.
She was told, "Go inside the palace." When she saw its interior, she thought it was a pool of water, and she (pulled up her dress,) exposing her legs. He said, "This interior is now paved with crystal." She said, "My Lord, I have wronged my soul. I now submit with Solomon to GOD, Lord of the universe."
We have sent to Thamud their brother Saleh, saying, "You shall worship GOD." But they turned into two feuding factions.
He said, "O my people, why do you hasten to commit evil instead of good works? If only you implore GOD for forgiveness, you may attain mercy."
They said, "We consider you a bad omen for us, you and those who joined you." He said, "Your omen is fully controlled by GOD. Indeed, you are deviant people."
There were nine gangsters in the city who were wicked, and never did anything good.
They said, "Let us swear by GOD that we kill him and his people, then tell his tribe, 'We know nothing about their death. We are truthful."
They plotted and schemed, but we also plotted and schemed, while they did not perceive.
Note the consequences of their plotting; we annihilated them and all their people.
Here are their homes utterly ruined, because of their transgression. This should be a lesson for people who know.
We save those who believe and lead a righteous life.
Lot said to his people, "How could you commit such an abomination, publicly, while you see?
"You practice sex with the men, lustfully, instead of the women. Indeed, you are ignorant people."
The only response from his people was their saying, "Banish Lot's family from your town; they are people who wish to be pure."
Consequently, we saved him and his family, except his wife; we counted her among the doomed.
We showered them with a certain shower. It was a miserable shower upon people who had been warned.
Say, "Praise be to GOD and peace be upon His servants whom He chose. Is GOD better, or the idols some people set up?"
Who is the One who created the heavens and the earth? Who is the One who sends down to you from the sky water, whereby we produce gardens full of beauty-you could not possibly manufacture its trees? Is it another god with GOD? Indeed, they are people who have deviated.
Who is the One who made the earth habitable, caused rivers to run through it, placed on it mountains, and created a barrier between the two waters? Is it another god with GOD? Indeed, most of them do not know.
Who is the One who rescues those who become desperate and call upon Him, relieves adversity, and makes you inheritors of the earth? Is it another god with GOD? Rarely do you take heed.
Who is the One who guides you in the darkness of land and sea? Who is the One who sends the winds with good news, signaling His mercy? Is it another god with GOD? Most exalted is GOD, above having any partner.
Who is the One who initiates the creation, then repeats it? Who is the One who provides for you from the heaven and the earth? Is it another god with GOD? Say, "Show me your proof, if you are truthful."
Say, "No one in the heavens and the earth knows the future except GOD. They do not even perceive how or when they will be resurrected."
In fact, their knowledge concerning the Hereafter is confused. In fact, they harbor doubts about it. In fact, they are totally heedless thereof.
Those who disbelieved said, "After we turn into dust, and also our parents, do we get brought out?
"We have been given the same promise in the past. These are nothing but tales from the past."
Say, "Roam the earth and note the consequences for the guilty."
Do not grieve over them, and do not be annoyed by their scheming.
They say, "When will that promise come to pass, if you are truthful?"
Say, "You are already suffering some of the retribution you challenge."
Your Lord is full of grace towards the people, but most of them are unappreciative.
Your Lord fully knows what their chests hide, and what they declare.
There is nothing in the heavens and the earth that is hidden (from God); everything is in a profound record.
This Quran settles many issues for the Children of Israel; issues that they are still disputing.
And most assuredly, it is a guide and mercy for the believers.
Your Lord is the One who judges among them in accordance with His rules. He is the Almighty, the Omniscient.
Therefore, put your trust in GOD; you are following the manifest truth.
You cannot make the dead, nor the deaf, hear the call, if they turn away.
Nor can you guide the blind out of their straying. The only ones who will hear you are those who believe in our revelations, and decide to be submitters.
At the right time, we will produce for them a creature, made of earthly materials, declaring that the people are not certain about our revelations.
The day will come when we summon from every community some of those who did not believe in our proofs, forcibly.
When they arrive, He will say, "You have rejected My revelations, before acquiring knowledge about them. Is this not what you did?"
They will incur the requital for their wickedness; they will say nothing.
Have they not seen that we made the night for their rest, and the day lighted? These should be sufficient proofs for people who believe.
On the day when the horn is blown, everyone in the heavens and the earth will be horrified, except those chosen by GOD. All will come before Him, forcibly.
When you look at the mountains, you think that they are standing still. But they are moving, like the clouds. Such is the manufacture of GOD, who perfected everything. He is fully Cognizant of everything you do.
Those who bring good works (in their records) will receive far better rewards, and they will be perfectly secure from the horrors of that day.
As for those who bring evil works, they will be forced into Hell. Do you not get requited for what you did?
I am simply commanded to worship the Lord of this town-He has made it a safe sanctuary-and He possesses all things. I am commanded to be a submitter.
And to recite the Quran. Whoever is guided is guided for his own good, and if they go astray, then say, "I am simply a warner."
And say, "Praise be to GOD; He will show you His proofs, until you recognize them. Your Lord is never unaware of anything you do."
T. S. M.
These (letters) constitute proofs of this profound book.
We recite to you herein some history of Moses and Pharaoh, truthfully, for the benefit of people who believe.
Pharaoh turned into a tyrant on earth, and discriminated against some people. He persecuted a helpless group of them, slaughtering their sons, while sparing their daughters. He was indeed wicked.
We willed to compensate those who were oppressed on earth, and to turn them into leaders, and make them the inheritors.
And to establish them on earth, and to give Pharaoh, Hamaan, and their troops a taste of their own medicine.
We inspired Moses' mother: "Nurse him, and when you fear for his life, throw him into the river without fear or grief. We will return him to you, and will make him one of the messengers."
Pharaoh's family picked him up, only to have him lead the opposition and to be a source of grief for them. That is because Pharaoh, Hamaan, and their troops were transgressors.
Pharaoh's wife said, "This can be a joyous find for me and you. Do not kill him, for he may be of some benefit for us, or we may adopt him to be our son." They had no idea.
The mind of Moses' mother was growing so anxious that she almost gave away his identity. But we strengthened her heart, to make her a believer.
She said to his sister, "Trace his path." She watched him from afar, while they did not perceive.
We forbade him from accepting all the nursing mothers. (His sister) then said, "I can show you a family that can raise him for you, and take good care of him."
Thus, we restored him to his mother, in order to please her, remove her worries, and to let her know that GOD's promise is the truth. However, most of them do not know.
When he reached maturity and strength, we endowed him with wisdom and knowledge. We thus reward the righteous.
Once he entered the city unexpectedly, without being recognized by the people. He found two men fighting; one was (a Hebrew) from his people, and the other was (an Egyptian) from his enemies. The one from his people called on him for help against his enemy. Moses punched him, killing him. He said, "This is the work of the devil; he is a real enemy, and a profound misleader."
He said, "My Lord, I have wronged my soul. Please forgive me," and He forgave him. He is the Forgiver, Most Merciful.
He said, "My Lord, in return for Your blessings upon me, I will never be a supporter of the guilty ones."
In the morning, he was in the city, afraid and watchful. The one who sought his help yesterday, asked for his help again. Moses said to him, "You are really a trouble maker."
Before he attempted to strike their common enemy, he said, "O Moses, do you want to kill me, as you killed the other man yesterday? Obviously, you wish to be a tyrant on earth; you do not wish to be righteous."
A man came running from the other side of the city, saying, "O Moses, the people are plotting to kill you. You better leave immediately. I am giving you good advice."
He fled the city, afraid and watchful. He said, "My Lord, save me from the oppressive people."
As he traveled towards Midyan, he said, "May my Lord guide me in the right path."
When he reached Midyan's water, he found a crowd of people watering, and noticed two women waiting on the side. He said, "What is it that you need?" They said, "We are not able to water, until the crowd disperses, and our father is an old man."
He watered for them, then turned to the shade, saying, "My Lord, whatever provision you send to me, I am in dire need for it."
Soon, one of the two women approached him, shyly, and said, "My father invites you to pay you for watering for us." When he met him, and told him his story, he said, "Have no fear. You have been saved from the oppressive people."
One of the two women said, "O my father, hire him. He is the best one to hire, for he is strong and honest."
He said, "I wish to offer one of my two daughters for you to marry, in return for working for me for eight pilgrimages; if you make them ten, it will be voluntary on your part. I do not wish to make this matter too difficult for you. You will find me, GOD willing, righteous."
He said, "It is an agreement between me and you. Whichever period I fulfill, you will not be averse to either one. GOD is the guarantor of what we said."
When he had fulfilled his obligation, he traveled with his family (towards Egypt). He saw from the slope of Mount Sinai a fire. He said to his family, "Stay here. I have seen a fire. Maybe I can bring to you news, or a portion of the fire to warm you."
When he reached it, he was called from the edge of the right side of the valley, in the blessed spot where the burning bush was located: "O Moses, this is Me. GOD; Lord of the universe.
"Throw down your staff." When he saw it moving like a demon, he turned around and fled. "O Moses, come back; do not be afraid. You are perfectly safe.
"Put your hand into your pocket; it will come out white without a blemish. Fold your wings and settle down from your fear. These are two proofs from your Lord, to be shown to Pharaoh and his elders; they have been wicked people."
He said, "My Lord, I killed one of them, and I fear lest they kill me.
"Also, my brother Aaron is more eloquent than I. Send him with me as a helper to confirm and strengthen me. I fear lest they disbelieve me."
He said, "We will strengthen you with your brother, and we will provide you both with manifest authority. Thus, they will not be able to touch either one of you. With our miracles, the two of you, together with those who follow you, will be the victors."
When Moses went to them with our proofs, clear and profound, they said, "This is fabricated magic. We have never heard of this from our ancient ancestors."
Moses said, "My Lord knows best who brought the guidance from Him, and who will be the ultimate victors. Surely, the transgressors never succeed."
Pharaoh said, "O you elders, I have not known of any god for you other than me. Therefore, fire the adobe, O Hamaan, in order to build a tower, that I may take a look at the god of Moses. I am sure that he is a liar."
Thus, he and his troops continued to commit arrogance on earth, without any right, and thought that they would not be returned to us.
Consequently, we punished him and his troops, by throwing them into the sea. Note the consequences for the transgressors.
We made them imams who led their people to Hell. Furthermore, on the Day of Resurrection, they will have no help.
They incurred in this life condemnation, and on the Day of Resurrection they will be despised.
We gave Moses the scripture-after having annihilated the previous generations, and after setting the examples through them- to provide enlightenment for the people, and guidance, and mercy, that they may take heed.
You were not present on the slope of the western mount, when we issued the command to Moses; you were not a witness.
But we established many generations, and, because of the length of time, (they deviated). Nor were you among the people of Midyan, reciting our revelations to them. But we did send messengers.
Nor were you on the slope of Mount Sinai when we called (Moses). But it is mercy from your Lord, (towards the people,) in order to warn people who received no warner before you, that they may take heed.
Thus, they cannot say, when a disaster strikes them as a consequence of their own deeds, "Our Lord, had You sent a messenger to us, we would have followed Your revelations, and would have been believers."
Now that the truth has come to them from us, they said, "If only we could be given what was given to Moses!" Did they not disbelieve in what was given to Moses in the past? They said, "Both (scriptures) are works of magic that copied one another." They also said, "We are disbelievers in both of them."
Say, "Then produce a scripture from GOD with better guidance than the two, so I can follow it, if you are truthful."
If they fail to respond to you, then know that they follow only their own opinions. Who is farther astray than those who follow their own opinions, without guidance from GOD? GOD does not guide such wicked people.
We have delivered the message to them, that they may take heed.
Those whom we blessed with the previous scriptures will believe in this.
When it is recited to them, they will say, "We believe in it. This is the truth from our Lord. Even before we heard of it, we were submitters."
To these we grant twice the reward, because they steadfastly persevere. They counter evil works with good works, and from our provisions to them, they give.
When they come across vain talk, they disregard it and say, "We are responsible for our deeds, and you are responsible for your deeds. Peace be upon you. We do not wish to behave like the ignorant ones."
You cannot guide the ones you love. GOD is the only One who guides in accordance with His will, and in accordance with His knowledge of those who deserve the guidance.
They said, "If we follow your guidance, we will suffer persecution." Did we not establish for them a Sacred Sanctuary, to which all kinds of fruits are offered, as a provision from us? Indeed, most of them do not know.
Many a community we annihilated for turning unappreciative of their lives. Consequently, here are their homes, nothing but uninhabited ruins after them, except a few. We were the inheritors.
For your Lord never annihilates any community without sending a messenger in the midst thereof, to recite our revelations to them. We never annihilate any community, unless its people are wicked.
Everything that is given to you is only the material of this life, and its vanity What is with GOD is far better, and everlasting. Do you not understand?
Is one whom we promised a good promise that will surely come to pass, equal to one whom we provide with the temporary materials of this life, then suffers eternal doom on the Day of Resurrection?
The day will come when He calls upon them, saying, "Where are those idols you had set up beside Me?"
Those who incurred the judgment will say, "Our Lord, these are the ones we misled; we misled them only because we ourselves had gone astray. We now devote ourselves totally to You. They were not really worshiping us."
It will be said, "Call upon your idols (to help you)." They will call upon them, but they will not respond. They will suffer the retribution, and wish that they were guided!
On that day, He will ask everyone, "How did you respond to the messengers?"
They will be so stunned by the facts on that day, they will be speechless.
As for those who repent, believe, and lead a righteous life, they will end up with the winners.
Your Lord is the One who creates whatever He wills, and chooses; no one else does any choosing. Glory be to GOD, the Most Exalted. He is far above needing partners.
Your Lord knows the innermost thoughts hidden in their chests, as well as everything they declare.
He is the one GOD; there is no other god beside Him. To Him belongs all praise in this first life, and in the Hereafter. All judgment belongs with Him, and to Him you will be returned.
Say, "What if GOD made the night perpetual, until the Day of Resurrection? Which god, other than GOD, can provide you with light? Do you not hear?"
Say, "What if GOD made the daylight perpetual, until the Day of Resurrection? Which god, other than GOD, can provide you with a night for your rest? Do you not see?"
It is mercy from Him that He created for you the night and the day in order to rest (during the night), then seek His provisions (during the day), that you may be appreciative.
The day will come when He asks them, "Where are the idols you had fabricated to rank with Me?"
We will select from every community a witness, then say, "Present your proof." They will realize then that all truth belongs with GOD, while the idols they had fabricated will abandon them.
Qaroon (the slave driver) was one of Moses' people who betrayed them and oppressed them. We gave him so many treasures that the keys thereof were almost too heavy for the strongest band. His people said to him, "Do not be so arrogant; GOD does not love those who are arrogant.
"Use the provisions bestowed upon you by GOD to seek the abode of the Hereafter, without neglecting your share in this world. Be charitable, as GOD has been charitable towards you. Do not keep on corrupting the earth. GOD does not love the corruptors."
He said, "I attained all this because of my own cleverness." Did he not realize that GOD had annihilated before him generations that were much stronger than he, and greater in number? The (annihilated) transgressors were not asked about their crimes.
One day, he came out to his people in full splendor. Those who preferred this worldly life said, "Oh, we wish that we possessed what Qaroon has attained. Indeed, he is very fortunate."
As for those who were blessed with knowledge, they said, "Woe to you, GOD's recompense is far better for those who believe and lead a righteous life." None attains this except the steadfast.
We then caused the earth to swallow him and his mansion. No army could have helped him against GOD; he was not destined to be a winner.
Those who were envious of him the day before said, "Now we realize that GOD is the One who provides for whomever He chooses from among His servants, and withholds. If it were not for GOD's grace towards us, He could have caused the earth to swallow us too. We now realize that the disbelievers never succeed."
We reserve the abode of the Hereafter for those who do not seek exaltation on earth, nor corruption. The ultimate victory belongs to the righteous.
Whoever works righteousness receives a far better reward. As for those who commit sins, the retribution for their sins is precisely equivalent to their works.
Surely, the One who decreed the Quran for you will summon you to a predetermined appointment. Say, "My Lord is fully aware of those who uphold the guidance, and those who have gone astray."
You never expected this scripture to come your way; but this is a mercy from your Lord. Therefore, you shall not side with the disbelievers.
Nor shall you be diverted from GOD's revelations, after they have come to you, and invite the others to your Lord. And do not ever fall into idol worship.
You shall not worship beside GOD any other god. There is no other god beside Him. Everything perishes except His presence. To Him belongs all sovereignty, and to Him you will be returned.
A. L. M.
Do the people think that they will be left to say, "We believe," without being put to the test?
We have tested those before them, for GOD must distinguish those who are truthful, and He must expose the liars.
Do those who commit sins think that they can ever fool us? Wrong indeed is their judgment.
Anyone hoping to meet GOD, (should know that) such a meeting with GOD will most assuredly come to pass. He is the Hearer, the Omniscient.
Those who strive, strive for their own good. GOD is in no need of anyone.
Those who believe and lead a righteous life, we will certainly remit their sins, and will certainly reward them generously for their righteous works.
We enjoined the human being to honor his parents. But if they try to force you to set up idols beside Me, do not obey them. To Me is your ultimate return, then I will inform you of everything you had done.
Those who believe and lead a righteous life, we will certainly admit them with the righteous.
Among the people there are those who say, "We believe in GOD," but as soon as they suffer any hardship because of GOD, they equate the people's persecution with GOD's retribution. But if blessings from your Lord come your way, they say, "We were with you." Is GOD not fully aware of the people's innermost thoughts?
GOD will most certainly distinguish those who believe, and He will most certainly expose the hypocrites.
Those who disbelieved said to those who believed, "If you follow our way, we will be responsible for your sins." Not true; they cannot bear any of their sins. They are liars.
In fact, they will carry their own sins, in addition to loads of other people's sins for which they were responsible. Most certainly, they will be asked on the Day of Resurrection about their false claims.
We sent Noah to his people, and he stayed with them one thousand years, less fifty. Subsequently, they incurred the flood because of their transgressions.
We saved him and those who accompanied him in the ark, and we set it up as a lesson for all the people.
Abraham said to his people, "You shall worship GOD, and reverence Him. This is better for you, if you only knew.
"What you worship instead of GOD are powerless idols; you have invented a lie." The idols you worship beside GOD do not possess any provisions for you. Therefore, you shall seek provisions only from GOD. You shall worship Him alone, and be appreciative of Him; to Him is your ultimate return.
If you disbelieve, generations before you have also disbelieved. The sole function of the messenger is to deliver (the message).
Have they not seen how GOD initiates the creation, then repeats it? This is easy for GOD to do.
Say, "Roam the earth and find out the origin of life." For GOD will thus initiate the creation in the Hereafter. GOD is Omnipotent.
He condemns to retribution whomever He wills, and showers His mercy upon whomever He wills. Ultimately, to Him you will be turned over.
None of you can escape from these facts, on earth or in the heaven, and you have none beside GOD as a Lord and Master.
Those who disbelieve in GOD's revelations, and in meeting Him, have despaired from My mercy. They have incurred a painful retribution.
The only response from his people was their saying, "Kill him, or burn him." But GOD saved him from the fire. This should provide lessons for people who believe.
He said, "You worship beside GOD powerless idols due to peer pressure, just to preserve some friendship among you in this worldly life. But then, on the Day of Resurrection, you will disown one another, and curse one another. Your destiny is Hell, wherein you cannot help one another."
Lot believed with him and said, "I am emigrating to my Lord. He is the Almighty, the Most Wise."
We granted him Isaac and Jacob, we assigned to his descendants prophethood and the scriptures, we endowed him with his due recompense in this life, and in the Hereafter he will surely be with the righteous.
Lot said to his people, "You commit such an abomination, no one in the world has ever done it before you.
"You practice sex with the men, you commit highway robbery, and you allow all kinds of vice in your society." The only response from his people was to say, "Bring to us GOD's retribution, if you are truthful."
He said, "My Lord, grant me victory over these wicked people."
When our messengers went to Abraham with good news (about Isaac's birth), they also said, "We are on our way to annihilate the people of that town (Sodom), for its people have been wicked."
He said, "But Lot is living there." They said, "We are fully aware of everyone who lives in it. We will of course save him and his family, except his wife; she is doomed."
When our messengers arrived at Lot's place, they were mistreated, and he was embarrassed by their presence. But they said, "Have no fear, and do not worry. We will save you and your family, except your wife; she is doomed.
"We will pour upon the people of this town a disaster from the sky, as a consequence of their wickedness."
We left standing some of their ruins, to serve as a profound lesson for people who understand.
To Midyan we sent their brother Shu'aib. He said, "O my people, you shall worship GOD and seek the Last Day, and do not roam the earth corruptingly."
They disbelieved him and, consequently, the earthquake annihilated them; they were left dead in their homes by morning.
Similarly, 'Ad and Thamud (were annihilated). This is made manifest to you through their ruins. The devil had adorned their works in their eyes, and had diverted them from the path, even though they had eyes.
Also Qaroon, Pharaoh, and Haman; Moses went to them with clear signs. But they continued to commit tyranny on earth. Consequently, they could not evade (the retribution).
All those disbelievers were doomed as a consequence of their sins. Some of them we annihilated by violent winds, some were annihilated by the quake, some we caused the earth to swallow, and some we drowned. GOD is not the One who wronged them; it is they who wronged their own souls.
The allegory of those who accept other masters beside GOD is that of the spider and her home; the flimsiest of all homes is the home of the spider, if they only knew.
GOD knows full well that whatever they worship beside Him are really nothing. He is the Almighty, the Most Wise.
We cite these examples for the people, and none appreciate them except the knowledgeable.
GOD created the heavens and the earth, truthfully. This provides a sufficient proof for the believers.
You shall recite what is revealed to you of the scripture, and observe the Contact Prayers (Salat), for the Contact Prayers prohibit evil and vice. But the remembrance of GOD (through Salat) is the most important objective. GOD knows everything you do.
Do not argue with the people of the scripture (Jews, Christians, and Muslims) except in the nicest possible manner- unless they transgress-and say, "We believe in what was revealed to us and in what was revealed to you, and our god and your god is one and the same; to Him we are submitters."
We have revealed to you this scripture, and those whom we blessed with the previous scripture will believe in it. Also, some of your people will believe in it. Indeed, those who disregard our revelations are the real disbelievers.
You did not read the previous scriptures, nor did you write them with your hand. In that case, the rejectors would have had reason to harbor doubts.
In fact, these revelations are clear in the chests of those who possess knowledge. Only the wicked will disregard our revelations.
They said, "If only miracles could come down to him from his Lord!" Say, "All miracles come only from GOD; I am no more than a manifest warner."
Is it not enough of a miracle that we sent down to you this book, being recited to them? This is indeed a mercy and a reminder for people who believe.
Say, "GOD suffices as a witness between me and you. He knows everything in the heavens and the earth. Surely, those who believe in falsehood and disbelieve in GOD are the real losers."
They challenge you to bring the retribution! If it were not for a predetermined appointment, the retribution would have come to them immediately. Certainly, it will come to them suddenly, when they least expect it.
They challenge you to bring retribution! Hell already surrounds the disbelievers.
The day will come when the retribution overwhelms them, from above them and from beneath their feet; He will say, "Taste the consequences of your works."
O My servants who believed, My earth is spacious, so worship Me.
Everyone will taste death, then to us you will be ultimately returned.
Those who believe and lead a righteous life, we will surely settle them in Paradise, with mansions and flowing streams. Eternally they abide therein. What a beautiful reward for the workers.
They are the ones who steadfastly persevere, and trust in their Lord.
Many a creature that does not carry its provision, GOD provides for it, as well as for you. He is the Hearer, the Omniscient.
If you ask them, "Who created the heavens and the earth, and put the sun and the moon in your service," they will say, "GOD." Why then did they deviate?
GOD is the One who increases the provision for whomever He chooses from among His creatures, and withholds it. GOD is fully aware of all things.
If you ask them, "Who sends down from the sky water, to revive dead land," they will say, "GOD." Say, "Praise GOD." Most of them do not understand.
This worldly life is no more than vanity and play, while the abode of the Hereafter is the real life, if they only knew.
When they ride on a ship, they implore GOD, devoting their prayers to Him. But as soon as He saves them to the shore, they revert to idolatry.
Let them disbelieve in what we have given them, and let them enjoy temporarily; they will surely find out.
Have they not seen that we have established a Sacred Sanctuary that we made secure, while all around them the people are in constant danger? Would they still believe in falsehood, and reject GOD's blessings?
Who is more evil than one who fabricates lies and attributes them to GOD, or rejects the truth when it comes to him? Is Hell not a just retribution for the disbelievers?
As for those who strive in our cause, we will surely guide them in our paths. Most assuredly, GOD is with the pious.
A. L. M.
Certainly, the Romans will be defeated.
In the nearest land. After their defeat, they will rise again and win.
Within several years. Such is GOD's decision, both in the first prophecy, and the second. On that day, the believers shall rejoice.
In GOD's victory. He grants victory to whomever He wills. He is the Almighty, Most Merciful.
Such is GOD's promise- and GOD never breaks His promise- but most people do not know.
They care only about things of this world that are visible to them, while being totally oblivious to the Hereafter.
Why do they not reflect on themselves? GOD did not create the heavens and the earth, and everything between them, except for a specific purpose, and for a specific life span. However, most people, with regard to meeting their Lord, are disbelievers.
Have they not roamed the earth and noted the consequences for those who preceded them? They used to be more powerful, more prosperous, and more productive on earth. Their messengers went to them with clear signs. Consequently, GOD was not the One who wronged them; they are the ones who wronged their own souls.
The consequences for those who committed evil had to be evil. That is because they rejected GOD's revelations, and ridiculed them.
GOD is the One who initiates the creation and repeats it. Ultimately, you will be returned to Him.
On the Day when the Hour comes to pass, the guilty will be shocked.
Their idols will have no power to intercede on their behalf; on the contrary, they will disown their idols.
On the day when the Hour comes to pass, they will part company.
As for those who believe and lead a righteous life, they will be in Paradise, rejoicing.
As for those who disbelieve, and reject our revelations and the meeting of the Hereafter, they will last in the retribution forever.
Therefore, you shall glorify GOD when you retire at night, and when you rise in the morning.
All praise is due to Him in the heavens and the earth, throughout the evening, as well as in the middle of your day.
He produces the live from the dead, and produces the dead from the live, and He revives the land after it had died; you are similarly resurrected.
Among His proofs is that He created you from dust, then you became reproducing humans.
Among His proofs is that He created for you spouses from among yourselves, in order to have tranquility and contentment with each other, and He placed in your hearts love and care towards your spouses. In this, there are sufficient proofs for people who think.
Among His proofs are the creation of the heavens and the earth, and the variations in your languages and your colors. In these, there are signs for the knowledgeable.
Among His proofs is your sleeping during the night or the day, and your working in pursuit of His provisions. In this, there are sufficient proofs for people who can hear.
Among His proofs is that He shows you the lightning as a source of fear, as well as hope, then He sends down from the sky water to revive a land that has been dead. In these, there are sufficient proofs for people who understand.
Among His proofs is that the heaven and the earth are standing at His disposal. Finally, when He calls you out of the earth, one call, you will immediately come out.
To Him belongs everyone in the heavens and the earth; all are subservient to Him.
And He is the One who initiates the creation, then repeats it; this is even easier for Him. To Him belongs the most sublime similitude, in the heavens and the earth, and He is the Almighty, Most Wise.
He cites for you herein an example from among yourselves: Do you ever elevate your servants or subordinates to the level where they rival you, and to the point that you pay them as much allegiance as is being paid to you? We thus explain the revelations for people who understand.
Indeed, the transgressors have followed their own opinions, without knowledge. Who then can guide those who have been sent astray by GOD? No one can ever help them.
Therefore, you shall devote yourself to the religion of strict monotheism. Such is the natural instinct placed into the people by GOD. Such creation of GOD will never change. This is the perfect religion, but most people do not know.
You shall submit to Him, reverence Him, observe the Contact Prayers (Salat), and-whatever you do-do not ever fall into idol worship.
(Do not fall in idol worship,) like those who divide their religion into sects; each party rejoicing with what they have.
When adversity afflicts the people, they turn to their Lord, totally devoting themselves to Him. But then, as soon as He showers them with mercy, some of them revert to idol worship.
Let them be unappreciative of what we have given them. Enjoy temporarily; you will surely find out.
Have we given them authorization that justifies their idolatry?
When we bestow mercy upon the people, they rejoice therein. But when adversity befalls them, as a consequence of their own works, they become despondent.
Do they not realize that GOD increases the provision for whomever He wills, or reduces it? These should be lessons for people who believe.
Therefore, you shall give the relatives their rightful share (of charity), as well as the poor, and the traveling alien. This is better for those who sincerely seek GOD's pleasure; they are the winners.
The usury that is practiced to increase some people's wealth, does not gain anything at GOD. But if you give to charity, seeking GOD's pleasure, these are the ones who receive their reward manifold.
GOD is the One who created you. He is the One who provides for you. He is the One who puts you to death. He is the One who resurrects you. Can any of your idols do any of these things? Be He glorified. He is much too exalted to have any partners.
Disasters have spread throughout the land and sea, because of what the people have committed. He thus lets them taste the consequences of some of their works, that they may return (to the right works).
Say, "Roam the earth and note the consequences for those before you." Most of them were idol worshipers.
Therefore, you shall devote yourself completely to this perfect religion, before a day comes which is made inevitable by GOD. On that day, they will be shocked.
Whoever disbelieves, disbelieves to the detriment of his own soul, while those who lead a righteous life, do so to strengthen and develop their own souls.
For He will generously recompense those who believe and lead a righteous life from His bounties. He does not love the disbelievers.
Among His proofs is that He sends the winds with good omen, to shower you with His mercy, and to allow the ships to run in the sea in accordance with His rules, and for you to seek His bounties (through commerce), that you may be appreciative.
We have sent messengers before you to their people, with profound signs. Subsequently, we punished those who transgressed. It is our duty that we grant victory to the believers.
GOD is the One who sends the winds, to stir up clouds, to be spread throughout the sky in accordance with His will. He then piles the clouds up, then you see the rain coming down therefrom. When it falls on whomever He chooses from among His servants, they rejoice.
Before it fell on them, they had resorted to despair.
You shall appreciate GOD's continuous mercy, and how He revives the land that has been dead. He will just as certainly resurrect the dead. He is Omnipotent.
Had we sent upon them instead a yellow sandstorm, they would have continued to disbelieve.
You cannot make the dead, nor the deaf, hear the call, once they turn away.
Nor can you guide the blind out of their straying. You can only be heard by those who believe in our revelations, and decide to become submitters.
GOD is the One who created you weak, then granted you after the weakness strength, then substituted after the strength weakness and gray hair. He creates whatever He wills. He is the Omniscient, the Omnipotent.
On the day when the Hour comes to pass, the guilty will swear that they lasted (in this world) only one hour. That is how wrong they were.
Those who are blessed with knowledge and faith will say, "You have lasted, according to GOD's decree, until the Day of Resurrection. Now, this is the Day of Resurrection, but you failed to recognize it."
Therefore, no apology, on that day, will benefit the transgressors, nor will they be excused.
Thus, we have cited for the people in this Quran all kinds of examples. Yet, no matter what kind of proof you present to the disbelievers, they say, "You are falsifiers."
GOD thus seals the hearts of those who do not know.
Therefore, you shall steadfastly persevere- for GOD's promise is the truth- and do not be intimidated by those who have not attained certainty.
A. L. M.
These (letters) constitute proofs of this book of wisdom.
A beacon and a mercy for the righteous.
Who observe the Contact Prayers (Salat), give the obligatory charity (Zakat), and as regards the Hereafter, they are absolutely certain.
They are following the guidance from their Lord, and they are the winners.
Among the people, there are those who uphold baseless Hadith, and thus divert others from the path of GOD without knowledge, and take it in vain. These have incurred a shameful retribution.
And when our revelations are recited to the one of them, he turns away in arrogance as if he never heard them, as if his ears are deaf. Promise him a painful retribution.
Surely, those who believe and lead a righteous life have deserved the gardens of bliss.
Eternally they abide therein. This is the truthful promise of GOD. He is the Almighty, Most Wise.
He created the heavens without pillars that you can see. He established on earth stabilizers (mountains) lest it tumbles with you, and He spread on it all kinds of creatures. We send down from the sky water to grow all kinds of beautiful plants.
Such is the creation of GOD; show me what the idols you set up beside Him have created. Indeed, the transgressors are far astray.
We have endowed Luqman with wisdom: "You shall be appreciative of GOD." Whoever is appreciative is appreciative for his own good. As for those who turn unappreciative, GOD is in no need, Praiseworthy.
Recall that Luqman said to his son, as he enlightened him, "O my son, do not set up any idols beside GOD; idolatry is a gross injustice."
We enjoined the human being to honor his parents. His mother bore him, and the load got heavier and heavier. It takes two years (of intensive care) until weaning. You shall be appreciative of Me, and of your parents. To Me is the ultimate destiny.
If they try to force you to set up any idols beside Me, do not obey them. But continue to treat them amicably in this world. You shall follow only the path of those who have submitted to Me. Ultimately, you all return to Me, then I will inform you of everything you have done.
"O my son, know that even something as tiny as a mustard seed, deep inside a rock, be it in the heavens or the earth, GOD will bring it. GOD is Sublime, Cognizant.
"O my son, you shall observe the Contact Prayers (Salat). You shall advocate righteousness and forbid evil, and remain steadfast in the face of adversity. These are the most honorable traits.
"You shall not treat the people with arrogance, nor shall you roam the earth proudly. GOD does not like the arrogant showoffs.
"Walk humbly and lower your voice- the ugliest voice is the donkey's voice."
Do you not see that GOD has committed in your service everything in the heavens and the earth, and has showered you with His blessings-obvious and hidden? Yet, some people argue about GOD without knowledge, without guidance, and without the enlightening scripture.
When they are told, "Follow these revelations of GOD," they say, "No, we follow only what we found our parents doing." What if the devil is leading them to the agony of Hell?
Those who submit completely to GOD, while leading a righteous life, have gotten hold of the strongest bond. For GOD is in full control of all things.
As for those who disbelieve, do not be saddened by their disbelief. To us is their ultimate return, then we will inform them of everything they had done. GOD is fully aware of the innermost thoughts.
We let them enjoy temporarily, then commit them to severe retribution.
If you ask them, "Who created the heavens and the earth," they will say, "GOD." Say, "Praise be to GOD." Yet, most of them do not know.
To GOD belongs everything in the heavens and the earth. GOD is the Most Rich, Most Praiseworthy.
If all the trees on earth were made into pens, and the ocean supplied the ink, augmented by seven more oceans, the words of GOD would not run out. GOD is Almighty, Most Wise.
The creation and resurrection of all of you is the same as that of one person. GOD is Hearer, Seer.
Do you not realize that GOD merges the night into the day and merges the day into the night, and that He has committed the sun and the moon in your service, each running in its orbit for a specific life span, and that GOD is fully Cognizant of everything you do?
This proves that GOD is the truth, while any idol they set up beside Him is falsehood, and that GOD is the Most High, Most Great.
Do you not see that the ships roam the sea, carrying GOD's provisions, to show you some of His proofs? Indeed, these should be sufficient proofs for everyone who is steadfast, appreciative.
When violent waves surround them, they implore GOD, sincerely devoting their prayers to Him alone. But as soon as He saves them to the shore, some of them revert. None discards our revelations except those who are betrayers, unappreciative.
O people, you shall reverence your Lord, and fear a day when a father cannot help his own child, nor can a child help his father. Certainly, GOD's promise is truth. Therefore, do not be distracted by this life; do not be distracted from GOD by mere illusions.
With GOD is the knowledge regarding the Hour (end of the world). He is the One who sends down the rain, and He knows the contents of the womb. No soul knows what will happen to it tomorrow, and no one knows in which land he or she will die. GOD is Omniscient, Cognizant.
A. L. M.
The book is, without a doubt, a revelation from the Lord of the universe.
They said, "He fabricated it." Indeed, this is the truth from your Lord, to warn people who never received a warner before you, that they may be guided.
GOD is the One who created the heavens and the earth, and everything between them in six days, then assumed all authority. You have none beside Him as Lord, nor do you have an intercessor. Would you not take heed?
All matters are controlled by Him from the heaven to the earth. To Him, the day is equivalent to one thousand of your years.
Knower of all secrets and declarations; the Almighty, Most Merciful.
He is the One who perfected everything He created, and started the creation of the human from clay.
Then He continued his reproduction through a certain lowly liquid.
He shaped him and blew into him from His spirit. And He gave you the hearing, the eyesight, and the brains; rarely are you thankful.
They wonder, "After we vanish into the earth, do we get created anew?" Thus, as regards meeting their Lord, they are disbelievers.
Say, "You will be put to death by the angel in whose charge you are placed, then to your Lord you will be returned."
If only you could see the guilty when they bow down their heads before their Lord: "Our Lord, now we have seen and we have heard. Send us back and we will be righteous. Now we have attained certainty."
Had we willed, we could have given every soul its guidance, but it is already predetermined that I will fill Hell with jinns and humans, all together.
Taste the consequences of your forgetting this day; now we forget you. You have incurred eternal retribution in return for your own works.
The only people who truly believe in our revelations are those who fall prostrate upon hearing them. They glorify and praise their Lord, without any arrogance.
Their sides readily forsake their beds, in order to worship their Lord, out of reverence and hope, and from our provisions to them, they give.
You have no idea how much joy and happiness are waiting for you as a reward for your (righteous) works.
Is one who is a believer the same as one who is wicked? They are not equal.
As for those who believe and lead a righteous life, they have deserved the eternal Paradise. Such is their abode, in return for their works.
As for the wicked, their destiny is Hell. Every time they try to leave it, they will be forced back. They will be told, "Taste the agony of Hell which you used to disbelieve in."
We let them taste the smaller retribution (of this world), before they incur the greater retribution (of the Hereafter), that they may (take a hint and) reform.
Who is more evil than one who is reminded of these revelations of his Lord, then insists upon disregarding them? We will certainly punish the guilty.
We have given Moses the scripture- do not harbor any doubt about meeting Him-and we made it a guide for the Children of Israel.
We appointed from among them imams who guided in accordance with our commandments, because they steadfastly persevered and attained certainty about our revelations.
Your Lord is the One who will judge them on the Day of Resurrection, regarding everything they disputed.
Does it ever occur to them how many generations we have annihilated before them? They now live and walk in their ancestors' homes. This should provide sufficient proofs. Do they not hear?
Do they not realize that we drive the water to barren lands, and produce with it crops to feed their livestock, as well as themselves? Do they not see?
They challenge: "Where is that victory, if you are truthful?"
Say, "The day such a victory comes, believing will not benefit those who did not believe before that, nor will they be given another chance."
Therefore, disregard them and wait, they too are waiting.
O you prophet, you shall reverence GOD and do not obey the disbelievers and the hypocrites. GOD is Omniscient, Most Wise.
Follow what is revealed to you from your Lord. GOD is fully Cognizant of everything you all do.
And put your trust in GOD. GOD suffices as an advocate.
GOD did not give any man two hearts in his chest. Nor did He turn your wives whom you estrange (according to your custom) into your mothers. Nor did He turn your adopted children into genetic offspring. All these are mere utterances that you have invented. GOD speaks the truth, and He guides in the (right) path.
You shall give your adopted children names that preserve their relationship to their genetic parents. This is more equitable in the sight of GOD. If you do not know their parents, then, as your brethren in religion, you shall treat them as members of your family. You do not commit a sin if you make a mistake in this respect; you are responsible for your purposeful intentions. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
The prophet is closer to the believers than they are to each other, and his wives are like mothers to them. The relatives ought to take care of one another in accordance with GOD's scripture. Thus, the believers shall take care of their relatives who immigrate to them, provided they have taken care of their own families first. These are commandments of this scripture.
Recall that we took from the prophets their covenant, including you (O Muhammad), Noah, Abraham, Moses, and Jesus the son of Mary. We took from them a solemn pledge.
Subsequently, He will surely question the truthful about their truthfulness, and has prepared for the disbelievers (in this Quranic fact) a painful retribution.
O you who believe, remember GOD's blessing upon you; when soldiers attacked you, we sent upon them violent wind and invisible soldiers. GOD is Seer of everything you do.
When they came from above you, and from beneath you, your eyes were terrified, your hearts ran out of patience, and you harbored unbefitting thoughts about GOD.
That is when the believers were truly tested; they were severely shaken up.
The hypocrites and those with doubts in their hearts said, "What GOD and His messenger promised us was no more than an illusion!"
A group of them said, "O people of Yathrib, you cannot attain victory; go back." Others made up excuses to the prophet: "Our homes are vulnerable," when they were not vulnerable. They just wanted to flee.
Had the enemy invaded and asked them to join, they would have joined the enemy without hesitation.
They had pledged to GOD in the past that they would not turn around and flee; making a pledge with GOD involves a great responsibility.
Say, "If you flee, you can never flee from death or from being killed. No matter what happens, you only live a short while longer."
Say, "Who would protect you from GOD if He willed any adversity, or willed any blessing for you?" They can never find, beside GOD, any other Lord and Master.
GOD is fully aware of the hinderers among you, and those who say to their comrades, "Let us all stay behind." Rarely do they mobilize for defense.
Also, they are too stingy when dealing with you. If anything threatens the community, you see their eyes rolling with fear, as if death had already come to them. Once the crisis is over, they whip you with sharp tongues. They are too stingy with their wealth. These are not believers, and, consequently, GOD has nullified their works. This is easy for GOD to do.
They thought that the parties might come back. In that case, they would wish that they were lost in the desert, asking about your news from afar. Had the parties attacked you while they were with you, they would rarely support you.
The messenger of GOD has set up a good example for those among you who seek GOD and the Last Day, and constantly think about GOD.
When the true believers saw the parties (ready to attack), they said, "This is what GOD and His messenger have promised us, and GOD and His messenger are truthful." This (dangerous situation) only strengthened their faith and augmented their submission.
Among the believers there are people who fulfill their pledges with GOD. Some of them died, while others stand ready, never wavering.
GOD will surely recompense the truthful for their truthfulness, and will punish the hypocrites, if He so wills, or redeem them. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
GOD repulsed those who disbelieved with their rage, and they left empty handed. GOD thus spared the believers any fighting. GOD is Powerful, Almighty.
He also brought down their allies among the people of the scripture from their secure positions, and threw terror into their hearts. Some of them you killed, and some you took captive.
He made you inherit their land, their homes, their money, and lands you had never stepped on. GOD is in full control of all things.
O prophet, say to your wives, "If you are seeking this life and its vanities, then let me compensate you and allow you to go amicably.
"But if you are seeking GOD and His messenger, and the abode of the Hereafter, then GOD has prepared for the righteous among you a great recompense."
O wives of the prophet, if any of you commits a gross sin, the retribution will be doubled for her. This is easy for GOD to do.
Any one of you who obeys GOD and His messenger, and leads a righteous life, we will grant her double the recompense, and we have prepared for her a generous provision.
O wives of the prophet, you are not the same as any other women, if you observe righteousness. (You have a greater responsibility.) Therefore, you shall not speak too softly, lest those with disease in their hearts may get the wrong ideas; you shall speak only righteousness.
You shall settle down in your homes, and do not mingle with the people excessively, like you used to do in the old days of ignorance. You shall observe the Contact Prayers (Salat), and give the obligatory charity (Zakat), and obey GOD and His messenger. GOD wishes to remove all unholiness from you, O you who live around the Sacred Shrine, and to purify you completely.
Remember what is being recited in your homes of GOD's revelations and the wisdom inherent therein. GOD is Sublime, Cognizant.
The submitting men, the submitting women, the believing men, the believing women, the obedient men, the obedient women, the truthful men, the truthful women, the steadfast men, the steadfast women, the reverent men, the reverent women, the charitable men, the charitable women, the fasting men, the fasting women, the chaste men, the chaste women, and the men who commemorate GOD frequently, and the commemorating women; GOD has prepared for them forgiveness and a great recompense.
No believing man or believing woman, if GOD and His messenger issue any command, has any choice regarding that command. Anyone who disobeys GOD and His messenger has gone far astray.
Recall that you said to the one who was blessed by GOD, and blessed by you, "Keep your wife and reverence GOD," and you hid inside yourself what GOD wished to proclaim. Thus, you feared the people, when you were supposed to fear only GOD. When Zeid was completely through with his wife, we had you marry her, in order to establish the precedent that a man may marry the divorced wife of his adopted son. GOD's commands shall be done.
The prophet is not committing an error by doing anything that is made lawful by GOD. Such is GOD's system since the early generations. GOD's command is a sacred duty.
Those who deliver GOD's messages, and who reverence Him alone, shall never fear anyone but GOD. GOD is the most efficient reckoner.
Muhammad was not the father of any man among you. He was a messenger of GOD and the final prophet. GOD is fully aware of all things.
O you who believe, you shall remember GOD frequently.
You shall glorify Him day and night.
He is the One who helps you, together with His angels, to lead you out of darkness into the light. He is Most Merciful towards the believers.
Their greeting the day they meet Him is, "Peace," and He has prepared for them a generous recompense.
O prophet, we have sent you as a witness, a bearer of good news, as well as a warner.
Inviting to GOD, in accordance with His will, and a guiding beacon.
Deliver good news to the believers, that they have deserved from GOD a great blessing.
Do not obey the disbelievers and the hypocrites, disregard their insults, and put your trust in GOD; GOD suffices as an advocate.
O you who believe, if you married believing women, then divorced them before having intercourse with them, they do not owe you any waiting interim (before marrying another man). You shall compensate them equitably, and let them go amicably.
O prophet, we made lawful for you your wives to whom you have paid their due dowry, or what you already have, as granted to you by GOD. Also lawful for you in marriage are the daughters of your father's brothers, the daughters of your father's sisters, the daughters of your mother's brothers, the daughters of your mother's sisters, who have emigrated with you. Also, if a believing woman gave herself to the prophet-by forfeiting the dowry- the prophet may marry her without a dowry, if he so wishes. However, her forfeiting of the dowry applies only to the prophet, and not to the other believers. We have already decreed their rights in regard to their spouses or what they already have. This is to spare you any embarrassment. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
You may gently shun any one of them, and you may bring closer to you any one of them. If you reconcile with any one you had estranged, you commit no error. In this way, they will be pleased, will have no grief, and will be content with what you equitably offer to all of them. GOD knows what is in your hearts. GOD is Omniscient, Clement.
Beyond the categories described to you, you are enjoined from marrying any other women, nor can you substitute a new wife (from the prohibited categories), no matter how much you admire their beauty. You must be content with those already made lawful to you. GOD is watchful over all things.
O you who believe, do not enter the prophet's homes unless you are given permission to eat, nor shall you force such an invitation in any manner. If you are invited, you may enter. When you finish eating, you shall leave; do not engage him in lengthy conversations. This used to hurt the prophet, and he was too shy to tell you. But GOD does not shy away from the truth. If you have to ask his wives for something, ask them from behind a barrier. This is purer for your hearts and their hearts. You are not to hurt the messenger of GOD. You shall not marry his wives after him, for this would be a gross offense in the sight of GOD.
Whether you declare anything, or hide it, GOD is fully aware of all things.
The women may relax (their dress code) around their fathers, their sons, their brothers, the sons of their brothers, the sons of their sisters, the other women, and their (female) servants. They shall reverence GOD. GOD witnesses all things.
GOD and His angels help and support the prophet. O you who believe, you shall help and support him, and regard him as he should be regarded.
Surely, those who oppose GOD and His messenger, GOD afflicts them with a curse in this life, and in the Hereafter; He has prepared for them a shameful retribution.
Those who persecute the believing men and the believing women, who did not do anything wrong, have committed not only a falsehood, but also a gross sin.
O prophet, tell your wives, your daughters, and the wives of the believers that they shall lengthen their garments. Thus, they will be recognized (as righteous women) and avoid being insulted. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
Unless the hypocrites, and those with disease in their hearts, and the vicious liars of the city refrain (from persecuting you), we will surely grant you the upper hand, then they will be forced to leave within a short while.
They have incurred condemnation wherever they go; (unless they stop attacking you,) they may be taken and killed.
This is GOD's eternal system, and you will find that GOD's system is unchangeable.
The people ask you about the Hour (end of the world). Say, "The knowledge thereof is only with GOD. For all that you know, the Hour may be close."
GOD has condemned the disbelievers, and has prepared for them Hell.
Eternally they abide therein. They will find no lord, nor a supporter.
The day they are thrown into Hell, they will say, "Oh, we wish we obeyed GOD, and obeyed the messenger."
They will also say, "Our Lord, we have obeyed our masters and leaders, but they led us astray.
"Our Lord, give them double the retribution, and curse them a tremendous curse."
O you who believe, do not be like those who hurt Moses, then GOD absolved him of what they said. He was, in the sight of GOD, honorable.
O you who believe, reverence GOD and utter only the correct utterances.
He will then fix your works, and forgive your sins. Those who obey GOD and His messenger have triumphed a great triumph.
We have offered the responsibility (freedom of choice) to the heavens and the earth, and the mountains, but they refused to bear it, and were afraid of it. But the human being accepted it; he was transgressing, ignorant.
For GOD will inevitably punish the hypocrite men and the hypocrite women, and the idol worshiping men and the idol worshiping women. GOD redeems the believing men and the believing women. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
Praise be to GOD-to whom belongs everything in the heavens and the earth; all praise is also due to Him in the Hereafter. He is the Most Wise, the Cognizant.
He knows everything that goes into the earth, and everything that comes out of it, and everything that comes down from the sky, and everything that climbs into it. He is the Most Merciful, the Forgiving.
Those who disbelieve have said, "The Hour will never come to pass!" Say, "Absolutely-by my Lord-it will most certainly come to you. He is the Knower of the future. Not even the equivalent of an atom's weight is hidden from Him, be it in the heavens or the earth. Not even smaller than that, or larger (is hidden). All are in a profound record."
Most certainly, He will reward those who believe and lead a righteous life. These have deserved forgiveness and a generous provision.
As for those who constantly challenge our revelations, they have incurred a retribution of painful humiliation.
It is evident to those who are blessed with knowledge that this revelation from your Lord to you is the truth, and that it guides to the path of the Almighty, the Most Praiseworthy.
Those who disbelieve have said, "Let us show you a man who tells you that after you are torn apart you will be created anew.
"Either he fabricated lies about GOD, or he is crazy." Indeed, those who disbelieve in the Hereafter have incurred the worst retribution; they have gone far astray.
Have they not seen all the things in front of them and behind them, in the heaven and the earth? If we willed, we could have caused the earth to swallow them, or caused masses to fall on them from the sky. This should be a sufficient proof for every obedient servant.
We endowed David with blessings from us: "O mountains, submit with him, and you too, O birds." We softened the iron for him.
"You may make shields that fit perfectly, and work righteousness. Whatever you do, I am Seer thereof."
To Solomon we committed the wind at his disposal, traveling one month coming and one month going. And we caused a spring of oil to gush out for him. Also, the jinns worked for him, by his Lord's leave. Any one of them who disregarded our commands, we subjected him to a severe retribution.
They made for him anything he wanted-niches, statues, deep pools, and heavy cooking pots. O family of David, work (righteousness) to show your appreciation. Only a few of My servants are appreciative.
When the appointed time for his death came, they had no clue that he had died. Not until one of the animals tried to eat his staff, and he fell down, did the jinns realized that he was dead. They thus realized that if they really knew the unseen, they would have stopped working so hard as soon as he died.
Sheba's homeland used to be a marvel, with two gardens on the right and the left. Eat from your Lord's provisions, and be appreciative of Him-good land, and a forgiving Lord.
They turned away and, consequently, we poured upon them a disastrous flood, and we substituted their two gardens into two gardens of bad-tasting fruits, thorny plants, and a skimpy harvest.
We thus requited them for their disbelief. Do we not requite only the disbelievers?
We placed between them and the communites that we blessed other oases, and we secured the journey between them: "Travel therein days and nights in complete security."
But they (turned unappreciative and) challenged: "Our Lord, we do not care if You increase the distance of our journeys (without any stations)." They thus wronged their own souls. Consequently, we made them history, and scattered them into small communities throughout the land. This should provide lessons for those who are steadfast, appreciative.
Satan found them readily fulfilling his expectations. They followed him, except a few believers.
He never had any power over them. But we thus distinguish those who believe in the Hereafter from those who are doubtful about it. Your Lord is in full control of all things.
Say, "Implore the idols you have set up beside GOD. They do not possess as much as a single atom in the heavens, or the earth. They possess no partnership therein, nor does He permit them to be His assistants."
Intercession with Him will be in vain, unless it coincides with His will. When their minds are finally settled down, and they ask, "What did your Lord say," they will say, "The truth." He is the Most High, the Most Great.
Say, "Who provides for you, from the heavens and the earth?" Say, "GOD," and "Either we or you are guided, or have gone far astray."
Say, "You are not responsible for our crimes, nor are we responsible for what you do."
Say, "Our Lord will gather us all together before Him, then He will judge between us equitably. He is the Judge, the Omniscient."
Say, "Show me the idols you have set up as partners with Him!" Say, "No; He is the one GOD, the Almighty, Most Wise."
We have sent you (O Rashad) to all the people, a bearer of good news, as well as a warner, but most people do not know.
They challenge, "When will this promise come to pass, if you are truthful?"
Say, "You have a specific time, on a specific day, that you cannot delay by one hour, nor advance."
Those who disbelieve have said, "We will not believe in this Quran, nor in the previous scriptures." If you could only envision these transgressors when they stand before their Lord! They will argue with one another back and forth. The followers will tell their leaders, "If it were not for you, we would have been believers."
The leaders will say to those who followed them, "Are we the ones who diverted you from the guidance after it came to you? No; it is you who were wicked."
The followers will say to their leaders, "It was you who schemed night and day, then commanded us to be unappreciative of GOD, and to set up idols to rank with Him." They will be ridden with remorse, when they see the retribution, for we will place shackles around the necks of those who disbelieved. Are they not justly requited for what they did?
Every time we sent a warner to a community, the leaders of that community said, "We reject the message you are sent with."
They also said, "We are more powerful, with more money and children, and we will not be punished."
Say, "My Lord is the One who controls all provisions; He grants the provisions to whomever He wills, or reduces them, but most people do not know."
It is not your money or your children that bring you closer to us. Only those who believe and lead a righteous life will receive the reward for their works, multiplied manifold. In the abode of Paradise they will live in perfect peace.
As for those who consistently challenge our revelations, they will abide in retribution.
Say, "My Lord is the One who controls all provisions; He increases the provisions for whomever He chooses from among His servants, or reduces them. Anything you spend (in the cause of God), He will reward you for it; He is the Best Provider."
On the day when He summons them all, He will say to the angels, "Did these people worship you?"
They will answer, "Be You glorified. You are our Lord and Master, not them. Instead, they were worshiping the jinns; most of them were believers therein."
On that day, you possess no power to help or harm one another, and we will say to the transgressors, "Taste the retribution of the Hell that you used to deny."
When our proofs were recited to them, perfectly clear, they said, "This is simply a man who wants to divert you from the way your parents are worshiping." They also said, "These are fabricated lies." Those who disbelieved also said about the truth that came to them, "This is obviously magic."
We did not give them any other books to study, nor did we send to them before you another warner.
Those before them disbelieved, and even though they did not see one- tenth of (the miracle) we have given to this generation, when they disbelieved My messengers, how severe was My retribution!
Say, "I ask you to do one thing: Devote yourselves to GOD, in pairs or as individuals, then reflect. Your friend (Rashad) is not crazy. He is a manifest warner to you, just before the advent of a terrible retribution."
Say, "I do not ask you for any wage; you can keep it. My wage comes only from GOD. He witnesses all things."
Say, "My Lord causes the truth to prevail. He is the Knower of all secrets."
Say, "The truth has come; while falsehood can neither initiate anything, nor repeat it."
Say, "If I go astray, I go astray because of my own shortcomings. And if I am guided, it is because of my Lord's inspiration. He is Hearer, Near."
If you could only see them when the great terror strikes them; they cannot escape then, and they will be taken away forcibly.
They will then say, "We now believe in it," but it will be far too late.
They have rejected it in the past; they have decided instead to uphold conjecture and guesswork.
Consequently, they were deprived of everything they longed for. This is the same fate as their counterparts in the previous generations. They harbored too many doubts.
Praise be to GOD, Initiator of the heavens and the earth, and appointer of the angels to be messengers with wings-two, three, and four (wings). He increases the creation as He wills. GOD is Omnipotent.
When GOD showers the people with mercy, no force can stop it. And if He withholds it, no force, other than He, can send it. He is the Almighty, Most Wise.
O people, remember GOD's blessings upon you. Is there any creator other than GOD who provides for you from the heaven and the earth? There is no other god beside Him. How could you deviate?
If they disbelieve you, messengers before you have been disbelieved. GOD is in control of all things.
O people, GOD's promise is the truth; therefore, do not be distracted by this lowly life. Do not be diverted from GOD by mere illusions.
The devil is your enemy, so treat him as an enemy. He only invites his party to be the dwellers of Hell.
Those who disbelieve have incurred a severe retribution, and those who believe and lead a righteous life have deserved forgiveness and a great recompense.
Note the one whose evil work is adorned in his eyes, until he thinks that it is righteous. GOD thus sends astray whoever wills (to go astray), and He guides whoever wills (to be guided). Therefore, do not grieve over them. GOD is fully aware of everything they do.
GOD is the One who sends the winds to stir up clouds, then we drive them towards barren lands, and revive such lands after they were dead. Thus is the resurrection.
Anyone seeking dignity should know that to GOD belongs all dignity. To Him ascends the good words, and He exalts the righteous works. As for those who scheme evil works, they incur severe retribution; the scheming of such people is destined to fail.
GOD created you from dust, then from a tiny drop, then He causes you to reproduce through your spouses. No female becomes pregnant, nor gives birth, without His knowledge. No one survives for a long life, and no one's life is snapped short, except in accordance with a pre-existing record. This is easy for GOD.
The two seas are not the same; one is fresh and delicious, while the other is salty and undrinkable. From each of them you eat tender meat, and extract jewelry to wear. And you see the ships sailing through them, seeking His provisions, that you may be appreciative.
He merges the night into the day, and merges the day into the night. He has committed the sun and the moon to run for a predetermined period of time. Such is GOD your Lord; to Him belongs all kingship. Any idols you set up beside Him do not possess as much as a seed's shell.
If you call on them, they cannot hear you. Even if they hear you, they cannot respond to you. On the Day of Resurrection, they will disown you. None can inform you like the Most Cognizant.
O people, you are the ones who need GOD, while GOD is in no need for anyone, the Most Praiseworthy.
If He wills, He can get rid of you and substitute a new creation.
This is not too difficult for GOD.
No soul can carry the sins of another soul. If a soul that is loaded with sins implores another to bear part of its load, no other soul can carry any part of it, even if they were related. The only people to heed your warnings are those who reverence their Lord, even when alone in their privacy, and observe the Contact Prayers (Salat). Whoever purifies his soul, does so for his own good. To GOD is the final destiny.
The blind and the seer are not equal.
Nor are the darkness and the light.
Nor are the coolness of the shade and the heat of the sun.
Nor are the living and the dead; GOD causes whomever He wills to hear. You cannot make hearers out of those in the graves.
You are no more than a warner.
We have sent you with the truth, a bearer of good news, as well as a warner. Every community must receive a warner.
If they disbelieve you, those before them have also disbelieved. Their messengers went to them with clear proofs, and the Psalms, and the enlightening scriptures.
Subsequently, I punished those who disbelieved; how terrible was My retribution!
Do you not realize that GOD sends down from the sky water, whereby we produce fruits of various colors? Even the mountains have different colors; the peaks are white, or red, or some other color. And the ravens are black.
Also, the people, the animals, and the livestock come in various colors. This is why the people who truly reverence GOD are those who are knowledgeable. GOD is Almighty, Forgiving.
Surely, those who recite the book of GOD, observe the Contact Prayers (Salat), and from our provisions to them they spend- secretly and publicly-are engaged in an investment that never loses.
He will recompense them generously, and will multiply His blessings upon them. He is Forgiving, Appreciative.
What we revealed to you in this scripture is the truth, consummating all previous scriptures. GOD is fully Cognizant of His servants, Seer.
We passed the scripture from generation to generation, and we allowed whomever we chose from among our servants to receive it. Subsequently, some of them wronged their souls, others upheld it only part of the time, while others were eager to work righteousness in accordance with GOD's will; this is the greatest triumph.
They will enter the gardens of Eden, where they will be adorned with bracelets of gold and pearls, and their garments in it will be made of silk.
They will say, "Praise GOD for removing all our worries. Our Lord is Forgiving, Appreciative.
"He has admitted us into the abode of eternal bliss, out of His grace. Never do we get bored herein, never do we get tired."
As for those who disbelieve, they have incurred the fire of Hell, where they are never finished by death, nor is the retribution ever commuted for them. We thus requite the unappreciative.
They will scream therein, "Our Lord, if you get us out of here, we will work righteousness, instead of the works we used to do." Did we not give you a life-long chance, with continuous reminders for those who would take heed? Did you not receive the warner? Therefore, taste (the consequences). The transgressors will have no one to help them.
GOD is the Knower of the future of the heavens and the earth. He is the Knower of all innermost thoughts.
He is the One who made you inheritors of the earth. Subsequently, whoever chooses to disbelieve does so to his own detriment. The disbelief of the disbelievers only augments their Lord's abhorrence towards them. The disbelief of the disbelievers plunges them deeper into loss.
Say, "Consider the idols you have set up beside GOD; show me what on earth have they created." Do they own any partnership in the heavens? Have we given them a book wherein there is no doubt? Indeed, what the transgressors promise one another is no more than an illusion.
GOD is the One who holds the heavens and the earth, lest they vanish. If anyone else is to hold them, they will most certainly vanish. He is Clement, Forgiving.
They swore by GOD solemnly that if a warner went to them, they would be better guided than a certain congregation! However, now that the warner did come to them, this only plunged them deeper into aversion.
They resorted to arrogance on earth, and evil scheming, and the evil schemes only backfire on those who scheme them. Should they then expect anything but the fate of those who did the same things in the past? You will find that GOD's system is never changeable; you will find that GOD's system is immutable.
Have they not roamed the earth and noted the consequences for those who preceded them? They were even stronger than they. Nothing can be hidden from GOD in the heavens, nor on earth. He is Omniscient, Omnipotent.
If GOD punished the people for their sins, He would not leave a single creature on earth. But He respites them for a predetermined interim. Once their interim is fulfilled, then GOD is Seer of His servants.
Y. S. (Ya Sin)
And the Quran that is full of wisdom.
Most assuredly, you (Rashad) are one of the messengers.
On a straight path.
This revelation is from the Almighty, Most Merciful.
To warn people whose parents were never warned, and therefore, they are unaware.
It has been predetermined that most of them do not believe.
For we place around their necks shackles, up to their chins. Consequently, they become locked in their disbelief.
And we place a barrier in front of them, and a barrier behind them, and thus, we veil them; they cannot see.
It is the same whether you warn them or not, they cannot believe.
You will be heeded only by those who uphold this message, and reverence the Most Gracious-even when alone in their privacy. Give them good news of forgiveness and a generous recompense.
We will certainly revive the dead, and we have recorded everything they have done in this life, as well as the consequences that continue after their death. Everything we have counted in a profound record.
Cite for them the example of people in a community that received the messengers.
When we sent to them two (messengers), they disbelieved them. We then supported them by a third. They said, "We are (God's) messengers to you."
They said, "You are no more than human beings like us. The Most Gracious did not send down anything. You are liars."
They said, "Our Lord knows that we have been sent to you.
"Our sole mission is to deliver the message."
They said, "We consider you bad omens. Unless you refrain, we will surely stone you, or afflict you with painful retribution."
They said, "Your omen depends on your response, now that you have been reminded. Indeed, you are transgressing people."
A man came from the other end of the city, saying, "O my people, follow the messengers.
"Follow those who do not ask you for any wage, and are guided.
"Why should I not worship the One who initiated me, and to Him is your ultimate return?
"Shall I set up beside Him gods? If the Most Gracious willed any harm for me, their intercession cannot help me one bit, nor can they rescue me.
"In that case, I would be totally astray.
"I have believed in your Lord; please listen to me."
(At the time of his death) he was told, "Enter Paradise." He said, "Oh, I wish my people knew.
"That my Lord has forgiven me, and made me honorable."
We did not send down upon his people, after him, soldiers from the sky; we did not need to send them down.
All it took was one blow, whereupon they were stilled.
How sorry is the people's condition! Every time a messenger went to them, they always ridiculed him.
Did they not see how many generations we annihilated before them, and how they never return to them?
Every one of them will be summoned before us.
One sign for them is the dead land: we revive it and produce from it grains for their food.
We grow in it gardens of date palms, and grapes, and we cause springs to gush out therein.
This is to provide them with fruits, and to let them manufacture with their own hands whatever they need. Would they be thankful?
Glory be to the One who created all kinds of plants from the earth, as well as themselves, and other creations that they do not even know.
Another sign for them is the night: we remove the daylight therefrom, whereupon they are in darkness.
The sun sets into a specific location, according to the design of the Almighty, the Omniscient.
The moon we designed to appear in stages, until it becomes like an old curved sheath.
The sun is never to catch up with the moon-the night and the day never deviate-each of them is floating in its own orbit.
Another sign for them is that we carried their ancestors on the loaded ark.
Then we created the same for them to ride in.
If we willed, we could have drowned them, so that their screaming would not be heard, nor could they be saved.
Instead, we shower them with mercy, and let them enjoy for awhile.
Yet, when they are told, "Learn from your past, to work righteousness for your future, that you may attain mercy,"
No matter what kind of proof is given to them from their Lord, they consistently disregard it.
When they are told, "Give from GOD's provisions to you," those who disbelieve say to those who believe, "Why should we give to those whom GOD could feed, if He so willed? You are really far astray."
They also challenge, "When will that promise come to pass, if you are truthful?"
All they see will be one blow that overwhelms them, while they dispute.
They will not even have time to make a will, nor will they be able to return to their people.
The horn will be blown, whereupon they will rise from the grave and go to their Lord.
They will say, "Woe to us. Who resurrected us from our death? This is what the Most Gracious has promised. The messengers were right."
All it will take is one blow, whereupon they are summoned before us.
On that day, no soul will be wronged in the least. You will be paid precisely for whatever you did.
The dwellers of Paradise will be, on that day, happily busy.
They abide with their spouses in beautiful shade, enjoying comfortable furnishings.
They will have fruits therein; they will have anything they wish.
Greetings of peace from a Most Merciful Lord.
As for you, O guilty ones, you will be set aside.
Did I not covenant with you, O Children of Adam, that you shall not worship the devil? That he is your most ardent enemy?
And that you shall worship Me alone? This is the right path.
He has misled multitudes of you. Did you not possess any understanding?
This is the Hell that was promised for you.
Today you will burn in it, as a consequence of your disbelief.
On that day we will seal their mouths; their hands and feet will bear witness to everything they had done.
If we will, we can veil their eyes and, consequently, when they seek the path, they will not see.
If we will, we can freeze them in place; thus, they can neither move forward, nor go back.
Whomever we permit to live for a long time, we revert him to weakness. Do they not understand?
What we taught him (the messenger) was not poetry, nor is he (a poet). This is but a formidable proof, and a profound Quran.
To preach to those who are alive, and to expose the disbelievers.
Have they not seen that we created for them, with our own hands, livestock that they own?
And we subdued them for them; some they ride, and some they eat.
They derive other benefits from them, as well as drinks. Would they not be appreciative?
They set up beside GOD other gods, perhaps they can be of help to them!
On the contrary, they cannot help them; they end up serving them as devoted soldiers.
Therefore, do not be saddened by their utterances. We are fully aware of everything they conceal and everything they declare.
Does the human being not see that we created him from a tiny drop, then he turns into an ardent enemy?
He raises a question to us-while forgetting his initial creation-"Who can resurrect the bones after they had rotted?"
Say, "The One who initiated them in the first place will resurrect them. He is fully aware of every creation."
He is the One who creates for you, from the green trees, fuel which you burn for light.
Is not the One who created the heavens and the earth able to recreate the same? Yes indeed; He is the Creator, the Omniscient.
All He needs to do to carry out any command is to say to it, "Be," and it is.
Therefore, glory be to the One in whose hand is the sovereignty over all things, and to Him you will be returned.
The arrangers in columns.
The blamers of those to be blamed.
The reciters of the messages.
Your god is only one.
The Lord of the heavens and the earth, and everything between them, and Lord of the easts.
We have adorned the lowest heaven with adorning planets.
We guarded it from every evil devil.
They cannot spy on the High Society; they get bombarded from every side.
They have been condemned; they have incurred an eternal retribution.
If any of them ventures to charge the outer limits, he gets struck with a fierce projectile.
Ask them, "Are they more difficult to create, or the other creations?" We created them from wet mud.
While you are awed, they mock.
When reminded, they take no heed.
When they see proof, they ridicule it.
They say, "This is obviously magic!
"After we die and become dust and bones, do we get resurrected?
"Even our ancient ancestors?"
Say, "Yes, you will be forcibly summoned."
All it takes is one nudge, whereupon they (stand up) looking.
They will say, "Woe to us; this is the Day of Judgment."
This is the day of decision that you used to disbelieve in.
Summon the transgressors, and their spouses, and the idols they worshiped
beside GOD, and guide them to the path of Hell.
Stop them, and ask them:
"Why do you not help one another?"
They will be, on that day, totally submitting.
They will come to each other, questioning and blaming one another.
They will say (to their leaders), "You used to come to us from the right side."
They will respond, "It is you who were not believers.
"We never had any power over you; it is you who were wicked.
"We justly incurred our Lord's judgment; now we have to suffer.
"We misled you, only because we were astray."
Thus, together they will all partake of the retribution on that day.
This is how we requite the guilty.
When they were told, "La Elaha Ella Allah (There is no other god beside GOD)," they turned arrogant.
They said, "Shall we leave our gods for the sake of a crazy poet?"
In fact, he has brought the truth, and has confirmed the messengers.
Most assuredly, you will taste the most painful retribution.
You are requited only for what you have done.
Only GOD's servants who are absolutely devoted to Him alone (will be saved).
They have deserved provisions that are reserved specifically for them.
All kinds of fruits. They will be honored.
In the gardens of bliss.
On furnishings close to one another.
Cups of pure drinks will be offered to them.
Clear and delicious for the drinkers.
Never polluted, and never exhausted.
With them will be wonderful companions.
Protected like fragile eggs.
They will come to each other, and confer with one another.
One of them will say, "I used to have a friend.
"He used to mock: 'Do you believe all this?
" 'After we die and turn into dust and bones, do we get called to account?' "
He will say, "Just take a look!"
When he looks, he will see his friend in the heart of Hell.
He (will go to him and) say, "By GOD, you almost ruined me.
"If it were not for my Lord's blessing, I would have been with you now.
"(Do you still believe) that we die,
"only the first death, and we never receive any requital?"
Such is the greatest triumph.
This is what every worker should work for.
Is this a better destiny, or the tree of bitterness?
We have rendered it a punishment for the transgressors.
It is a tree that grows in the heart of Hell.
Its flowers look like the devils' heads.
They will eat from it until their bellies are filled up.
Then they will top it with a hellish drink.
Then they will return to Hell.
They found their parents astray.
And they blindly followed in their footsteps.
Most of the previous generations have strayed in the same manner.
We have sent to them warners.
Note the consequences for those who have been warned.
Only GOD's servants who are absolutely devoted to Him alone (are saved).
Thus, Noah called upon us, and we were the best responders.
We saved him and his family from the great disaster.
We made his companions the survivors.
And we preserved his history for subsequent generations.
Peace be upon Noah among the peoples.
We thus reward the righteous.
He is one of our believing servants.
We drowned all the others.
Among his followers was Abraham.
He came to his Lord wholeheartedly.
He said to his father and his people, "What are you worshiping?
"Is it these fabricated gods, instead of GOD, that you want?
"What do you think of the Lord of the universe?"
He looked carefully at the stars.
Then he gave up and said, "I am tired of this!"
They turned away from him.
He then turned on their idols, saying, "Would you like to eat?
"Why do you not speak?"
He then destroyed them.
They went to him in a great rage.
He said, "How can you worship what you carve?
"When GOD has created you, and everything you make!"
They said, "Let us build a great fire, and throw him into it."
They schemed against him, but we made them the losers.
He said, "I am going to my Lord; He will guide me."
"My Lord, grant me righteous children."
We gave him good news of a good child.
When he grew enough to work with him, he said, "My son, I see in a dream that I am sacrificing you. What do you think?" He said, "O my father, do what you are commanded to do. You will find me, GOD willing, patient."
They both submitted, and he put his forehead down (to sacrifice him).
We called him: "O Abraham.
"You have believed the dream." We thus reward the righteous.
That was an exacting test indeed.
We ransomed (Ismail) by substituting an animal sacrifice.
And we preserved his history for subsequent generations.
Peace be upon Abraham.
We thus reward the righteous.
He is one of our believing servants.
Then we gave him the good news about the birth of Isaac, to be one of the righteous prophets.
We blessed him and Isaac. Among their descendants, some are righteous, and some are wicked transgressors.
We also blessed Moses and Aaron.
We delivered them and their people from the great disaster.
We supported them, until they became the winners.
We gave both of them the profound scripture.
We guided them in the right path.
We preserved their history for subsequent generations.
Peace be upon Moses and Aaron.
We thus reward the righteous.
Both of them were among our righteous servants.
Elias was one of the messengers.
He said to his people, "Would you not work righteousness?
"Do you worship a statue, instead of the Supreme Creator?
"GOD; your Lord, and the Lord of your forefathers!"
They disbelieved him. Consequently, they had to be called to account.
Only GOD's servants who are absolutely devoted to Him alone (are saved).
We preserved his history for subsequent generations.
Peace be upon Elias, and all those like Elias.
We thus reward the righteous.
He was one of our believing servants.
Lot was one of the messengers.
We saved him and all his family.
Only the old woman was doomed.
We annihilated all the others.
You still pass by their ruins by day.
And by night. Would you understand?
Jonah was one of the messengers.
He escaped to the loaded ship.
He rebelled and thus, he joined the losers.
Consequently, the fish swallowed him, and he was the one to blame.
If it were not that he resorted to meditation (on God),
he would have stayed in its belly until the Day of Resurrection.
We had him thrown up into the desert, exhausted.
We had a tree of edible fruit grown for him.
Then we sent him to a hundred thousand, or more.
They did believe, and we let them enjoy this life.
Ask them if your Lord have daughters, while they have sons!
Did we create the angels to be females? Did they witness that?
Indeed, they grossly blaspheme when they say-
"GOD has begotten a son." Indeed, they are liars.
Did He choose the girls over the boys?
What is wrong with your logic?
Why do you not take heed?
Do you have any proof?
Show us your book, if you are truthful.
They even invented a special relationship between Him and the jinns. The jinns themselves know that they are subservient.
GOD be glorified; far above their claims.
Only GOD's servants who are devoted to Him alone (are saved).
Indeed, you and what you worship.
Cannot impose anything on Him.
Only you will burn in Hell.
Each one of us has a specific job.
We are the arrangers.
We have duly glorified (our Lord).
They used to say,
"Had we received the correct instructions from our parents,
"we would have been worshipers; devoted to GOD alone."
But they disbelieved, and they will surely find out.
Our decision is already decreed for our servants the messengers.
They are surely the victors.
Our soldiers are the winners.
So disregard them for awhile.
Watch them; they too will watch.
Do they challenge our retribution?
When it hits them one day, it will be a miserable day; they have been sufficiently warned.
Disregard them for awhile.
Watch them; they too will watch.
Glory be to your Lord, the great Lord; far above their claims.
Peace be upon the messengers.
Praise be to GOD, Lord of the universe.
S. (Saad), and the Quran that contains the proof.
Those who disbelieve have plunged into arrogance and defiance.
Many a generation before them we annihilated. They called for help, in vain.
They wondered that a warner should come to them, from among them. The disbelievers said, "A magician, a liar.
"Did he make the gods into one god? This is really strange."
The leaders announced, "Go and steadfastly persevere in worshiping your gods. This is what is desired.
"We never heard of this from the religion of our fathers. This is a lie.
"Why did the proof come down to him, instead of us?" Indeed, they are doubtful of My proof. Indeed, they have not yet tasted My retribution.
Do they own the treasures of mercy of your Lord, the Almighty, the Grantor.
Do they possess the sovereignty of the heavens and the earth, and everything between them? Let them help themselves.
Instead, whatever forces they can muster-even if all their parties banded together-will be defeated.
Disbelieving before them were the people of Noah, 'Ad, and the mighty Pharaoh.
Also, Thamud, the people of Lot, the dwellers of the Woods (of Midyan); those were the opponents.
Each of them disbelieved the messengers and thus, My retribution was inevitable.
These people can expect a single blow, from which they never recover.
They challenged: "Our Lord, why do you not rush the retribution for us, before the Day of Reckoning."
Be patient in the face of their utterances, and remember our servant David, the resourceful; he was obedient.
We committed the mountains in his service, glorifying with him night and day.
Also the birds were committed to serve him; all were obedient to him.
We strengthened his kingship, and endowed him with wisdom and good logic.
Have you received news of the feuding men who sneaked into his sanctuary?
When they entered his room, he was startled. They said, "Have no fear. We are feuding with one another, and we are seeking your fair judgment. Do not wrong us, and guide us in the right path.
"This brother of mine owns ninety nine sheep, while I own one sheep. He wants to mix my sheep with his, and continues to pressure me."
He said, "He is being unfair to you by asking to combine your sheep with his. Most people who combine their properties treat each other unfairly, except those who believe and work righteousness, and these are so few." Afterwards, David wondered if he made the right judgment. He thought that we were testing him. He then implored his Lord for forgiveness, bowed down, and repented.
We forgave him in this matter. We have granted him a position of honor with us, and a beautiful abode.
O David, we have made you a ruler on earth. Therefore, you shall judge among the people equitably, and do not follow your personal opinion, lest it diverts you from the way of GOD. Surely, those who stray off the way of GOD incur severe retribution for forgetting the Day of Reckoning.
We did not create the heaven and the earth, and everything between them, in vain. Such is the thinking of those who disbelieve. Therefore, woe to those who disbelieve; they will suffer in Hell.
Shall we treat those who believe and lead a righteous life as we treat those who commit evil on earth? Shall we treat the righteous as we treat the wicked?
This is a scripture that we sent down to you, that is sacred-perhaps they reflect on its verses. Those who possess intelligence will take heed.
To David we granted Solomon; a good and obedient servant.
One day he became preoccupied with beautiful horses, until the night fell.
He then said, "I enjoyed the material things more than I enjoyed worshiping my Lord, until the sun was gone.
"Bring them back." (To bid farewell,) he rubbed their legs and necks.
We thus put Solomon to the test; we blessed him with vast material wealth, but he steadfastly submitted.
He said, "My Lord, forgive me, and grant me a kingship never attained by anyone else. You are the Grantor."
We (answered his prayer and) committed the wind at his disposal, pouring rain wherever he wanted.
And the devils, building and diving.
Others were placed at his disposal.
"This is our provision to you; you may give generously, or withhold, without limits."
He has deserved an honorable position with us, and a wonderful abode.
Remember our servant Job: he called upon his Lord, "The devil has afflicted me with hardship and pain."
"Strike the ground with your foot. A spring will give you healing and a drink."
We restored his family for him; twice as many. Such is our mercy; a reminder for those who possess intelligence.
"Now, you shall travel the land and preach the message, to fulfill your pledge." We found him steadfast. What a good servant! He was a submitter.
Remember also our servants Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob. They were resourceful, and possessed vision.
We bestowed upon them a great blessing: awareness of the Hereafter.
They were chosen, for they were among the most righteous.
Remember Ismail, Elisha, and Zal-Kifl; among the most righteous.
This is a reminder: the righteous have deserved a wonderful destiny.
The gardens of Eden will open up their gates for them.
Relaxing therein, they will be given many kinds of fruits and drinks.
They will have wonderful spouses.
This is what you have deserved on the Day of Reckoning.
Our provisions are inexhaustible.
As for the transgressors, they have incurred a miserable destiny.
Hell is where they burn; what a miserable abode!
What they taste therein will be hellish drinks and bitter food.
And much more of the same kind.
"This is a group to be thrown into Hell with you." They will not be welcomed (by the residents of Hell). They have deserved to burn in the hellfire.
The newcomers will respond, "Nor are you welcomed. You are the ones who preceded us and misled us. Therefore, suffer this miserable end."
They will also say, "Our Lord, these are the ones who led us into this; double the retribution of hellfire for them."
They will say, "How come we do not see (in Hell) people we used to count among the wicked?
"We used to ridicule them; we used to turn our eyes away from them."
This is a predetermined fact: the people of Hell will feud with one another.
Say, "I warn you; there is no other god beside GOD, the One, the Supreme.
"The Lord of the heavens and the earth, and everything between them; the Almighty, the Forgiving."
Say, "Here is awesome news.
"That you are totally oblivious to.
"I had no knowledge previously, about the feud in the High Society.
"I am inspired that my sole mission is to deliver the warnings to you."
Your Lord said to the angels, "I am creating a human being from clay.
"Once I design him, and blow into him from My spirit, you shall fall prostrate before him."
The angels fell prostrate, all of them,
except Satan; he refused, and was too arrogant, unappreciative.
He said, "O Satan, what prevented you from prostrating before what I created with My hands? Are you too arrogant? Have you rebelled?"
He said, "I am better than he; You created me from fire, and created him from clay."
He said, "Therefore, you must be exiled, you will be banished.
"You have incurred My condemnation until the Day of Judgment."
He said, "My Lord, respite me till the Day of Resurrection."
He said, "You are respited.
"Until the appointed day."
He said, "I swear by Your majesty, that I will send them all astray.
"Except Your worshipers who are devoted absolutely to You alone."
He said, "This is the truth, and the truth is all that I utter.
"I will fill Hell with you and all those who follow you."
Say, "I do not ask you for any wage, and I am not an imposter.
"This is a reminder for the world.
"And you will certainly find out in awhile."
This is a revelation of the scripture, from GOD, the Almighty, the Wise.
We sent down to you this scripture, truthfully; you shall worship GOD, devoting your religion to Him alone.
Absolutely, the religion shall be devoted to GOD alone. Those who set up idols beside Him say, "We idolize them only to bring us closer to GOD; for they are in a better position!" GOD will judge them regarding their disputes. GOD does not guide such liars, disbelievers.
If GOD wanted to have a son, He could have chosen whomever He willed from among His creations. Be He glorified; He is GOD, the One, the Supreme.
He created the heavens and the earth truthfully. He rolls the night over the day, and rolls the day over the night. He committed the sun and the moon, each running for a finite period. Absolutely, He is the Almighty, the Forgiving.
He created you from one person, then created from him his mate. He sent down to you eight kinds of livestock. He creates you in your mothers' bellies, creation after creation, in trimesters of darkness. Such is GOD your Lord. To Him belongs all sovereignty. There is no other god beside Him. How could you deviate?
If you disbelieve, GOD does not need anyone. But He dislikes to see His servants make the wrong decision. If you decide to be appreciative, He is pleased for you. No soul bears the sins of any other soul. Ultimately, to your Lord is your return, then He will inform you of everything you had done. He is fully aware of the innermost thoughts.
When the human being is afflicted, he implores his Lord, sincerely devoted to Him. But as soon as He blesses him, he forgets his previous imploring, sets up idols to rank with GOD and to divert others from His path. Say, "Enjoy your disbelief temporarily; you have incurred the hellfire."
Is it not better to be one of those who meditate in the night, prostrating and staying up, being aware of the Hereafter, and seeking the mercy of their Lord? Say, "Are those who know equal to those who do not know?" Only those who possess intelligence will take heed.
Say, "O My servants who believed, you shall reverence your Lord." For those who worked righteousness in this world, a good reward. GOD's earth is spacious, and those who steadfastly persevere will receive their recompense generously, without limits.
Say, "I have been commanded to worship GOD, devoting the religion absolutely to Him alone.
"And I was commanded to be the utmost submitter."
Say, "I fear, if I disobeyed my Lord, the retribution of a great day."
Say, "GOD is the only One I worship, devoting my religion absolutely to Him alone.
"Therefore, worship whatever you wish beside Him." Say, "The real losers are those who lose their souls, and their families, on the Day of Resurrection." Most certainly, this is the real loss.
They will have masses of fire on top of them, and under them. GOD thus alerts His servants: O My servants, you shall reverence Me.
As for those who discard the worship of all idols, and devote themselves totally to GOD alone, they have deserved happiness. Give good news to My servants.
They are the ones who examine all words, then follow the best. These are the ones whom GOD has guided; these are the ones who possess intelligence.
With regard to those who have deserved the retribution, can you save those who are already in Hell?
As for those who reverence their Lord, they will have mansions upon mansions constructed for them, with flowing streams. This is GOD's promise, and GOD never breaks His promise.
Do you not see that GOD sends down from the sky water, then places it into underground wells, then produces with it plants of various colors, then they grow until they turn yellow, then He turns them into hay? This should be a reminder for those who possess intelligence.
If GOD renders one's heart content with Submission, he will be following a light from his Lord. Therefore, woe to those whose hearts are hardened against GOD's message; they have gone far astray.
GOD has revealed herein the best Hadith; a book that is consistent, and points out both ways (to Heaven and Hell). The skins of those who reverence their Lord cringe therefrom, then their skins and their hearts soften up for GOD's message. Such is GOD's guidance; He bestows it upon whoever wills (to be guided). As for those sent astray by GOD, nothing can guide them.
What is better than saving one's face from the terrible retribution on the Day of Resurrection? The transgressors will be told, "Taste the consequences of what you earned."
Others before them have disbelieved and, consequently, the retribution afflicted them whence they never expected.
GOD has condemned them to humiliation in this life, and the retribution in the Hereafter will be far worse, if they only knew.
We have cited for the people every kind of example in this Quran, that they may take heed.
An Arabic Quran, without any ambiguity, that they may be righteous.
GOD cites the example of a man who deals with disputing partners (Hadith), compared to a man who deals with only one consistent source (Quran). Are they the same? Praise be to GOD; most of them do not know.
You (Muhammad) will surely die, just like they will die.
On the Day of Resurrection, before your Lord, you people will feud with one another.
Who is more evil than one who attributes lies to GOD, while disbelieving in the truth that has come to him? Is Hell not a just requital for the disbelievers?
As for those who promote the truth, and believe therein, they are the righteous.
They will get everything they wish, at their Lord. Such is the reward for the righteous.
GOD remits their sinful works, and rewards them generously for their good works.
Is GOD not sufficient for His servant? They frighten you with the idols they set up beside Him. Whomever GOD sends astray, nothing can guide him.
And whomever GOD guides, nothing can send him astray. Is GOD not Almighty, Avenger?
If you ask them, "Who created the heavens and the earth?" they will say, "GOD." Say, "Why then do you set up idols beside GOD? If GOD willed any adversity for me, can they relieve such an adversity? And if He willed a blessing for me, can they prevent such a blessing?" Say, "GOD is sufficient for me." In Him the trusters shall trust.
Say, "O my people, do your best and I will do my best; you will surely find out.
"(You will find out) who has incurred shameful punishment, and has deserved an eternal retribution."
We have revealed the scripture through you for the people, truthfully. Then, whoever is guided is guided for his own good, and whoever goes astray goes astray to his own detriment. You are not their advocate.
GOD puts the souls to death when the end of their life comes, and also at the time of sleep. Thus, He takes some back during their sleep, while others are allowed to continue living until the end of their predetermined interim. This should provide lessons for people who reflect.
Have they invented intercessors to mediate between them and GOD? Say, "What if they do not possess any power, nor understanding?"
Say, "All intercession belongs to GOD." To Him belongs all sovereignty of the heavens and the earth, then to Him you will be returned.
When GOD ALONE is mentioned, the hearts of those who do not believe in the Hereafter shrink with aversion. But when others are mentioned beside Him, they become satisfied.
Proclaim: "Our god, Initiator of the heavens and the earth, Knower of all secrets and declarations, You are the only One who judges among Your servants regarding their disputes."
If those who transgressed owned everything on earth, even twice as much, they would readily give it up to avoid the terrible retribution on the Day of Resurrection. They will be shown by GOD what they never expected.
The sinful works they had earned will be shown to them, and the very things they used to mock will come back to haunt them.
If the human is touched by adversity, he implores us, but as soon as we bestow a blessing upon him, he says, "I attained this because of my cleverness!" Indeed, this is only a test, but most of them do not know.
Those before them have uttered the same thing, and their earnings did not help them in the least.
They suffered the consequences of their evil works. Similarly, the transgressors among the present generation will suffer the consequences of their evil works; they cannot escape.
Do they not realize that GOD is the One who increases the provision for whomever He chooses, and withholds? These are lessons for people who believe.
Proclaim: "O My servants who exceeded the limits, never despair of GOD's mercy. For GOD forgives all sins. He is the Forgiver, Most Merciful."
You shall obey your Lord, and submit to Him totally, before the retribution overtakes you; then you cannot be helped.
And follow the best path that is pointed out for you by your Lord, before the retribution overtakes you suddenly when you least expect it.
Lest a soul may say, "How sorry I am for disregarding GOD's commandments; I was certainly one of the mockers."
Or say, "Had GOD guided me, I would have been with the righteous."
Or say, when it sees the retribution, "If I get another chance, I will work righteousness."
Yes indeed (you did get enough chances). My proofs came to you, but you rejected them, turned arrogant, and became a disbeliever.
On the Day of Resurrection you will see the faces of those who lied about GOD covered with misery. Is Hell not the right retribution for the arrogant ones?
And GOD will save those who have maintained righteousness; He will reward them. No harm will touch them, nor will they have any grief.
GOD is the Creator of all things, and He is in full control of all things.
To Him belongs all decisions in the heavens and the earth, and those who disbelieve in GOD's revelations are the real losers.
Say, "Is it other than GOD you exhort me to worship, O you ignorant ones?"
It has been revealed to you, and to those before you that if you ever commit idol worship, all your works will be nullified, and you will be with the losers.
Therefore, you shall worship GOD alone, and be appreciative.
They can never fathom the greatness of GOD. The whole earth is within His fist on the Day of Resurrection. In fact, the universes are folded within His right hand. Be He glorified; He is much too high above needing any partners.
The horn will be blown, whereupon everyone in the heavens and the earth will be struck unconscious, except those who will be spared by GOD. Then it will be blown another time, whereupon they will all rise up, looking.
Then the earth will shine with the light of its Lord. The record will be proclaimed, and the prophets and the witnesses will be brought forth. Everyone will then be judged equitably, without the least injustice.
Every soul will be paid for whatever it did, for He is fully aware of everything they have done.
Those who disbelieved will be led to Hell in throngs. When they get to it, and its gates are opened, its guards will say, "Did you not receive messengers from among you, who recited to you the revelations of your Lord, and warned you about meeting this day?" They will answer, "Yes indeed. But the word 'retribution' was already stamped upon the disbelievers."
It will be said, "Enter the gates of Hell, wherein you abide forever." What a miserable destiny for the arrogant.
Those who reverenced their Lord will be led to Paradise in throngs. When they get to it, and its gates are opened, its guards will say, "Peace be upon you; you have won. Therefore, you abide herein forever."
They will say, "Praise be to GOD, who fulfilled His promise to us, and made us inherit the earth, enjoying Paradise as we please." What a beautiful recompense for the workers!
You will see the angels floating around the throne, glorifying and praising their Lord. After the equitable judgment is issued to all, it will be proclaimed: "Praise be to GOD, Lord of the universe."
H. M.
This revelation of the scripture is from GOD, the Almighty, the Omniscient.
Forgiver of sins, acceptor of repentance, strict in enforcing retribution, and possessor of all power. There is no other god beside Him. To Him is the ultimate destiny.
None argues against GOD's revelations except those who disbelieve. Do not be impressed by their apparent success.
Disbelieving before them were the people of Noah, and many other opponents after them. Every community persecuted their messenger to neutralize him. And they argued with falsehood, to defeat the truth. Consequently, I punished them; how terrible was My retribution!
Thus, the judgment of your Lord is already stamped upon those who disbelieve, that they are the dwellers of Hell.
Those who serve the throne and all those around it glorify and praise their Lord, and believe in Him. And they ask forgiveness for those who believe: "Our Lord, Your mercy and Your knowledge encompass all things. Forgive those who repent and follow Your path, and spare them the retribution of Hell.
"Our Lord, and admit them into the gardens of Eden that You promised for them and for the righteous among their parents, spouses, and children. You are the Almighty, Most Wise.
"And protect them from falling in sin. Whomever You protect from falling in sin, on that day, has attained mercy from You. This is the greatest triumph."
Those who disbelieve will be told, "GOD's abhorrence towards you is even worse than your own abhorrence towards yourselves. For you were invited to believe, but you chose to disbelieve."
They will say, "Our Lord, you have put us to death twice, and You gave us two lives; now we have confessed our sins. Is there any way out?"
This is because when GOD ALONE was advocated, you disbelieved, but when others were mentioned beside Him, you believed. Therefore, GOD's judgment has been issued; He is the Most High, the Great.
He is the One who continuously shows you His proofs, and sends down to you from the sky provisions. Only those who totally submit will be able to take heed.
Therefore, you shall devote your worship absolutely to GOD ALONE, even if the disbelievers dislike it.
Possessor of the highest ranks, and Ruler of the whole dominion. He sends inspiration, bearing His commands, to whomever He chooses from among His servants, to warn about the Day of Summoning.
That is the day when everyone will be completely exposed; none of them will hide anything from GOD. To whom belongs all sovereignty on that day? To GOD, the One, the Supreme.
On that day, every soul will be requited for whatever it had earned. There will be no injustice on that day. GOD is most efficient in reckoning.
Warn them about the imminent day, when the hearts will be terrified, and many will be remorseful. The transgressors will have no friend nor an intercessor to be obeyed.
He is fully aware of what the eyes cannot see, and everything that the minds conceal.
GOD judges equitably, while the idols they implore beside Him cannot judge anything. GOD is the One who is the Hearer, the Seer.
Did they not roam the earth and note the consequences for those before them? They used to be stronger than they, and more productive on earth. But GOD punished them for their sins, and nothing could protect them from GOD.
That is because their messengers went to them with clear proofs, but they disbelieved. Consequently, GOD punished them. He is Mighty, strict in enforcing retribution.
We sent Moses with our signs and a profound authority.
To Pharaoh, Haman, and Qaroon. But they said, "A magician; a liar."
And when he showed them the truth from us, they said, "Kill the sons of those who believed with him, and spare their daughters." Thus, the scheming of the disbelievers is always wicked.
Pharaoh said, "Let me kill Moses, and let him implore his Lord. I worry lest he corrupts your religion, or spreads evil throughout the land."
Moses said, "I seek refuge in my Lord and your Lord, from every arrogant one who does not believe in the Day of Reckoning."
A believing man among Pharaoh's people, who was concealing his belief, said, "How can you kill a man just for saying, 'My Lord is GOD,' and he has shown you clear proofs from your Lord? If he is a liar, that is his problem, and if he is truthful, you benefit from his promises. Surely, GOD does not guide any transgressor, liar.
"O my people, today you have kingship and the upperhand. But who will help us against GOD's judgment, should it come to us?" Pharaoh said, "You are to follow only what I see fit; I will guide you only in the right path."
The one who believed said, "O my people, I fear for you the same fate as the previous opponents.
"The opponents of Noah, and 'Ad, Thamud, and others who came after them. GOD does not wish any injustice for the people.
"O my people, I fear for you the Day of Summoning.
"That is the day when you may wish to turn around and flee. But nothing will protect you then from GOD. Whomever GOD sends astray, nothing can guide him."
Joseph had come to you before that with clear revelations, but you continued to doubt his message. Then, when he died you said, "GOD will not send any other messenger after him. (He was the last messenger)!" GOD thus sends astray those who are transgressors, doubtful.
They argue against GOD's revelations, without any basis. This is a trait that is most abhorred by GOD and by those who believe. GOD thus seals the hearts of every arrogant tyrant.
Pharaoh said, "O Haman, build for me a high tower, that I may reach out and discover.
"I want to reach the heaven, and take a look at the god of Moses. I believe he is a liar." Thus were the evil works of Pharaoh adorned in his eyes, and thus was he kept from following (the right) path. Pharaoh's scheming was truly evil.
The one who believed said, "O my people, follow me, and I will guide you in the right way.
"O my people, this first life is a temporary illusion, while the Hereafter is the eternal abode."
Whoever commits a sin is requited for just that, and whoever works righteousness-male or female-while believing, these will enter Paradise wherein they receive provisions without any limits.
"O my people, while I invite you to be saved, you invite me to the hellfire.
"You invite me to be unappreciative of GOD, and to set up beside Him idols that I do not recognize. I am inviting you to the Almighty, the Forgiver.
"There is no doubt that what you invite me to do has no basis in this world, nor in the Hereafter, that our ultimate return is to GOD, and that the transgressors have incurred the hellfire.
"Some day you will remember what I am telling you now. I leave the judgment of this matter to GOD; GOD is the Seer of all the people."
GOD then protected him from their evil schemes, while the people of Pharaoh have incurred the worst retribution.
The Hell will be shown to them day and night, and on the Day of Resurrection: "Admit Pharaoh's people into the worst retribution."
As they argue in Hell, the followers will say to their leaders, "We used to be your followers, can you spare us any part of this Hell?"
The leaders will say, "We are all in this together. GOD has judged among the people."
Those in the hellfire will say to the guardians of Hell, "Call upon your Lord to reduce the retribution for us, for even one day."
They will say, "Did you not receive your messengers who delivered to you clear messages?" They will reply, "Yes we did." They will say, "Then implore (as much as you wish); the imploring of the disbelievers is always in vain."
Most assuredly, we will give victory to our messengers and to those who believe, both in this world and on the day the witnesses are summoned.
On that day, the apologies of the disbelievers will not benefit them. They have incurred condemnation; they have incurred the worst destiny.
We have given Moses the guidance, and made the Children of Israel inherit the scripture.
(Their history) is a lesson and a reminder for those who possess intelligence.
Therefore, be patient, for GOD's promise is true, and ask forgiveness for your sin, and glorify and praise your Lord night and day.
Surely, those who argue against GOD's revelations without proof are exposing the arrogance that is hidden inside their chests, and they are not even aware of it. Therefore, seek refuge in GOD; He is the Hearer, the Seer.
The creation of the heavens and the earth is even more awesome than the creation of the human being, but most people do not know.
Not equal are the blind and the seer. Nor are those who believe and work righteousness equal to the sinners. Rarely do you take heed.
Most certainly, the Hour (Day of Judgment) is coming, no doubt about it, but most people do not believe.
Your Lord says, "Implore Me, and I will respond to you. Surely, those who are too arrogant to worship Me will enter Gehenna, forcibly."
GOD is the One who designed the night so you can rest in it, and the day lighted. GOD bestows many blessings upon the people, but most people are not thankful.
Such is GOD your Lord, the Creator of all things. There is no god except He. How could you deviate?
Deviating are those who disregard GOD's revelations.
GOD is the One who rendered the earth habitable for you, and the sky a formidable structure, and He designed you, and designed you well. He is the One who provides you with good provisions. Such is GOD your Lord; Most Exalted is GOD, Lord of the universe.
He is the Living; there is no god except He. You shall worship Him alone, devoting your religion absolutely to Him alone. Praise be to GOD, Lord of the universe.
Say, "I have been enjoined from worshiping the idols you worship beside GOD, when the clear revelations came to me from my Lord. I was commanded to submit to the Lord of the universe."
He is the One who created you from dust, and subsequently from a tiny drop, then from a hanging embryo, then He brings you out as a child, then He lets you reach maturity, then you become old-some of you die earlier. You attain a predetermined age, that you may understand.
He is the only One who controls life and death. To have anything done, He simply says to it, "Be," and it is.
Have you noted those who argue against GOD's proofs, and how they have deviated?
They are the ones who have disbelieved in the scripture, and in the messages we have sent with our messengers. Therefore, they will surely find out.
The shackles will be around their necks, and the chains will be used to drag them.
In the Inferno, then in the Fire, they will burn.
They will be asked, "Where are the idols you used to worship,
"beside GOD?" They will say, "They have abandoned us. In fact, when we worshiped them, we were worshiping nothing." Thus does GOD send the disbelievers astray.
This is because you used to rejoice in false doctrines on earth, and you used to promote them.
Enter the gates of Gehenna, wherein you abide forever. What a miserable destiny for the arrogant ones.
You shall be patient, for GOD's promise is truth. Whether we show you some of (the retribution) we have promised for them, or terminate your life before that, they will be returned to us.
We have sent messengers before you- some of them we mentioned to you, and some we did not mention to you. No messenger can produce any miracle without GOD's authorization. Once GOD's judgment is issued, the truth dominates, and the falsifiers are exposed and humiliated.
GOD is the One who created the livestock for you; some you ride, and some you eat.
They also provide you with additional benefits that satisfy many of your needs. On them, as well as on the ships, you are carried.
He thus shows you His proofs. Which of GOD's proofs can you deny?
Have they not roamed the earth and noted the consequences for those who preceded them? They used to be greater in number, greater in power, and possessed a greater legacy on earth. Yet, all their achievements did not help them in the least.
When their messengers went to them with clear proofs, they rejoiced in the knowledge they had inherited, and the very things they ridiculed were the cause of their fall.
Subsequently, when they saw our retribution they said, "Now we believe in GOD ALONE, and we now disbelieve in the idol worship that we used to practice."
Their belief then could not help them in the least, once they saw our retribution. Such is GOD's system that has been established to deal with His creatures; the disbelievers are always doomed.
H. M.
A revelation from the Most Gracious, Most Merciful.
A scripture whose verses provide the complete details, in an Arabic Quran, for people who know.
A bearer of good news, as well as a warner. However, most of them turn away; they do not hear.
They said, "Our minds are made up, our ears are deaf to your message, and a barrier separates us from you. Do what you want, and so will we."
Say, "I am no more than a human being like you, who has been inspired that your god is one god. You shall be devoted to Him, and ask His forgiveness. Woe to the idol worshipers.
"Who do not give the obligatory charity (Zakat), and with regard to the Hereafter, they are disbelievers."
As for those who believe and lead a righteous life, they receive a well deserved recompense.
Say, "You disbelieve in the One who created the earth in two days, and you set up idols to rank with Him, though He is Lord of the universe."
He placed on it stabilizers (mountains), made it productive, and He calculated its provisions in four days, to satisfy the needs of all its inhabitants.
Then He turned to the sky, when it was still gas, and said to it, and to the earth, "Come into existence, willingly or unwillingly." They said, "We come willingly."
Thus, He completed the seven universes in two days, and set up the laws for every universe. And we adorned the lowest universe with lamps, and placed guards around it. Such is the design of the Almighty, the Omniscient.
If they turn away, then say, "I am warning you of a disaster like the disaster that annihilated 'Ad and Thamud."
Their messengers went to them, as well as before them and after them, saying, "You shall not worship except GOD." They said, "Had our Lord willed, He could have sent angels. We are disbelievers in what you say."
As for 'Ad, they turned arrogant on earth, opposed the truth, and said, "Who is more powerful than we?" Did they not realize that GOD, who created them, is more powerful than they? They were unappreciative of our revelations.
Consequently, we sent upon them violent wind, for a few miserable days. We thus afflicted them with humiliating retribution in this life, and the retribution of the Hereafter is more humiliating; they can never win.
As for Thamud, we provided them with guidance, but they preferred blindness over guidance. Consequently, the disastrous and shameful retribution annihilated them, because of what they earned.
We always save those who believe and lead a righteous life.
The day will come when the enemies of GOD will be summoned to the hellfire, forcibly.
Once they get there, their own hearing, eyes, and skins will bear witness to everything they had done.
They will say to their skins, "Why did you bear witness against us?" They will reply, "GOD made us speak up; He is the One who causes everything to speak. He is the One who created you the first time, and now you have been returned to Him."
There is no way you can hide from your own hearing, your eyes, or your skins. In fact, you thought that GOD was unaware of much of what you do.
This kind of thinking about your Lord will cause you to fall, and then you become losers.
If they continue the way they are, Hell will be their destiny, and if they make up excuses, they will not be excused.
We assign to them companions who adorn everything they do in their eyes. Thus, they end up incurring the same fate as the previous communities of jinns and humans, who were also losers.
Those who disbelieved said, "Do not listen to this Quran and distort it, that you may win."
We will certainly afflict these disbelievers with a severe retribution. We will certainly requite them for their evil works.
Such is the requital that awaits GOD's enemies. Hell will be their eternal abode; a just requital for discarding our revelations.
Those who disbelieved will say, "Our Lord, show us those among the two kinds-jinns and humans-who misled us, so we can trample them under our feet, and render them the lowliest."
Those who proclaim: "Our Lord is GOD," then lead a righteous life, the angels descend upon them: "You shall have no fear, nor shall you grieve. Rejoice in the good news that Paradise has been reserved for you.
"We are your allies in this life, and in the Hereafter. You will have in it anything you wish for; you will have anything you want.
"(Such is your) ultimate abode, from a Forgiver, Most Merciful."
Who can utter better words than one who invites to GOD, works righteousness, and says, "I am one of the submitters"?
Not equal is the good response and the bad response. You shall resort to the nicest possible response. Thus, the one who used to be your enemy, may become your best friend.
None can attain this except those who steadfastly persevere. None can attain this except those who are extremely fortunate.
When the devil whispers an idea to you, you shall seek refuge in GOD. He is the Hearer, the Omniscient.
Among His proofs are the night and the day, and the sun and the moon. Do not prostrate before the sun, nor the moon; you shall fall prostrate before the GOD who created them, if you truly worship Him alone.
If they are too arrogant to do this, then those at your Lord glorify Him night and day, without ever tiring.
Among His proofs is that you see the land still, then, as soon as we shower it with water, it vibrates with life. Surely, the One who revived it can revive the dead. He is Omnipotent.
Surely, those who distort our revelations are not hidden from us. Is one who gets thrown into Hell better, or one who comes secure on the Day of Resurrection? Do whatever you wish; He is Seer of everything you do.
Those who have rejected the Quran's proof when it came to them, have also rejected an Honorable book.
No falsehood could enter it, in the past or in the future; a revelation from a Most Wise, Praiseworthy.
What is said to you is precisely what was said to the previous messengers. Your Lord possesses forgiveness, and He also possesses painful retribution.
If we made it a non-Arabic Quran they would have said, "Why did it come down in that language?" Whether it is Arabic or non-Arabic, say, "For those who believe, it is a guide and healing. As for those who disbelieve, they will be deaf and blind to it, as if they are being addressed from faraway."
We have given Moses the scripture and it was also disputed. If it were not for your Lord's predetermined decision, they would have been judged immediately. Indeed, they harbor too many doubts.
Whoever works righteousness does so for his own good, and whoever works evil does so to his own detriment. Your Lord is never unjust towards the people.
With Him is the knowledge about the Hour (end of the world). No fruits emerge from their sheaths, nor does any female conceive or give birth, without His knowledge. The day will come when He asks them: "Where are those idols that you set up beside Me?" They will say, "We proclaim to You that none of us bears witness to that."
The idols they had idolized will disown them, and they will realize that there will be no escape.
The human being never tires of imploring for good things. And when adversity befalls him, he turns despondent, desperate.
And when we bless him after suffering some adversity, he says, "This belongs to me. I do not believe that the Hour will ever come to pass. Even if I am returned to my Lord, I will find at Him better things." Most certainly, we will inform the disbelievers of all their works, and will commit them to severe retribution.
When we bless the human being, he turns away, and drifts farther and farther away, and when he suffers any affliction, he implores loudly.
Proclaim: "What if this is truly from GOD, then you decide to reject it? Who are farther astray than those who decide to oppose this?"
We will show them our proofs in the horizons, and within themselves, until they realize that this is the truth. Is your Lord not sufficient as a witness of all things?
Indeed, they are doubtful about meeting their Lord. He is fully aware of all things.
H. M.
'A. S. Q.
Inspiring you, and those before you, is GOD, the Almighty, Most Wise.
To Him belongs everything in the heavens and everything on earth, and He is the Most High, the Great.
The heavens above them almost shatter, out of reverence for Him, and the angels praise and glorify their Lord, and they ask forgiveness for those on earth. Absolutely, GOD is the Forgiver, Most Merciful.
Those who set up other lords beside Him, GOD is the One in charge of them; you are not their advocate.
We thus reveal to you an Arabic Quran to warn the central community and all around it, and to warn about the Day of Summoning that is inevitable. Some will end up in Heaven, and some in Hell.
Had GOD willed, He could have made them one community. But He redeems into His mercy whomever He wills. As for the transgressors, they have no master, nor a helper.
Did they find other lords beside Him? GOD is the only Lord and Master. He is the One who resurrects the dead, and He is the Omnipotent One.
If you dispute any part of this message, the judgment for doing this rests with GOD. Such is GOD my Lord. In Him I trust, and to Him I submit.
Initiator of the heavens and the earth. He created for you from among yourselves spouses-and also for the animals. He thus provides you with the means to multiply. There is nothing that equals Him. He is the Hearer, the Seer.
To Him belongs absolute control of the heavens and the earth. He is the One who increases the provision for whomever He wills, or reduces it. He is fully aware of all things.
He decreed for you the same religion decreed for Noah, and what we inspired to you, and what we decreed for Abraham, Moses, and Jesus: "You shall uphold this one religion, and do not divide it." The idol worshipers will greatly resent what you invite them to do. GOD redeems to Himself whomever He wills; He guides to Himself only those who totally submit.
Ironically, they broke up into sects only after the knowledge had come to them, due to jealousy and resentment among themselves. If it were not for a predetermined decision from your Lord to respite them for a definite interim, they would have been judged immediately. Indeed, the later generations who inherited the scripture are full of doubts.
This is what you shall preach, and steadfastly maintain what you are commanded to do, and do not follow their wishes. And proclaim: "I believe in all the scriptures sent down by GOD. I was commanded to judge among you equitably. GOD is our Lord and your Lord. We have our deeds and you have your deeds. There is no argument between us and you. GOD will gather us all together; to Him is the ultimate destiny."
Those who argue about GOD, after receiving His message, their argument is nullified at their Lord. They have incurred condemnation, and have deserved a severe retribution.
GOD is the One who sent down the scripture, to deliver the truth and the law. For all that you know, the Hour (Day of Judgment) may be very close.
Challenging it are those who do not believe in it. As for those who believe, they are concerned about it, and they know that it is the truth. Absolutely, those who deny the Hour have gone far astray.
GOD is fully aware of all His creatures; He provides for whomever He wills. He is the Powerful, the Almighty.
Whoever seeks the rewards of the Hereafter, we multiply the rewards for him. And whoever seeks the materials of this world, we give him therefrom, then he receives no share in the Hereafter.
They follow idols who decree for them religious laws never authorized by GOD. If it were not for the predetermined decision, they would have been judged immediately. Indeed, the transgressors have incurred a painful retribution.
You will see the transgressors worried about everything they had committed; everything will come back and haunt them. As for those who believed and led a righteous life, they will be in the gardens of Paradise. They will receive whatever they wish from their Lord. This is the great blessing.
This is the good news from GOD to His servants who believe and lead a righteous life. Say, "I do not ask you for any wage. I do ask each of you to take care of your own relatives." Anyone who does a righteous work, we multiply his reward for it. GOD is Forgiver, Appreciative.
Are they saying, "He (Rashad) has fabricated lies about GOD!"? If GOD willed, He could have sealed your mind, but GOD erases the falsehood and affirms the truth with His words. He is fully aware of the innermost thoughts.
He is the One who accepts the repentance from His servants, and remits the sins. He is fully aware of everything you do.
Responding to Him are those who believe and lead a righteous life. He will shower them with His blessings. As for the disbelievers, they have incurred a severe retribution.
If GOD increased the provision for His servants, they would transgress on earth. This is why He sends it precisely measured to whomever He wills. He is fully Cognizant and Seer of His servants.
He is the One who sends down the rain after they had despaired, and spreads His mercy. He is the only Master, Most Praiseworthy.
Among His proofs is the creation of the heavens and the earth, and the creatures He spreads in them. He is able to summon them, when He wills.
Anything bad that happens to you is a consequence of your own deeds, and He overlooks many (of your sins).
You can never escape, and you have none beside GOD as a Lord and Master.
Among His proofs are the ships that sail the sea with sails like flags.
If He willed, He could have stilled the winds, leaving them motionless on top of the water. These are proofs for those who are steadfast, appreciative.
He can annihilate them, as a consequence of their own works. Instead, He overlooks many (of their sins).
Those who argue against our proofs will find out that they have no basis.
Whatever you are given is no more than temporary material of this life. What GOD possesses is far better and everlasting, for those who believe and trust in their Lord.
They avoid gross sins and vice, and when angered they forgive.
They respond to their Lord by observing the Contact Prayers (Salat). Their affairs are decided after due consultation among themselves, and from our provisions to them they give (to charity).
When gross injustice befalls them, they stand up for their rights.
Although the just requital for an injustice is an equivalent retribution, those who pardon and maintain righteousness are rewarded by GOD. He does not love the unjust.
Certainly, those who stand up for their rights, when injustice befalls them, are not committing any error.
The wrong ones are those who treat the people unjustly, and resort to aggression without provocation. These have incurred a painful retribution.
Resorting to patience and forgiveness reflects a true strength of character.
Whomever GOD sends astray will never find any other lord, and you will see such transgressors, when they see the retribution, saying, "Can we get another chance?"
You will see them facing it, humiliated and debased, and looking, yet trying to avoid looking. Those who believed will proclaim: "The real losers are those who lost their souls and their families on the Day of Resurrection. The transgressors have deserved an everlasting retribution."
There will be no allies to help them against GOD. Whomever GOD sends astray can never be guided.
You shall respond to your Lord before a day comes which is decreed inevitable by GOD. There will be no refuge for you on that day, nor an advocate.
If they turn away, we did not send you as their guardian. Your sole mission is delivering the message. When we shower the human beings with mercy, they become proud, and when adversity afflicts them, as a consequence of their own deeds, the human beings turn into disbelievers.
To GOD belongs the sovereignty of the heavens and the earth. He creates whatever He wills, granting daughters to whomever He wills, and granting sons to whomever He wills.
Or, He may have the males and the females marry each other, then render whomever He wills sterile. He is Omniscient, Omnipotent.
No human being can communicate with GOD except through inspiration, or from behind a barrier, or by sending a messenger through whom He reveals what He wills. He is the Most High, Most Wise.
Thus, we inspired to you a revelation proclaiming our commandments. You had no idea about the scripture, or faith. Yet, we made this a beacon to guide whomever we choose from among our servants. Surely, you guide in a straight path.
The path of GOD, to whom belongs everything in the heavens and everything on earth. Absolutely, all matters are controlled by GOD.
H. M.
And the enlightening scripture.
We have rendered it an Arabic Quran, that you may understand.
It is preserved with us in the original master, honorable and full of wisdom.
Should we just ignore the fact that you have transgressed the limits?
We have sent many a prophet to the previous generations.
Every time a prophet went to them, they ridiculed him.
Consequently, we annihilated people who were even more powerful than these. We thus set the examples from the previous communities.
If you asked them, "Who created the heavens and the earth," they would say, "The Almighty, the Omniscient has created them."
He is the One who made the earth habitable for you, and created for you roads therein, that you may follow the right way.
He is the One who sends down from the sky water, in exact measure, to revive dead lands therewith. Similarly, you will be resurrected.
He is the One who created all kinds, in pairs (male and female), and He created for you ships and livestock to ride.
As you rest on top of them, you shall appreciate such a blessing from your Lord, and say, "Glory be to the One who subdued this for us. We could not have controlled them by ourselves.
"We ultimately return to our Lord."
They even assigned for Him a share from His own creation! Surely, the human being is profoundly unappreciative.
Has He chosen from among His creations daughters for Himself, while blessing you with sons?
When one of them is given news (of a daughter) as they claimed for the Most Gracious, his face is darkened with misery and anger!
(They say,) "What is good about an offspring that is brought up to be beautiful, and cannot help in war?"
They claimed that the angels, who are servants of the Most Gracious, are females! Have they witnessed their creation? Their claims are recorded, and they will be asked.
They even said, "If the Most Gracious willed, we would not have worshiped them." They have no basis for such a claim; they only conjecture.
Have we given them a book before this, and they are upholding it?
The fact is that: they said, "We found our parents carrying on certain practices, and we are following in their footsteps."
Invariably, when we sent a warner to any community, the leaders of that community would say, "We found our parents following certain practices, and we will continue in their footsteps."
(The messenger) would say, "What if I brought to you better guidance than what you inherited from your parents?" They would say, "We are disbelievers in the message you brought."
Consequently, we requited them. Note the consequences for the rejectors.
Abraham said to his father and his people, "I disown what you worship.
"Only the One who initiated me can guide me."
This example (of Abraham) was rendered an everlasting lesson for subsequent generations; perhaps they redeem their souls.
Indeed, I have given these people and their ancestors sufficient chances, then the truth came to them, and a clarifying messenger.
When the truth came to them, they said, "This is magic, and we are disbelievers therein."
They said, "If only this Quran was sent down through another man from the two communities (Mecca or Yathrib) who is prominent!"
Are they the ones who assign your Lord's mercy? We have assigned their shares in this life, raising some of them above others in ranks, in order to let them serve one another. The mercy from your Lord is far better than any material they may hoard.
If it were not that all the people might become one (disbelieving) congregation, we would have granted everyone who disbelieves in the Most Gracious mansions with silver roofs, and stairs upon which they could climb.
Their mansions would have impressive gates, and luxurious furnishings.
Also many ornaments. All these are the temporary materials of this lowly life. The Hereafter-at your Lord-is far better for the righteous.
Anyone who disregards the message of the Most Gracious, we appoint a devil to be his constant companion.
Such companions will divert them from the path, yet make them believe that they are guided.
When he comes before us he will say, "Oh I wish you were as far from me as the two easts. What a miserable companion!"
It will not console you on that day, as transgressors, that both of you will share in the retribution.
Can you make the deaf hear; can you make the blind see, or those who are far astray?
Whether we let you die before it or not, we will surely requite them.
Or, we may show you (the retribution) we promised for them. We are in full control over them.
You shall steadfastly preach what is revealed to you; you are in the right path.
This is a message for you and your people; all of you will be questioned.
Check the messengers we sent before you: "Have we ever appointed any other gods- beside the Most Gracious-to be worshiped?"
For example, we sent Moses with our proofs to Pharaoh and his elders, proclaiming: "I am a messenger from the Lord of the universe."
When he showed them our proofs, they laughed at them.
Every sign we showed them was bigger than the one before it. We afflicted them with the plagues, perhaps they repent.
They said, "O you magician, implore your Lord on our behalf (to relieve this plague), since you have an agreement with Him; we will then be guided."
But as soon as we relieved their affliction, they reverted.
Pharaoh announced to his people, "O my people, do I not possess the kingship over Egypt, and these flowing rivers belong to me? Do you not see?
"Which one is better; me or that one who is lowly and can hardly speak?
"How come he does not possess a treasure of gold; how come the angels do not accompany him?"
He thus fooled his people, and they obeyed him; they were wicked people.
When they persisted in opposing us, we punished them and drowned them all.
We rendered them a precedent and an example for the others.
When the son of Mary was cited as an example, your people disregarded it.
They said, "Is it better to worship our gods, or to worship him?" They said this only to argue with you. Indeed, they are people who have joined the opposition.
He was no more than a servant whom we blessed, and we sent him as an example for the Children of Israel.
If we willed, we could have made you angels who colonize and reproduce on earth.
He is to serve as a marker for knowing the end of the world, so you can no longer harbor any doubt about it. You shall follow Me; this is the right path.
Let not the devil repel you; he is your most ardent enemy.
When Jesus went with the proofs, he said, "I bring to you wisdom, and to clarify some of the matters in which you dispute. You shall reverence GOD and obey me.
"GOD is my Lord and your Lord, you shall worship Him alone. This is the right path."
The opponents disputed among themselves. Woe to those who transgress from the retribution of a painful day.
Are they waiting for the Hour (Day of Judgment) to come to them suddenly when they least expect it?
The close friends on that day will become enemies of one another, except for the righteous.
O My servants, you will have no fear on that day, nor will you grieve.
They are the ones who believed in our revelations, and were submitters.
Enter Paradise, together with your spouses, and rejoice.
Offered to them will be golden trays and cups, and they will find everything the hearts desire and the eyes wish for. You live therein forever.
Such is the Paradise that you inherit, in return for your works.
You will have in it all kinds of fruits, from which you eat.
Surely, the guilty will abide in the retribution of Gehenna forever.
Never will the retribution be commuted for them; they will be confined therein.
It is not us who wronged them; it is they who wronged their own souls.
They will implore: "O Malek, let your Lord finish us off." He will say, "You are staying forever.
"We have given you the truth, but most of you hate the truth."
Have they schemed some scheme? We too are scheming.
Do they think that we do not hear their secrets and conspiracies? Yes indeed; our messengers are with them, recording.
Proclaim: "If the Most Gracious did have a son, I would still be the foremost worshiper."
Be He glorified; He is the Lord of the heavens and the earth, the Lord with the great dominion, far above their claims.
Let them blunder and play until they meet their day that is awaiting them.
He is the only One who is a deity in the heaven and a deity on earth. He is the Most Wise, the Omniscient.
Most Exalted is the One who possesses all sovereignty of the heavens and the earth, and everything between them. With Him is the knowledge about the Hour (end of the world), and to Him you will be returned.
None of those whom they idolize beside Him possess any power to intercede, unless their intercession coincides with the truth, and they fully know.
If you asked them who created them, they would say, "GOD." Why then did they deviate?
It will be proclaimed: "O my Lord, these people do not believe."
You shall disregard them and say, "Peace;" they will surely find out.
H. M.
And this enlightening scripture.
We have sent it down in a blessed night, for we are to warn.
In it (the scripture), every matter of wisdom is clarified.
It is a predetermined command from us that we send messengers.
This is a mercy from your Lord. He is the Hearer, the Omniscient.
Lord of the heavens and the earth, and everything between them. If only you could be certain!
There is no other god beside Him. He controls life and death; your Lord and the Lord of your ancestors.
Indeed, they are doubtful, heedless.
Therefore, watch for the day when the sky brings a profound smoke.
It will envelope the people; this is a painful retribution.
"Our Lord, relieve this retribution for us; we are believers."
Now that it is too late, they remem- ber! An enlightening messenger had come to them.
But they turned away from him, saying, "Well educated, but crazy!"
We will relieve the retribution for awhile; you will soon revert.
The day we strike the big stroke, we will avenge.
We have tested before them the people of Pharaoh; an honorable messenger went to them.
Proclaiming: "Listen to me, servants of GOD. I am an honest messenger to you."
And, "Do not transgress against GOD. I bring to you powerful proofs.
"I seek refuge in my Lord and your Lord, if you oppose me.
"If you do not wish to believe, then simply leave me alone."
Subsequently, he implored his Lord: "These are wicked people."
(God said,) "Travel with My servants during the night; you will be pursued.
"Cross the sea quickly; their troops will be drowned."
Thus, they left behind many gardens and springs.
Crops and a luxurious life.
Blessings that they enjoyed.
All these we caused to be inherited by other people.
Neither the heaven, nor the earth wept over them, and they were not respited.
Meanwhile, we saved the Children of Israel from the humiliating persecution.
From Pharaoh; he was a tyrant.
We have chosen them from among all the people, knowingly.
We showed them so many proofs, which constituted a great test.
The present generations say,
"We only die the first death; we will never be resurrected!
"Bring back our forefathers, if you are truthful."
Are they better than the people of Tubba' and others before them? We annihilated them for their crimes.
We did not create the heavens and the earth, and everything between them, just to play.
We created them for a specific purpose, but most of them do not know.
The Day of Decision awaits them all.
That is the day when no friend can help his friend in any way; no one can be helped.
Only those who attain mercy from GOD. He is the Almighty, Most Merciful.
Surely, the tree of bitterness-
will provide the food for the sinful.
Like lye, it will boil in the stomachs.
Like the boiling of hellish drinks.
Take him and throw him into the center of Hell.
Then pour upon his head the retribution of the Inferno.
"Taste this; you were so powerful, so honorable."
This is what you used to doubt.
The righteous will be in a secure position.
Enjoying gardens and springs.
Wearing velvet and satin; close to each other.
We grant them wonderful spouses.
They enjoy in it all kinds of fruits, in perfect peace.
They do not taste death therein-beyond the first death- and He has spared them the retribution of Hell.
Such is the blessing from your Lord. Such is the great triumph.
We have thus clarified it in your language, that they may take heed.
Therefore, wait; they too will have to wait.
H. M.
The revelation of this scripture is from GOD, the Almighty, Most Wise.
The heavens and the earth are full of proofs for the believers.
Also in your creation, and the creation of all the animals, there are proofs for people who are certain.
Also, the alternation of the night and the day, and the provisions that GOD sends down from the sky to revive dead lands, and the manipulation of the winds; all these are proofs for people who understand.
These are GOD's revelations that we recite to you truthfully. In which Hadith other than GOD and His revelations do they believe?
Woe to every fabricator, guilty.
The one who hears GOD's revelations recited to him, then insists arrogantly on his way, as if he never heard them. Promise him a painful retribution.
When he learns anything about our revelations, he mocks them. These have incurred a shameful retribution.
Awaiting them is Gehenna. Their earnings will not help them, nor the idols they had set up beside GOD. They have incurred a terrible retribution.
This is a beacon, and those who disbelieve in these revelations of their Lord have incurred condemnation and a painful retribution.
GOD is the One who committed the sea in your service, so that the ships can roam it in accordance with His laws. You thus seek His provisions, that you may be appreciative.
He committed in your service everything in the heavens and the earth; all from Him. These are proofs for people who reflect.
Tell those who believed to forgive those who do not expect the days of GOD. He will fully pay everyone for whatever they have earned.
Whoever works righteousness does so for his own good, and whoever works evil does so to his own detriment. To your Lord you will be returned.
We have given the Children of Israel the scripture, wisdom, and prophethood, and provided them with good provisions; we bestowed upon them more blessings than any other people.
We have given them herein clear commandments. Ironically, they did not dispute this until the knowledge had come to them. This is due to jealousy on their part. Surely, your Lord will judge them on the Day of Resurrection regarding everything they have disputed.
We then appointed you to establish the correct laws; you shall follow this, and do not follow the wishes of those who do not know.
They cannot help you at all against GOD. It is the transgressors who ally themselves with one another, while GOD is the Lord of the righteous.
This provides enlightenments for the people, and guidance, and mercy for those who are certain.
Do those who work evil expect that we will treat them in the same manner as those who believe and lead a righteous life? Can their life and their death be the same? Wrong indeed is their judgment.
GOD created the heavens and the earth for a specific purpose, in order to pay each soul for whatever it earned, without the least injustice.
Have you noted the one whose god is his ego? Consequently, GOD sends him astray, despite his knowledge, seals his hearing and his mind, and places a veil on his eyes. Who then can guide him, after such a decision by GOD? Would you not take heed?
They said, "We only live this life; we live and die and only time causes our death!" They have no sure knowledge about this; they only conjecture.
When our revelations are recited to them, clearly, their only argument is to say, "Bring back our forefathers, if you are truthful."
Say, "GOD has granted you life, then He puts you to death, then He will summon you to the Day of Resurrection, which is inevitable. But most people do not know."
To GOD belongs all sovereignty of the heavens and the earth. The day the Hour (Judgment) comes to pass, that is when the falsifiers lose.
You will see every community kneeling. Every community will be called to view their record. Today, you get paid for everything you have done.
This is our record; it utters the truth about you. We have been recording everything you did.
As for those who believe and work righteousness, their Lord will admit them into His mercy. This is the great triumph.
As for those who disbelieve: "Were not My revelations recited to you, but you turned arrogant and were wicked people?"
When it is proclaimed that GOD's promise is the truth and that the Hour (of Judgment) is inevitable, you said, "We do not know what the Hour is! We are full of conjecture about it; we are not certain."
The evils of their works will become evident to them, and the very things they mocked will come back and haunt them.
It will be proclaimed: "Today we forget you, just as you forgot the meeting of this day. Your abode is the hellfire, and you will have no helpers.
"This is because you took GOD's revelations in vain, and were preoccupied with the first life." Consequently, they will never exit therefrom, nor will they be excused.
To GOD belongs all praise; Lord of the heavens, Lord of the earth, Lord of the universe.
To Him belongs all supremacy in the heavens and the earth. He is the Almighty, Most Wise.
H. M.
The revelation of this scripture is from GOD, the Almighty, Most Wise.
We did not create the heavens and the earth, and everything between them except for a specific purpose, and for a finite interim. Those who disbelieve are totally oblivious to the warnings given to them.
Say, "Consider the idols you have set up beside GOD. Show me what on earth did they create. Do they own part of the heavens? Show me any other scripture before this one, or any piece of established knowledge that supports your idolatry, if you are truthful."
Who is farther astray than those who idolize beside GOD idols that can never respond to them until the Day of Resurrection, and are totally unaware of their worship?
And when the people are summoned (on the Day of Judgment), their idols will become their enemies, and will denounce their idolatry.
When our revelations were recited to them, perfectly clear, those who disbelieved said of the truth that came to them, "This is obviously magic!"
When they say, "He fabricated this," say, "If I fabricated this, then you cannot protect me from GOD. He is fully aware of everything you scheme. He suffices as a witness between me and you. He is the Forgiver, Most Merciful."
Say, "I am not different from other messengers. I have no idea what will happen to me or to you. I only follow what is revealed to me. I am no more than a profound warner."
Say, "What if it is from GOD and you disbelieved in it? A witness from the Children of Israel has borne witness to a similar phenomenon, and he has believed, while you have turned arrogant. Surely, GOD does not guide the wicked people."
Those who disbelieved said about those who believed, "If it were anything good, they would not have accepted it before us." Because they were not guided to it, they said, "This is an old fabrication!"
Before this, the book of Moses provided guidance and mercy. This too is a scripture that confirms, in Arabic, to warn those who transgressed, and to give good news to the righteous. Good News
Surely, those who say, "Our Lord is GOD," then lead a righteous life, will have no fear, nor will they grieve.
They have deserved Paradise, where they abide forever; a reward for their works.
We enjoined the human being to honor his parents. His mother bore him arduously, gave birth to him arduously, and took intimate care of him for thirty months. When he reaches maturity, and reaches the age of forty, he should say, "My Lord, direct me to appreciate the blessings You have bestowed upon me and upon my parents, and to do the righteous works that please You. Let my children be righteous as well. I have repented to You; I am a submitter."
It is from these that we accept the righteous works, and overlook their sins. They have deserved Paradise. This is the truthful promise that is promised to them.
Then there is the one who says to his parents, "Woe to you; are you telling me that (after death) I will come back to life? How come those who died before us never come back?" The parents would cry for GOD's help and say, "Woe to you; please believe! GOD's promise is the truth." He would say, "Tales from the past!"
Such are the ones stamped as disbelievers among every generation of jinns and humans; they are losers.
They all attain the ranks they have deserved, in accordance with their works. He will pay them for their works, without the least injustice.
The day will come when those who disbelieved will be introduced to the hellfire: "You have wasted the good chances given to you during your worldly life, and you rejoiced in them. Consequently, today you incur a shameful retribution as a requital for the arrogance you committed on earth without any basis, and for your evil works."
Recall that the brother of 'Ad warned his people at the dunes- numerous warnings were also delivered before him and after him: "You shall not worship except GOD. I fear for you the retribution of a great day."
They said, "Did you come to divert us from our gods? We challenge you to bring (the retribution) you threaten, if you are truthful."
He said, "The knowledge about this is with GOD; I only deliver to you what I was sent to deliver. However, I see that you people are ignorant."
When they saw the storm heading their way, they said, "This storm will bring to us much needed rain." Instead, this is what you challenged (Hud) to bring; violent wind wherein there is painful retribution.
It destroyed everything, as commanded by its Lord. By morning, nothing was standing except their homes. We thus requite the guilty people.
We had established them in the same way as we established you, and provided them with hearing, eyes, and minds. But their hearing, eyes, and minds did not help them at all. This is because they decided to disregard GOD's revelations. Thus, the prophecies and warnings that they ridiculed have caused their doom.
We have annihilated many communities around you, after we had explained the proofs, that they might repent.
Why then did the idols they set up to bring them closer to GOD fail to help them? Instead, they abandoned them. Such were the false gods they idolized; such were the innovations they fabricated.
Recall that we directed a number of jinns to you, in order to let them hear the Quran. When they got there, they said, "Listen." As soon as it was over, they rushed to their people, warning.
They said, "O our people, we have heard a book that was revealed after Moses, and confirms the previous scriptures. It guides to the truth; to the right path.
"O our people, respond to the call of GOD, and believe in Him. He will then forgive your sins, and spare you a painful retribution."
Those who fail to respond to GOD's call cannot escape, and will have no Lord other than Him; they have gone far astray.
Do they not realize that GOD, who created the heavens and the earth without the least effort, is able to revive the dead? Yes indeed; He is Omnipotent.
The day the disbelievers are introduced to the Hellfire, they will be asked, "Is this not the truth?" They will answer, "Yes indeed, by our Lord." He will say, "Then suffer the retribution for your disbelief."
Therefore, be patient like the messengers before you who possessed strength and resorted to patience. Do not be in a hurry to see the retribution that will inevitably come to them. The day they see it, it will seem as if they lasted one hour of the day. This is a proclamation: Is it not the wicked who are consistently annihilated?
Those who disbelieve and repel from the path of GOD, He nullifies their works.
Those who believe and work righteousness, and believe in what was sent down to Muhammad-which is the truth from their Lord-He remits their sins, and blesses them with contentment.
This is because those who disbelieve are following falsehood, while those who believe are following the truth from their Lord. GOD thus cites for the people their examples.
If you encounter (in war) those who disbelieve, you may strike the necks. If you take them as captives you may set them free or ransom them, until the war ends. Had GOD willed, He could have granted you victory, without war. But He thus tests you by one another. As for those who get killed in the cause of GOD, He will never put their sacrifice to waste.
He will guide them, and bless them with contentment.
He will admit them into Paradise, that He described to them.
O you who believe, if you support GOD, He will support you, and strengthen your foothold.
Those who disbelieve incur misery; He causes their works to be utterly in vain.
That is because they hated what GOD revealed and consequently, He nullifies their works.
Did they not roam the earth and see the consequences for those before them? GOD destroyed their works; all disbelievers will suffer the same fate.
This is because GOD is the Lord of those who believe, while the disbelievers have no lord.
GOD admits those who believe and lead a righteous life into gardens with flowing streams. As for those who disbelieve, they live and eat like the animals eat, then end up in the hellfire.
Many a community was much stronger than the community that evicted you from your town; when we annihilated them, no one could help them.
Are those enlightened by their Lord the same as those whose evil works are adorned in their eyes, and they follow their own opinions?
The allegory of Paradise that is promised for the righteous is this: it has rivers of unpolluted water, and rivers of fresh milk, and rivers of wine-delicious for the drinkers- and rivers of strained honey. They have all kinds of fruits therein, and forgiveness from their Lord. (Are they better) or those who abide forever in the hellfire, and drink hellish water that tears up their intestines?
Some of them listen to you, then as soon as they leave they ask those who were enlightened, "What did he just say?" GOD thus seals their hearts and, consequently, they follow only their opinions.
As for those who are guided, He augments their guidance, and grants them their righteousness.
Are they waiting until the Hour comes to them suddenly? All the signs thereof have already come. Once the Hour comes to them, how will they benefit from their message?
You shall know that: "There is no other god beside GOD," and ask forgiveness of your sins and the sins of all believing men and women. GOD is fully aware of your decisions and your ultimate destiny.
Those who believed said: "When will a new sura be revealed?" But when a straightforward sura was revealed, wherein fighting was mentioned, you would see those who harbored doubts in their hearts looking at you, as if death had already come to them. They were thus exposed.
Obedience and righteous utterances are expected of them. If only they showed confidence in GOD, when mobilization was called for, it would have been better for them.
Is it also your intention that as soon as you leave you will commit evil and mistreat your relatives?
It is those who incurred a curse from GOD, whereby He rendered them deaf and blind.
Why do they not study the Quran carefully? Do they have locks on their minds?
Surely, those who slide back, after the guidance has been manifested to them, the devil has enticed them and led them on.
This is because they said to those who hated what GOD has sent down, "We will obey you in certain matters." GOD fully knows their secret conspiracies.
How will it be for them when the angels put them to death? They will beat them on their faces and their rear ends.
This is because they followed what angered GOD and hated the things that please Him. Consequently, He has nullified their works.
Did those who harbor doubts in their hearts think that GOD will not bring out their evil thoughts?
If we will, we can expose them for you, so that you can recognize them just by looking at them. However, you can recognize them by the way they talk. GOD is fully aware of all your works.
We will certainly put you to the test, in order to distinguish those among you who strive, and steadfastly persevere. We must expose your true qualities.
Those who disbelieve and repel from the path of GOD, and oppose the messenger after the guidance has been manifested for them, will never hurt GOD in the least. Instead, He nullifies their works.
O you who believe, you shall obey GOD, and obey the messenger. Otherwise, all your works will be in vain.
Those who disbelieve and repel from the path of GOD, then die as disbelievers, GOD will never forgive them.
Therefore, you shall not waver and surrender in pursuit of peace, for you are guaranteed victory, and GOD is with you. He will never waste your efforts.
This worldly life is no more than play and vanity. But if you believe and lead a righteous life, He will reward you, without asking you for any money.
If He asked you for money, to the extent of creating a hardship for you, you might have become stingy, and your hidden evil might be exposed.
You are invited to spend in the cause of GOD, but some of you turn stingy. The stingy are stingy towards their own souls. GOD is Rich, while you are poor. If you turn away, He will substitute other people in your place, and they will not be like you.
We have bestowed upon you (O Messenger) a great victory.
Whereby GOD forgives your past sins, as well as future sins, and perfects His blessings upon you, and guides you in a straight path.
Additionally, GOD will support you with an unwavering support.
He is the One who places contentment into the hearts of believers to augment more faith, in addition to their faith. To GOD belongs all forces of the heavens and the earth. GOD is Omniscient, Most Wise.
He will certainly admit the believing men and women into gardens with flowing streams, wherein they abide forever. He will remit their sins. This is, in the sight of GOD, a great triumph.
And He will requite the hypocrite men and women and the idol worshiping men and women, for they have harbored evil thoughts about GOD. Their evil will backfire against them. For GOD is angry with them, condemns them, and has prepared for them Gehenna. What a miserable destiny!
To GOD belongs all the forces in the heavens and the earth. GOD is Almighty, Most Wise.
We have sent you as a witness, a bearer of good news, and a warner.
That you people may believe in GOD and His messenger, and reverence Him, and observe Him, and glorify Him, day and night.
Surely, those who pledge allegiance to you, are pledging allegiance to GOD. GOD approves their pledge; He places His hand above their hands. Those who violate such a pledge, commit the violation to their own detriment. As for those who fulfill their pledge with GOD, He will grant them a great recompense.
The sedentary Arabs who stay behind will say, "We have been preoccupied with our money and our families, so ask forgiveness for us!" They utter with their tongues what is not in their hearts. Say, "Who can protect you from GOD, if He willed any adversity for you, or if He willed any blessing for you?" GOD is fully Cognizant of everything you do.
You secretly believed that the messenger and the believers will be defeated and never come back to their families, and this was firmly established in your hearts. You harbored evil thoughts and turned into wicked people.
Anyone who refuses to believe in GOD and His messenger, we have prepared for the disbelievers a hellfire.
To GOD belongs the sovereignty of the heavens and the earth. He forgives whomever He wills, and punishes whomever He wills. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
The sedentary who stay behind will say, when you are expected to collect spoils of war, "Let us follow you to share in this!" They thus wish to alter GOD's words. Say, "You will not follow us. This is GOD's decision." They will then say, "You must be envious of us (for staying behind)." Indeed, they rarely understood anything.
Say to the sedentary Arabs who stay behind, "You will be invited to face powerful people and to fight them, unless they submit. If you obey, GOD will reward you with a generous recompense. But if you turn away again, as you did in the past, He will requite you with a painful retribution."
The blind is not to be blamed, the crippled is not to be blamed, and the sick is not to be blamed. Those who obey GOD and His messenger, He will admit them intogardens with flowing streams. As for those who turn away, He will requite them with a painful retribution.
GOD is pleased with the believers who pledged allegiance to you under the tree. He knew what was in theirhearts and, consequently, He blessed them with contentment, and rewarded them with an immediate victory.
Additionally, they gained many spoils. GOD is Almighty, Most Wise.
GOD has promised you many spoils that you will gain. He thus advanced some benefits for you in this life, and He has withheld the people's hands of aggression against you, and has rendered this a sign for the believers. He thus guides you in a straight path.
As for the group that you could not possibly defeat, GOD took care of them; GOD is Omnipotent.
If the disbelievers ever fought you, they would turn around and flee. They have no Lord and Master; they have no helper.
Such is GOD's system throughout history, and you will find that GOD's system is unchangeable.
He is the One who withheld their hands of aggression against you, and withheld your hands of aggression against them in the valley of Mecca, after He had granted you victory over them. GOD is Seer of everything you do.
It is they who disbelieved and barred you from the Sacred Masjid, and even prevented your offerings from reaching their destination. There were believing men and women (within the enemy camp) whom you did not know, and you were about to hurt them, unknowingly. GOD thus admits into His mercy whomever He wills. If they persist, He will requite those among them who disbelieve with a painful retribution.
While those who disbelieved were enraged, and their hearts were filled with the pride of the days of ignorance, GOD blessed His messenger and the believers with peaceful contentment, and directed them to uphold the word of righteousness. This is what they well deserved. GOD is fully aware of all things.
GOD has fulfilled His messenger's truthful vision: "You will enter the Sacred Masjid, GOD willing, perfectly secure, and you will cut your hair or shorten it (as you fulfill the pilgrimage rituals) there. You will not have any fear. Since He knew what you did not know, He has coupled this with an immediate victory."
He is the One who sent His messenger with the guidance and the religion of truth, to make it prevail over all other religions. GOD suffices as a witness.
Muhammad-the messenger of GOD-and those with him are harsh and stern against the disbelievers, but kind and compassionate amongst themselves. You see them bowing and prostrating, as they seek GOD's blessings and approval. Their marks are on their faces, because of prostrating. This is the same example as in the Torah. Their example in the Gospel is like plants that grow taller and stronger, and please the farmers. He thus enrages the disbelievers. GOD promises those among them who believe, and lead a righteous life, forgiveness and a great recompense.
O you who believe, do not place your opinion above that of GOD and His messenger. You shall reverence GOD. GOD is Hearer, Omniscient.
O you who believe, do not raise your voices above the voice of the prophet, nor shall you shout at him as you shout at each other, lest your works become nullified while you do not perceive.
Surely, those who lower their voices at the messenger of GOD are the ones whose hearts are prepared by GOD to become righteous. They have deserved forgiveness and a great recompense.
As for those who call on you from outside the walls, most of them do not understand.
Had they been patient until you came out to them, it would have been better for them. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
O you who believe, if a wicked person brings any news to you, you shall first investigate, lest you commit injustice towards some people, out of ignorance, then become sorry and remorseful for what you have done.
And know that GOD's messenger has come in your midst. Had he listened to you in many things, you would have made things difficult for yourselves. But GOD made you love faith and adorned it in your hearts, and He made you abhor disbelief, wickedness, and disobedience. These are the guided ones.
Such is grace from GOD and His blessings. GOD is Omniscient, Most Wise.
If two groups of believers fought with each other, you shall reconcile them. If one group aggresses against the other, you shall fight the aggressing group until they submit to GOD's command. Once they submit, you shall reconcile the two groups equitably. You shall maintain justice; GOD loves those who are just.
The believers are members of one family; you shall keep the peace within your family and reverence GOD, that you may attain mercy.
O you who believe, no people shall ridicule other people, for they may be better than they. Nor shall any women ridicule other women, for they may be better than they. Nor shall you mock one another, or make fun of your names. Evil indeed is the reversion to wickedness after attaining faith. Anyone who does not repent after this, these are the transgressors.
O you who believe, you shall avoid any suspicion, for even a little bit of suspicion is sinful. You shall not spy on one another, nor shall you backbite one another; this is as abominable as eating the flesh of your dead brother. You certainly abhor this. You shall observe GOD. GOD is Redeemer, Most Merciful.
O people, we created you from the same male and female, and rendered you distinct peoples and tribes, that you may recognize one another. The best among you in the sight of GOD is the most righteous. GOD is Omniscient, Cognizant.
The Arabs said, "We are Mu'mens (believers)." Say, "You have not believed; what you should say is, 'We are Muslims (submitters),' until belief is established in your hearts." If you obey GOD and His messenger, He will not put any of your works to waste. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
Mu'mens (believers) are those who believe in GOD and His messenger, then attain the status of having no doubt whatsoever, and strive with their money and their lives in the cause of GOD. These are the truthful ones.
Say, "Are you informing GOD about your religion? GOD knows everything in the heavens and the earth. GOD is Omniscient."
They act as if they are doing you a favor by embracing Submission! Say, "You are not doing me any favors by embracing Submission. GOD is the One who is doing you a great favor by guiding you to the faith, if you are sincere."
GOD knows all the secrets in the heavens and the earth; GOD is Seer of everything you do.
Q., and the glorious Quran.
They found it strange that a warner from among them came to them! The disbelievers said, "This is really strange.
"After we die and become dust; this is impossible."
We are fully aware of anyone of them who gets consumed by the earth; we have an accurate record.
They rejected the truth when it came to them; they are utterly confused.
Have they not looked at the sky above them, and how we constructed it and adorned it, without a flaw?
And we created the earth, and scattered on it mountains, and grew in it all kinds of beautiful plants.
This is an enlightenment, and a reminder for every pious worshiper.
And we sent from the sky blessed water, to grow with it gardens and grains to be harvested.
Tall date palms, with clustered fruit.
Provisions for the people. And we revive with it dead lands; you are similarly resurrected.
Disbelieving before them were the people of Noah, the dwellers of Russ, and Thamud.
And 'Ad, Pharaoh, and the brethren of Lot.
And the dwellers of the woods, and the people of Tubba'. All of them disbelieved the messengers and, consequently, My retribution befell them.
Were we too burdened by the first creation? Is this why they doubt resurrection?
We created the human, and we know what he whispers to himself. We are closer to him than his jugular vein.
Two recording (angels), at right and at left, are constantly recording.
Not an utterance does he utter without an alert witness.
Finally, the inevitable coma of death comes; this is what you tried to evade.
The horn is blown; this is the promised day.
Every soul comes with a herder and a witness.
You used to be oblivious to this. We now remove your veil; today, your vision is (as strong as) steel.
The companion said, "Here is my formidable testimony."
Throw into Gehenna every stubborn disbeliever.
Forbidder of charity, aggressor, full of doubt.
He set up beside GOD another god. Throw him into severe retribution.
His companion said, "Our Lord, I did not mislead him; he was far astray."
He said, "Do not feud in front of Me; I have sufficiently warned you.
"Nothing can be changed now. I am never unjust towards the people."
That is the day when we ask Hell, "Have you had enough?" It will say, "Give me more."
Paradise will be offered to the righteous, readily.
This is what was promised to every repenter, steadfast.
They reverenced the Most Gracious, in their privacy, and came wholeheartedly.
Enter it in peace; this is the Day of Eternity.
They get anything they wish therein, and we have even more.
Many a generation before them, who were more powerful, we annihilated. They searched the land; did they find an escape?
This should be a lesson for everyone who possesses a mind, or is able to hear and witness.
We have created the heavens and the earth, and everything between them in six days, and no fatigue touched us.
Therefore, be patient in the face of their utterances, and praise and glorify your Lord before sunrise, and before sunset.
During the night you shall meditate on His name, and after prostrating.
Prepare for the day when the caller calls from a place that is near.
When they hear the inevitable cry; that is the day you come out.
We are the ones who control life and death; to us is the final destiny.
The day will come when the earth cracks in a hurry, giving rise to them. Such summoning is easy for us to do.
We are fully aware of everything they utter, while you have no power over them. Therefore, remind with this Quran, those who reverence My warnings.
The blowing winds.
Bearing rain.
Bringing provisions.
Distributing them as commanded.
What is promised to you will surely come to pass.
The Day of Judgment is inevitable.
Despite the perfectly created sky.
You continue to dispute the truth.
Deviating therefrom are the deviators.
Woe to the falsifiers.
In their blundering, they are totally heedless.
They question the Day of Judgment.
The day they are presented to the fire.
Taste the retribution; this is what you used to challenge.
The righteous have deserved gardens and springs.
They receive their Lord's rewards, for they used to be pious.
Rarely did they sleep the whole night.
At dawn, they prayed for forgiveness.
A portion of their money was set aside for the beggar and the needy.
The earth is full of signs for those who are certain.
And within yourselves; can you see?
In the heaven is your provision, and everything that is promised to you.
By the Lord of the heaven and the earth, this is as true as the fact that you speak.
Have you noted the history of Abraham's honorable guests?
They visited him, saying, "Peace." He said, "Peace to you, strangers!"
He asked his family to prepare a fat calf.
When he offered it to them, he remarked, "Do you not eat?"
He harbored fear of them. They said, "Have no fear," and they gave good news of a knowledgeable son.
His wife was astonished. Noting her wrinkled face: "I am a sterile old woman."
They said, "Thus said your Lord. He is the Most Wise, the Omniscient."
He said, "What are you up to, O messengers?"
They said, "We have been dispatched to criminal people.
"We will shower them with rocks of clay.
"Marked by your Lord for the transgressors."
We then delivered all the believers.
We did not find in it except one house of submitters.
We set it up as a lesson for those who fear the painful retribution.
In Moses (there is a lesson). We sent him to Pharaoh with manifest proofs.
But he turned away, in arrogance, and said, "Magician, or crazy."
Consequently, we punished him and his troops. We threw them into the sea, and he is the one to blame.
In 'Ad (there is a lesson). We sent upon them disastrous wind.
Anything that it came upon was utterly destroyed.
In Thamud (there is a lesson). They were told, "Enjoy temporarily."
They rebelled against the command of their Lord. Consequently, the lightning struck them as they looke.
They could never get up, nor were they helped.
And the people of Noah before that; they were wicked people.
We constructed the sky with our hands, and we will continue to expand it.
And we made the earth habitable; a perfect design.
We created a pair (male and female) of everything, that you may take heed.
You shall escape to GOD. I am sent by Him to you as a manifest warner.
Do not set up beside GOD any other god. I am sent by Him to you as a manifest warner.
Consistently, when a messenger went to the previous generations, they said, "Magician," or, "Crazy."
Did they make an agreement with each other? Indeed, they are transgressors.
You may disregard them; you cannot be blamed.
And remind, for the reminder benefits the believers.
I did not create the jinns and the humans except to worship Me alone.
I need no provisions from them, nor do I need them to feed Me.
GOD is the Provider, the Possessor of all power, the Supreme.
The transgressors have incurred the same fate as their previous counter- parts; they should not challenge.
Woe to those who disbelieved from the day that is awaiting them.
Mt. Sinai.
The recorded scripture.
Published in books.
The frequented Shrine.
The exalted ceiling.
The sea that is set aflame.
Your Lord's requital is unavoidable.
No force in the universe can stop it.
The day will come when the sky will violently thunder.
The mountains will be wiped out.
Woe on that day to the disbelievers-
who are in their blundering, heedless.
They will be herded into Gehenna, forcibly.
This is the Fire in which you used to disbelieve.
Is this magic, or do you not see?
Suffer the burning. Whether you are patient or impatient, it will be the same for you. This is the just requital for what you did.
The righteous have deserved gardens and bliss.
They enjoy what their Lord has reserved for them; their Lord has spared them the retribution of Hell.
Eat and drink happily, in return for your works.
They relax on luxurious furnishings, and we match them with beautiful spouses.
For those who believed, and their children also followed them in belief, we will have their children join them. We never fail to reward them for any work. Every person is paid for what he did.
We will supply them with fruits and meats that they love.
They will enjoy drinks that are never polluted, and never sinful to drink.
Serving them will be servants like protected pearls.
They will meet each other and reminisce among themselves.
They will say, "We used to be kind and humble among our people.
"GOD has blessed us, and has spared us the agony of ill winds.
"We used to implore Him; He is the Most Kind, Most Merciful."
You shall remind the people. With your Lord's blessing's upon you, you are neither a soothsayer, nor crazy.
They may say, "He is a poet; let us just wait until he is dead."
Say, "Go on waiting; I will wait along with you."
Is it their dreams that dictate their behavior, or are they naturally wicked?
Do they say, "He made it all up?" Instead, they are simply disbelievers.
Let them produce a Hadith like this, if they are truthful.
Were they created from nothing? Are they the creators?
Did they create the heavens and the earth? Indeed, they have no certainty.
Do they possess the treasures of your Lord? Are they in control?
Do they climb a ladder that enables them to listen? Let their listeners show their proof.
Does He have daughters, while you have sons?
Are you asking them for any wage, and they are burdened thereby?
Do they know the future, and have it recorded?
Are they plotting and scheming? The disbelievers' schemes backfire against them.
Do they have another god beside GOD? GOD be glorified, far above having partners.
When they see masses falling from the sky, they will say, "Piled clouds!"
Disregard them until they meet the day in which they are struck.
On that day, their schemes will not protect them, nor will they be helped.
Those who transgress suffer retribution here, but most of them do not know.
You shall steadfastly persevere in carrying out your Lord's command- you are in our eyes-and glorify and praise your Lord when you get up.
Also during the night glorify Him, and at dawn as the stars fade away.
As the stars fell away.
Your friend (Muhammad) was not astray, nor was he deceived.
Nor was he speaking out of a personal desire.
It was divine inspiration.
Dictated by the Most Powerful.
Possessor of all authority. From His highest height.
At the highest horizon.
He drew nearer by moving down.
Until He became as close as possible.
He then revealed to His servant what was to be revealed.
The mind never made up what it saw.
Are you doubting what he saw?
He saw him in another descent.
At the ultimate point.
Where the eternal Paradise is located.
The whole place was overwhelmed.
The eyes did not waver, nor go blind.
He saw great signs of his Lord.
Compare this with the female idols Allaat and Al-'Uzzah.
And Manaat, the third one.
Do you have sons, while He has these as daughters?
What a disgraceful distribution!
These are but names that you made up, you and your forefathers. GOD never authorized such a blasphemy. They follow conjecture, and personal desire, when the true guidance has come to them herein from their Lord.
What is it that the human being desires?
To GOD belongs both the Hereafter, and this world.
Not even the angels in heaven possess authority to intercede. The only ones permitted by GOD are those who act in accordance with His will and His approval.
Those who disbelieve in the Hereafter have given the angels feminine names.
They had no knowledge about this; they only conjectured. Conjecture is no substitute for the truth.
You shall disregard those who turn away from our message, and become preoccupied with this worldly life.
This is the extent of their knowledge. Your Lord is fully aware of those who strayed away from His path, and He is fully aware of those who are guided.
To GOD belongs everything in the heavens and everything on earth. He will requite those who commit evil for their works, and will reward the righteous for their righteousness.
They avoid gross sins and transgressions, except for minor offenses. Your Lord's forgiveness is immense. He has been fully aware of you since He initiated you from the earth, and while you were embryos in your mothers' bellies. Therefore, do not exalt yourselves; He is fully aware of the righteous.
Have you noted the one who turned away?
Rarely did he give to charity, and then very little.
Did he possess knowledge of the future? Could he see it?
Was he not informed of the teachings in the scripture of Moses?
And Abraham who fulfilled?
No soul bears the sins of another soul.
Every human being is responsible for his own works.
And everyone's works will be shown.
Then they will be paid fully for such works.
To your Lord is the final destiny.
He is the One who makes you laugh or cry.
He is the One who controls death and life.
He is the One who created the two kinds, male and female-
from a tiny drop of semen.
He will effect the recreation.
He is the One who makes you rich or poor.
He is the Lord of the galaxies.
He is the One who annihilated ancient 'Ad.
And wiped out Thamud.
Also the people of Noah before that; they were evil transgressors.
The evil communities (of Sodom and Gomorrah) were the lowliest.
Consequently, they utterly vanished.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
This is a warning like the older ones.
The inevitable is imminent.
None beside GOD can relieve it.
Are you questioning this matter?
Are you laughing, instead of crying?
Are you insisting on your ways?
You shall fall prostrate before GOD, and worship.
The Hour has come closer, and the moon has split.
Then they saw a miracle; but they turned away and said, "Old magic."
They disbelieved, followed their opinions, and adhered to their old traditions.
Sufficient warnings have been delivered to alert them.
Great wisdom; but all the warnings have been in vain.
Ignore them; the day will come when the caller will announce a terrible disaster.
With their eyes humiliated, ' they come out of the graves like scattered locusts.
As they respond to the caller, the disbelievers will say, "This is a difficult day."
The people of Noah disbelieved before them. They disbelieved our servant and said, "Crazy!" He was persecuted.
He implored his Lord, "I am oppressed; grant me victory."
We then opened the gates of the sky, pouring water.
And we caused springs to gush out of the earth. The waters met to effect a predetermined decision.
We carried him on a watercraft made of logs and ropes.
It ran under our watchful eyes; a reward for one who was rejected.
We have set it up as a lesson. Does any of you wish to learn?
How terrible was My retribution after the warnings!
We made the Quran easy to learn. Does any of you wish to learn?
'Ad disbelieved. Consequently, how terrible was My retribution after the warnings.
We sent upon them violent winds, on a day of continuous misery.
It tossed the people around as if they were decayed palm tree trunks.
How terrible was My retribution after the warnings!
We made the Quran easy to learn. Does any of you wish to learn?
Thamud rejected the warnings.
They said, "Shall we follow one of us; a human being? We will then go astray, then end up in Hell.
"Did the message come down to him, instead of us? He is a flagrant liar."
They will find out tomorrow who the flagrant liar is.
We are sending the camel as a test for them. Watch them and be patient.
Inform them that the water shall be divided among them; (the camel) shall be allowed to drink on her designated day.
But they persuaded their friend to kill (the camel), and he obliged.
Consequently, how terrible was My retribution! They have been warned.
We sent upon them one blow, whereupon they became like harvested hay.
We made the Quran easy to learn. Does any of you wish to learn?
The people of Lot rejected the warnings.
We showered them with rocks. Only Lot's family was saved at dawn.
We blessed him and his family; we thus reward the appreciative.
He warned them about our requital, but they ridiculed the warnings.
They negotiated with him about his guests; we blinded them. Suffer My retribution; you have been warned.
Early the next morning, a devastating retribution struck them.
Suffer My retribution; you have been warned.
We made the Quran easy to learn. Does any of you wish to learn?
Pharaoh's people were warned.
They rejected all our signs. Consequently, we requited them as an Almighty, Omnipotent should.
Are your disbelievers better than those disbelievers? Have you been absolved by the scripture?
Perhaps they think, "We will be the winners."
All of them will be defeated; they will turn around and flee.
The Hour is awaiting them, and the Hour is far worse and more painful.
Certainly, the guilty are astray, and will end up in Hell.
They will be dragged into the hellfire, forcibly. Suffer the agony of retribution.
Everything we created is precisely measured.
Our commands are done within the blink of an eye.
We annihilated your counterparts. Does any of you wish to learn?
Everything they did is recorded in the scriptures.
Everything, small or large, is written down.
Surely, the righteous have deserved gardens and rivers.
In a position of honor, at an Omnipotent King.
The Most Gracious.
Teacher of the Quran.
Creator of the human beings.
He taught them how to distinguish.
The sun and the moon are perfectly calculated.
The stars and the trees prostrate.
He constructed the sky and established the law.
You shall not transgress the law.
You shall establish justice; do not violate the law.
He created the earth for all creatures.
In it there are fruits, and date palms with their hanging fruit.
Also grains and the spices.
(O humans and jinns,) which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
He created the human from aged clay, like the potter's clay.
And created the jinns from blazing fire.
(O humans and jinns,) which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
Lord of the two easts and the two wests.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
He separates the two seas where they meet.
A barrier is placed between them, to prevent them from transgressing.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
Out of both of them you get pearls and coral.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
He gave you ships that roam the sea like flags.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
Everyone on earth perishes.
Only the presence of your Lord lasts. Possessor of Majesty and Honor.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
Imploring Him is everyone in the heavens and the earth. Every day He is in full control.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
We will call you to account, O humans and jinns.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
O you jinns and humans, if you can penetrate the outer limits of the heavens and the earth, go ahead and penetrate. You cannot penetrate without authorization.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
You get bombarded with projectiles of fire and metal, and you cannot win.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
When the sky disintegrates, and turns rose colored like paint.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
On that day, no human, nor a jinn, will be asked about his sins.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
(This is because) the guilty will be recognized by their looks; they will be taken by the forelocks and the feet.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
This is Gehenna that the guilty used to deny.
They will circulate between it and an intolerable inferno.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
For those who reverence the majesty of their Lord, two gardens (one for the jinns and one for the humans).
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
Full of provisions.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
Two springs are in them, flowing.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
Of every fruit in them, two kinds.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
While relaxing on furnishings lined with satin, the fruits are within reach.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
Their beautiful mates were never touched by any human or jinn.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
They look like gems and coral.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
Is the reward of goodness anything but goodness?
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
Below them are two gardens (one for the jinns and one for the humans).
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
Side by side.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
In them, wells to be pumped.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
In them are fruits, date palms, and pomegranate.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
In them are beautiful mates.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
Confined in the tents.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
No human ever touched them, nor a jinn.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
They relax on green carpets, in beautiful surroundings.
Which of your Lord's marvels can you deny?
Most exalted is the name of your Lord, Possessor of Majesty and Honor.
When the inevitable comes to pass.
Nothing can stop it from happening.
It will lower some, and raise others.
The earth will be shaken up.
The mountains will be wiped out.
As if they never existed.
You will be stratified into three kinds.
Those who deserved bliss will be in bliss.
Those who deserved misery will be in misery.
Then there is the elite of the elite.
They are those who will be closest (to God).
In the gardens of bliss.
Many from the first generations.
Few from the later generations.
On luxurious furnishings.
Enjoying everything, they will be neighbors.
Serving them will be immortal servants.
With cups, pitchers and pure drinks.
They never run out, nor do they get bored.
Fruits of their choice.
Meat of birds that they desire.
Beautiful mates.
Like protected pearls.
Rewards for their works.
They never hear any nonsense therein, nor sinful utterances.
Only the utterance: "Peace, peace."
Those of the right side, will be on the right side.
In lush orchards.
Fragrant fruits.
Extended shade.
Abundant water.
Many fruits.
Never ending; never forbidden.
Luxurious furnishings.
We create for them mates.
Never previously touched.
Perfectly matched.
For those on the right side.
Many from the early generations.
Many from the later generations.
Those of the left, will be on the left.
In misery and inferno.
Even their shade is hot.
Never cool, never tolerable.
They used to be rich.
They insisted on the great blasphemy.
They said, "After we die and turn to dust and bones, we get resurrected?
"Does this include our forefathers?"
Say, "The early generations and the later generations.
"Will be summoned to a meeting on a predetermined day.
"Then you, O disbelieving strayers.
"Will eat from the trees of bitterness.
"Filling your bellies therefrom.
"Then drinking on top of it hellish drinks.
"Then adding drinks of sand."
Such is their share on the Day of Judgment.
We have created you, if you could only believe!
Have you noted the semen that you produce?
Did you create it, or did we?
We have predetermined death for you. Nothing can stop us-
from substituting new generations in your place, and establishing what you do not know.
You know about the first creation. Do you not remember?
Have you noted the crops you reap?
Did you grow them, or did we?
If we will, we can turn it into hay. Then you will lament:
"We lost.
"We are deprived."
Have you noted the water you drink?
Did you send it down from the clouds, or did we?
If we will, we can make it salty. You should be thankful.
Have you noted the fire you ignite?
Did you initiate its tree, or did we?
We rendered it a reminder, and a useful tool for the users.
You shall glorify the name of your Lord, the Great.
I swear by the positions of the stars.
This is an oath, if you only knew, that is awesome.
This is an honorable Quran.
In a protected book.
None can grasp it except the sincere.
A revelation from the Lord of the universe.
Are you disregarding this narration?
Do you make it your business that you disbelieve?
When the time comes and it (your soul) reaches your throat-
you will then look around.
We are closer to it than you are, but you do not see.
If it is true that you do not owe any accounting-
why do you not restore (your soul), if you are truthful?
If he is one of those close to Me-
then joy, flowers, and gardens of bliss.
And if he is one of the right-
peace is the lot of those on the right.
But if he is one of the disbelievers, the strayers-
then an abode of inferno-
and burning in Hell.
This is the absolute truth.
You shall glorify the name of your Lord, the Great.
Glorifying GOD is everything in the heavens and the earth. He is the Almighty, Most Wise.
To Him belongs the kingship of the heavens and the earth. He controls life and death. He is Omnipotent.
He is the Alpha and the Omega. He is the Outermost and the Innermost. He is fully aware of all things.
He is the One who created the heavens and the earth in six days, then assumed all authority. He knows everything that enters into the earth, and everything that comes out of it, and everything that comes down from the sky, and everything that climbs into it. He is with you wherever you may be. GOD is Seer of everything you do.
To Him belongs the kingship of the heavens and the earth. All matters are controlled by GOD.
He merges the night into the day, and merges the day into the night. He is fully aware of the innermost thoughts.
Believe in GOD and His messenger, and give from what He has bestowed upon you. Those among you who believe and give (to charity) have deserved a great recompense.
Why should you not believe in GOD when the messenger is inviting you to believe in your Lord? He has taken a pledge from you, if you are believers.
He is the One who sends down to His servant clear revelations, in order to lead you out of the darkness into the light. GOD is Compassionate towards you, Most Merciful.
Why do you not spend in the cause of GOD, when GOD possesses all wealth in the heavens and the earth? Distinguished from the rest are those among you who spend before the victory and strive. They attain a greater rank than those who spend after the victory and strive. For each, GOD promises salvation. GOD is Cognizant of everything you do.
Who would like to loan GOD a loan of righteousness, to have it multiplied for him manifold, and end up with a generous recompense?
The day will come when you see the believing men and women with their lights radiating ahead of them and to their right. Good news is yours that, on that day, you will have gardens with flowing streams. You will abide therein forever. This is the great triumph.
On that day, the hypocrite men and women will say to those who believed, "Please allow us to absorb some of your light." It will be said, "Go back behind you, and seek light." A barrier will be set up between them, whose gate separates mercy on the inner side, from retribution on the outer side.
They will call upon them, "Were we not with you?" They will answer, "Yes, but you cheated your souls, hesitated, doubted, and became misled by wishful thinking, until GOD's judgment came. You were diverted from GOD by illusions.
"Therefore, today no ransom can be taken from you, nor from those who disbelieved. Your abode is the fire; it is your lord, and miserable abode."
Is it not time for those who believed to open up their hearts for GOD's message, and the truth that is revealed herein? They should not be like the followers of previous scriptures whose hearts became hardened with time and, consequently, many of them turned wicked.
Know that GOD revives the land after it had died. We thus explain the revelations for you, that you may understand.
Surely, the charitable men and women, have loaned GOD a loan of goodness. They will receive their reward multiplied manifold; they have deserved a generous recompense.
Those who believed in GOD and His messengers are the saints and martyrs. Reserved for them at their Lord are their rewards and their light. As for those who disbelieved and rejected our revelations, they have incurred Hell.
Know that this worldly life is no more than play and games, and boasting among you, and hoarding of money and children. It is like abundant rain that produces plants and pleases the disbelievers. But then the plants turn into useless hay, and are blown away by the wind. In the Hereafter there is either severe retribution, or forgiveness from GOD and approval. This worldly life is no more than a temporary illusion.
Therefore, you shall race towards forgiveness from your Lord, and a Paradise whose width encom- passes the heaven and the earth. It awaits those who believed in GOD and His messengers. Such is GOD's grace that He bestows upon whomever He wills. GOD is Possessor of Infinite Grace.
Anything that happens on earth, or to you, has already been recorded, even before the creation. This is easy for GOD to do.
Thus, you should not grieve over anything you miss, nor be proud of anything He has bestowed upon you. GOD does not love those who are boastful, proud.
They are stingy, and enjoin the people to be stingy. If one turns away, then GOD is the Rich, the Praiseworthy.
We sent our messengers supported by clear proofs, and we sent down to them the scripture and the law, that the people may uphold justice. And we sent down the iron, wherein there is strength, and many benefits for the people. All this in order for GOD to distinguish those who would support Him and His messengers, on faith. GOD is Powerful, Almighty.
We sent Noah and Abraham, and we granted their descendants prophethood and the scripture. Some of them were guided, while many were wicked.
Subsequent to them, we sent our messengers. We sent Jesus the son of Mary, and we gave him the Injeel (Gospel), and we placed in the hearts of his followers kindness and mercy. But they invented hermitism which we never decreed for them. All we asked them to do was to uphold the commandments approved by GOD. But they did not uphold the message as they should have. Consequently, we gave those who believed among them their recompense, while many of them were wicked.
O you who believe, you shall reverence GOD and believe in His messenger. He will then grant you double the reward from His mercy, endow you with light to guide you, and forgive you. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
Thus, the followers of previous scripture should know that they have not monopolized GOD's mercy and grace, and that all grace is in GOD's hand. He bestows it upon whomever He wills. GOD is Possessor of Infinite Grace.
GOD has heard the woman who debated with you about her husband, and complained to GOD. GOD heard everything the two of you discussed. GOD is Hearer, Seer.
Those among you who estrange their wives (by declaring them as forbidden in sex) as their mothers know full well that they are not their mothers. Their mothers are the women who gave birth to them. Indeed, they are committing a blasphemy and a falsehood. GOD is Pardoner, Forgiver.
Those who estrange their wives in this manner, then reconcile there- after, shall atone by freeing a slave before resuming their sexual relations. This is to enlighten you. GOD is Cognizant of everything you do.
If you cannot find a slave to free, you shall fast two consecutive months before resuming sexual relations. If you cannot fast, then you shall feed sixty poor people. You shall believe in GOD and His messenger. These are GOD's laws. The disbelievers have incurred a painful retribution.
Surely, those who fight GOD and His messenger are committed to defeat, like their previous counterparts were committed to defeat. We have sent down clear proofs, and the rejectors have incurred a shameful retribution.
The day will come when GOD will resurrect them all, then inform them of everything they had done. GOD has recorded everything, while they have forgotten it. GOD witnesses all things.
Do you not realize that GOD knows everything in the heavens and everything on earth? No three people can conspire secretly without Him being their fourth, nor five without Him being the sixth, nor less than that, nor more, without Him being there with them wherever they may be. Then, on the Day of Resurrection, He will inform them of everything they had done. GOD is fully aware of all things.
Have you noted those who were enjoined from conspiring secretly, then insist on conspiring? They conspire to commit sin, transgression, and disobedience of the messenger. When they come to you, they greet you with a greeting other than that decreed by GOD. They say inside themselves, "GOD will not punish us for our utterances." Their only requital is Gehenna, wherein they burn; what a miserable destiny.
O you who believe, if you have to confer secretly, you shall not confer to commit sin, transgression, and to disobey the messenger. You shall confer to work righteousness and piety. You shall reverence GOD, before whom you will be summoned.
Secret conspiracy is the devil's idea, through which he seeks to hurt those who believed. However, he cannot hurt them against GOD's will. In GOD the believers shall trust.
O you who believe, if you are told, "Please make room," you shall make room for each other to sit. GOD will then make room for you. If you are asked to get up and move, get up and move. GOD raises those among you who believe, and those who acquire knowledge to higher ranks. GOD is fully Cognizant of everything you do.
O you who believe, when you wish to confer with the messenger, you shall offer a charity (to the poor) before you do so. This is better for you, and purer. If you cannot afford it, then GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
If you failed to give to charity before conferring, then repented thereafter, GOD accepts your repentance. You shall observe the contact prayers (Salat), give the obligatory charity (Zakat), and obey GOD and His messenger. GOD is fully Cognizant of everything you do.
Have you noted those who befriended people with whom GOD is angry? They neither belong with you, nor with them. They deliberately swear lies!
GOD has prepared for them a severe retribution. Miserable indeed is what they used to do.
They used their oaths as a means of repelling from the path of GOD. Consequently, they have incurred a shameful retribution.
Neither their money, nor their children will help them against GOD. They have incurred the hellfire, wherein they abide forever.
The Day will come when GOD resurrects them all. They will swear to Him then, just as they swear to you now, thinking that they really are right! Indeed, they are the real liars.
The devil has possessed them, and has caused them to disregard GOD's message. These are the party of the devil. Absolutely, the party of the devil are the losers.
Surely, those who oppose GOD and His messenger will be with the lowliest.
GOD has decreed: "I and My messengers will most assuredly win." GOD is Powerful, Almighty.
You will not find people who believe in GOD and the Last Day befriending those who oppose GOD and His messenger, even if they were their parents, or their children, or their siblings, or their tribe. For these, He decrees faith into their hearts, and supports them with inspiration from Him, and admits them into gardens with flowing streams wherein they abide forever. GOD is pleased with them, and they are pleased with Him. These are the party of GOD. Most assuredly, GOD's party are the winners.
Glorifying GOD is everything in the heavens and the earth, and He is the Almighty, Most Wise.
He is the One who evicted those who disbelieved among the people of the scripture from their homes in a mass exodus. You never thought that they would leave, and they thought that their preparations would protect them from GOD. But then GOD came to them whence they never expected, and threw terror into their hearts. Thus, they abandoned their homes on their own volition, in addition to pressure from the believers. You should learn from this, O you who possess vision.
If GOD did not force them to leave, He would have requited them in this life (even worse than forcing them to leave). In the Hereafter He will commit them to the retribution of Hell.
This is because they opposed GOD and His messenger. For those who oppose GOD and His messenger, GOD is most strict in enforcing retribution.
Whether you chop a tree or leave it standing on its trunk is in accordance with GOD's will. He will surely humiliate the wicked.
Whatever GOD restored for His messenger was not the result of your war efforts, whether you fought on horses or on foot. GOD is the One who sends His messengers against whomever He wills. GOD is Omnipotent.
Whatever GOD restored to His messenger from the (defeated) communities shall go to GOD and His messenger (in the form of a charity). You shall give it to the relatives, the orphans, the poor, and the traveling alien. Thus, it will not remain monopolized by the strong among you. You may keep the spoils given to you by the messenger, but do not take what he enjoins you from taking. You shall reverence GOD. GOD is strict in enforcing retribution.
(You shall give) to the needy who immigrated. They were evicted from their homes and deprived of their properties, because they sought GOD's grace and pleasure, and because they supported GOD and His messenger. They are the truthful.
As for those who provided them with a home and a refuge, and were believers before them, they love those who immigrated to them, and find no hesitation in their hearts in helping them. In fact, they readily give them priority over themselves, even when they themselves need what they give away. Indeed, those who overcome their natural stinginess are the successful ones.
Those who became believers after them say, "Our Lord, forgive us and our brethren who preceded us to the faith, and keep our hearts from harboring any hatred towards those who believed. Our Lord, You are Compassionate, Most Merciful."
Have you noted those who are plagued with hypocrisy, and how they said to their companions in disbelief among the people of the scripture, "If you are evicted we will go out with you, and will never obey anyone who opposes you. If anyone fights you, we will fight on your side." GOD bears witness that they are liars.
In fact, if they were evicted, they would not have gone out with them, and if anyone fought them, they would not have supported them. Even if they supported them, they would have turned around and fled. They could never win.
Indeed, you strike more terror in their hearts than their fear of GOD. This is because they are people who do not comprehend.
They do not get together to fight you unless they are in well-shielded buildings, or behind walls. Their might appears formidable among themselves. You would think that they are united, when in fact their hearts are divided. This is because they are people who do not understand.
Their fate is the same as their counterparts who preceded them. They suffered the consequences of their decisions. They have incurred a painful retribution.
They are like the devil: he says to the human being, "Disbelieve," then as soon as he disbelieves, he says, "I disown you. I fear GOD, Lord of the universe."
The destiny for both of them is the Hellfire, wherein they abide forever. This is the requital for the transgressors.
O you who believe, you shall reverence GOD, and let every soul examine what it has sent ahead for tomorrow. You shall reverence GOD; GOD is fully Cognizant of everything you do.
Do not be like those who forgot GOD, so He made them forget themselves. These are the wicked.
Not equal are the dwellers of the Hellfire and the dwellers of Paradise; the dwellers of Paradise are the winners.
If we revealed this Quran to a mountain, you would see it trembling, crumbling, out of reverence for GOD. We cite these examples for the people, that they may reflect.
He is the One GOD; there is no other god beside Him. Knower of all secrets and declarations. He is the Most Gracious, Most Merciful.
He is the One GOD; there is no other god beside Him. The King, the Most Sacred, the Peace, the Most Faithful, the Supreme, the Almighty, the Most Powerful, the Most Dignified. GOD be glorified; far above having partners.
He is the One GOD; the Creator, the Initiator, the Designer. To Him belong the most beautiful names. Glorifying Him is everything in the heavens and the earth. He is the Almighty, Most Wise.
O you who believe, you shall not befriend My enemies and your enemies, extending love and friendship to them, even though they have disbelieved in the truth that has come to you. They persecute the messenger, and you, just because you believe in GOD, your Lord. If you mobilize to struggle in My cause, seeking My blessings, how can you secretly love them? I am fully aware of everything you conceal, and everything you declare. Those among you who do this have indeed strayed off the right path.
Whenever they encounter you, they treat you as enemies, and hurt you with their hands and tongues. They want you to disbelieve.
Your relatives and your money can never help you. On the Day of Resurrection, He will judge among you. GOD is Seer of everything you do.
A good example has been set for you by Abraham and those with him. They said to their people, "We disown you and the idols that you worship besides GOD. We denounce you, and you will see nothing from us except animosity and hatred until you believe in GOD ALONE." However, a mistake was commited by Abraham when he said to his father, "I will pray for your forgiveness, but I possess no power to protect you from GOD." "Our Lord, we trust in You, and submit to You; to You is the final destiny.
"Our Lord, let us not be oppressed by those who disbelieved, and forgive us. You are the Almighty, Most Wise."
A good example has been set by them for those who seek GOD and the Last Day. As for those who turn away, GOD is in no need (of them), Most Praiseworthy.
GOD may change the animosity between you and them into love. GOD is Omnipotent. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
GOD does not enjoin you from befriending those who do not fight you because of religion, and do not evict you from your homes. You may befriend them and be equitable towards them. GOD loves the equitable.
GOD enjoins you only from befriending those who fight you because of religion, evict you from your homes, and band together with others to banish you. You shall not befriend them. Those who befriend them are the transgressors.
O you who believe, when believing women (abandon the enemy and) ask for asylum with you, you shall test them. GOD is fully aware of their belief. Once you establish that they are believers, you shall not return them to the disbelievers. They are not lawful to remain married to them, nor shall the disbelievers be allowed to marry them. Give back the dowries that the disbelievers have paid. You commit no error by marrying them, so long as you pay them their due dowries. Do not keep disbelieving wives (if they wish to join the enemy). You may ask them for the dowry you had paid, and they may ask for what they paid. This is GOD's rule; He rules among you. GOD is Omniscient, Most Wise.
If any of your wives join the enemies' camp, and you are forced to fight, you shall force the enemy to compensate the men who lost their wives, by giving them what they spent on their wives. You shall reverence GOD, in whom you believe.
O you prophet, when the believing women (who abandoned the disbelievers) to seek asylum with youpledge to you that they will not set up any idols beside GOD, nor steal, nor commit adultery, nor kill their children, nor fabricate any falsehood, nor disobey your righteous orders, you shall accept their pledge, and pray to GOD to forgive them. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
O you who believe, do not befriend people with whom GOD is angry, and who are hopelessly stuck in disbelief; they are just as hopeless as the disbelievers who are already in the graves.
Glorifying GOD is everything in the heavens and everything on earth. He is the Almighty, Most Wise.
O you who believe, why do you say what you do not do?
Most abominable in the sight of GOD is that you say what you do not do.
GOD loves those who fight in His cause united in one column, like the bricks in one wall.
Recall that Moses said to his people, "O my people, why do you hurt me, even though you know that I am GOD's messenger to you?" When they deviated, GOD diverted their hearts. For GOD does not guide the wicked people.
Recall that Jesus, son of Mary, said, "O Children of Israel, I am GOD's messenger to you, confirming the Torah and bringing good news of a messenger to come after me whose name will be even more praised (Ahmad)." Then, when he showed them the clear proofs, they said, "This is profound magic."
Who is more evil than one who fabricates lies about GOD, and he is being invited to Submission? GOD does not guide the evil people.
They wish to put out GOD's light with their mouths. But GOD insists upon perfecting His light, in spite of the disbelievers.
He has sent His messenger with the guidance and the true religion, and will make it dominate all religions, in spite of the idol worshipers.
O you who believe, let Me inform you of a trade that will save you from painful retribution.
Believe in GOD and His messenger and strive in the cause of GOD with your money and your lives. This is the best deal for you, if you only knew.
In return, He forgives your sins, and admits you into gardens with flowing streams, with beautiful mansions in the gardens of Eden. This is the greatest triumph.
Additionally, you get something you truly love: support from GOD and guaranteed victory. Give good news to the believers.
O you who believe, be GOD's supporters, like the disciples of Jesus, son of Mary. When he said to them, "Who are my supporters towards GOD," they said, "We are GOD's supporters." Thus, a group from the Children of Israel believed, and another group disbelieved. We helped those who believed against their enemy, until they won.
Glorifying GOD is everything in the heavens and everything on earth; the King, the Most Sacred, the Almighty, the Most Wise.
He is the One who sent to the gentiles a messenger from among them, to recite to them His revelations, purify them, and teach them the scripture and wisdom. Before this, they had gone far astray.
And to many generations subsequent to them. He is the Almighty, Most Wise.
Such is GOD's grace that He bestows upon whomever He wills. GOD is Possessor of Infinite Grace.
The example of those who were given the Torah, then failed to uphold it, is like the donkey carrying great works of literature. Miserable indeed is the example of people who rejected GOD's revelations. GOD does not guide the wicked people.
Say, "O you who are Jewish, if you claim that you are GOD's chosen, to the exclusion of all other people, then you should long for death if you are truthful!"
They will never long for it, because of what they have committed. GOD is fully aware of the wicked.
Say, "The death that you are trying to evade will catch up with you sooner or later. Then you will be returned to the Knower of all secrets and declarations, then He will inform you of everything you had done."
O you who believe, when the Congregational Prayer (Salat Al-Jumu'ah) is announced on Friday, you shall hasten to the commemoration of GOD, and drop all business. This is better for you, if you only knew.
Once the prayer is completed, you may spread through the land to seek GOD's bounties, and continue to remember GOD frequently, that you may succeed.
When some of them come across a business deal, or some entertainment, they rush to it and leave you standing! Say, "What GOD possesses is far better than the entertainment or the business. GOD is the best Provider."
When the hypocrites come to you they say, "We bear witness that you are the messenger of GOD." GOD knows that you are His messenger, and GOD bears witness that the hypocrites are liars.
Under the guise of their apparent faith, they repel the people from the path of GOD. Miserable indeed is what they do.
This is because they believed, then disbelieved. Hence, their minds are blocked; they do not understand.
When you see them, you may be impressed by their looks. And when they speak, you may listen to their eloquence. They are like standing logs. They think that every call is intended against them. These are the real enemies; beware of them. GOD condemns them; they have deviated.
When they are told, "Come let the messenger of GOD pray for your forgiveness," they mockingly turn their heads, and you see them repel others and act arrogantly.
It is the same for them, whether you pray for their forgiveness, or not pray for their forgiveness; GOD will not forgive them. For GOD does not guide the wicked people.
They are the ones who say, "Do not give any money to those who followed the messenger of GOD, perhaps they abandon him!" However, GOD possesses the treasures of the heavens and the earth, but the hypocrites do not comprehend.
They say, "If we go back to the city, the powerful therein will evict the weak (and we will be victimized)." (They should know that) all dignity belongs to GOD and His messenger, and the believers. However, the hypocrites do not know.
O you who believe, do not be distracted by your money and your children from remembering GOD. Those who do this are the losers.
You shall give from our provisions to you before death comes to you, then you say, "My Lord, if only You could delay this for a short while! I would then be charitable and join the righteous!"
GOD never delays the appointed time of death for any soul. GOD is fully Cognizant of everything you do.
Glorifying GOD is everything in the heavens and everything on earth. To Him belongs all kingship, and to Him belongs all praise, and He is Omnipotent.
He is the One who created you, then among you there is the disbeliever, and the believer. GOD is fully Seer of everything you do.
He created the heavens and the earth for a specific purpose, designed you and perfected your design, then to Him is the final destiny.
He knows everything in the heavens and the earth, and He knows everything you conceal and everything you declare. GOD is fully aware of the innermost thoughts.
Have you noted those who disbelieved in the past, then suffered the consequences of their decision? They incurred a painful retribution.
This is because their messengers went to them with clear proofs, but they said, "Shall we follow humans like us?" They disbelieved and turned away. GOD does not need them; GOD is in no need, Praiseworthy.
Those who disbelieved claim that they will not be resurrected! Yes indeed, by my Lord, you will be resurrected, and you will be held accountable for everything you have done. This is easy for GOD to do.
Therefore, you shall believe in GOD and His messenger, and the light that we have revealed herein. GOD is fully Cognizant of everything you do.
The day will come when He summons you to the Day of Summoning. That is the Day of Mutual Blaming. Anyone who believes in GOD and leads a righteous life, He will remit his sins, and will admit him into gardens with flowing streams. They abide therein forever. This is the greatest triumph.
As for those who disbelieve and reject our revelations, they are the dwellers of the Hellfire; they abide therein forever. What a miserable destiny!
Nothing happens to you except in accordance with GOD's will. Anyone who believes in GOD, He will guide his heart. GOD is fully aware of all things.
You shall obey GOD and you shall obey the messenger. If you turn away, then the sole mission of our messenger is to deliver the message.
GOD: there is no other god besides Him. In GOD the believers shall trust.
O you who believe, your spouses and your children can be your enemies; beware. If you pardon, forget, and forgive, then GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
Your money and children are a test, and GOD possesses a great recompense.
Therefore, you shall reverence GOD as much as you can, and listen, and obey, and give (to charity) for your own good. Anyone who is protected from his own stinginess, these are the successful ones.
If you lend GOD a loan of righteousness, He will multiply the reward for you manifold, and forgive you. GOD is Appreciative, Clement.
The Knower of all secrets and declarations; the Almighty, Most Wise.
O you prophet, when you people divorce the women, you shall ensure that a divorce interim is fulfilled. You shall measure such an interim precisely. You shall reverence GOD your Lord. Do not evict them from their homes, nor shall you make life miserable for them, to force them to leave on their own, unless they commit a proven adultery. These are GOD's laws. Anyone who transgresses GOD's laws commits an injustice against himself. You never know; maybe GOD wills something good to come out of this.
Once the interim is fulfilled, you may reconcile with them equitably, or go through with the separation equitably. You shall have two equitable witnesses witness the divorce before GOD. This is to enlighten those who believe in GOD and the Last Day. Anyone who reverences GOD, He will create an exit for him.
And will provide for him whence he never expected. Anyone who trusts in GOD, He suffices him. GOD's commands are done. GOD has decreed for everything its fate.
As for the women who have reached menopause, if you have any doubts, their interim shall be three months. As for those who do not menstruate, and discover that they are pregnant, their interim ends upon giving birth. Anyone who reverences GOD, He makes everything easy for him.
This is GOD's command that He sends down to you. Anyone who reverences GOD, He remits his sins, and rewards him generously.
You shall allow them to live in the same home in which they lived with you, and do not make life so miserable for them that they leave on their own. If they are pregnant, you shall spend on them until they give birth. If they nurse the infant, you shall pay them for this service. You shall maintain the amicable relations among you. If you disagree, you may hire another woman to nurse the child.
The rich husband shall provide support in accordance with his means, and the poor shall provide according to the means that GOD bestowed upon him. GOD does not impose on any soul more than He has given it. GOD will provide ease after difficulty.
Many a community rebelled against the commands of its Lord and against His messengers. Consequently, we held them strictly accountable, and requited them a terrible requital.
They suffered the consequences of their decisions; a profound loss.
GOD has prepared for them severe retribution. Therefore, you shall reverence GOD, O you who possess intelligence and believed. GOD has sent down to you a message-
a messenger who recites to you GOD's revelations, clearly, to lead those who believe and work righteousness out of the darkness into the light. Anyone who believes in GOD and leads a righteous life, He will admit him into gardens with flowing streams; they abide therein forever. GOD will generously reward him.
GOD created seven universes and the same number of earths. The commands flow among them. This is to let you know that GOD is Omnipotent, and that GOD is fully aware of all things.
O you prophet, why do you prohibit what GOD has made lawful for you, just to please your wives? GOD is Forgiver, Merciful.
GOD has decreed for you the laws dealing with your oaths. GOD is your Lord, and He is the Omniscient, Most Wise.
The prophet had trusted some of his wives with a certain statement, then one of them spread it, and GOD let him know about it. He then informed his wife of part of the issue, and disregarded part. She asked him, "Who informed you of this?" He said, "I was informed by the Omniscient, Most Cognizant."
If the two of you repent to GOD, then your hearts have listened. But if you band together against him, then GOD is his ally, and so is Gabriel and the righteous believers. Also, the angels are his helpers.
If he divorces you, his Lord will substitute other wives in your place who are better than you; submitters (Muslims), believers (Mu'mins), obedient, repentant, worshipers, pious, either previously married, or virgins.
O you who believe, protect yourselves and your families from the Hellfire whose fuel is people and rocks. Guarding it are stern and powerful angels who never disobey GOD; they do whatever they are commanded to do.
O you who disbelieved, do not apologize today. You are being requited only for what you did.
O you who believe, you shall repent to GOD a firm repentance. Your Lord will then remit your sins and admit you into gardens with flowing streams. On that day, GOD will not disappoint the prophet and those who believed with him. Their light will radiate in front of them and to their right. They will say, "Our Lord, perfect our light for us, and forgive us; You are Omnipotent."
O prophet, struggle against the disbelievers and the hypocrites and be stern with them. Their abode is Gehenna, and a miserable destiny.
GOD cites as examples of those who disbelieved the wife of Noah and the wife of Lot. They were married to two of our righteous servants, but they betrayed them and, consequently, they could not help them at all against GOD. The two of them were told, "Enter the Hellfire with those who deserved it."
And GOD cites as an example of those who believed the wife of Pharaoh. She said, "My Lord, build a home for me at You in Paradise, and save me from Pharaoh and his works; save me from the transgressing people."
Also Mary, the Amramite. She maintained her chastity, then we blew into her from our spirit. She believed in the words of her Lord and His scriptures; she was obedient.
Most exalted is the One in whose hands is all kingship, and He is Omnipotent.
The One who created death and life for the purpose of distinguishing those among you who would do better. He is the Almighty, the Forgiving.
He created seven universes in layers. You do not see any imperfection in the creation by the Most Gracious. Keep looking; do you see any flaw?
Look again and again; your eyes will come back stumped and conquered.
We adorned the lowest universe with lamps, and guarded its borders with projectiles against the devils; we prepared for them a retribution in Hell.
For those who disbelieved in their Lord, the retribution of Gehenna. What a miserable destiny.
When they get thrown therein, they hear its furor as it fumes.
It almost explodes from rage. Whenever a group is thrown therein, its guards would ask them, "Did you not receive a warner?"
They would answer, "Yes indeed; a warner did come to us, but we disbelieved and said, 'GOD did not reveal anything. You are totally astray.'
They also say, "If we heard or understood, we would not be among the dwellers of Hell!"
Thus, they confessed their sins. Woe to the dwellers of Hell.
As for those who reverence their Lord, when alone in their privacy, they have attained forgiveness and a great recompense.
Whether you keep your utterances secret, or declare them, He is fully aware of the innermost thoughts.
Should He not know what He created? He is the Sublime, Most Cognizant.
He is the One who put the Earth at your service. Roam its corners, and eat from His provisions. To Him is the final summoning.
Have you guaranteed that the One in heaven will not strike the earth and cause it to tumble?
Have you guaranteed that the One in heaven will not send upon you a violent storm? Will you then appreciate the value of My warning?
Others before them have disbelieved; how terrible was My requital!
Have they not seen the birds above them lined up in columns and spreading their wings? The Most Gracious is the One who holds them in the air. He is Seer of all things.
Where are those soldiers who can help you against the Most Gracious? Indeed, the disbelievers are deceived.
Who is there to provide for you, if He withholds His provisions? Indeed, they have plunged deep into transgression and aversion.
Is one who walks while slumped over on his face better guided, or one who walks straight on the right path?
Say, "He is the One who initiated you, and granted you the hearing, the eyes, and the brains. Rarely are you appreciative."
Say, "He is the One who placed you on earth, and before Him you will be summoned."
They challenge: "When will that prophecy come to pass, if you are truthful?"
Say, "Such knowledge is with GOD; I am no more than a manifest warner."
When they see it happening, the faces of those who disbelieved will turn miserable, and it will be proclaimed: "This is what you used to mock."
Say, "Whether GOD decides to annihilate me and those with me, or to shower us with His mercy, who is there to protect the disbelievers from a painful retribution?"
Say, "He is the Most Gracious; we believe in Him, and we trust in Him. You will surely find out who is really far astray."
Say, "What if your water sinks away, who will provide you with pure water?"
NuN, the pen, and what they (the people) write.
You have attained a great blessing from your Lord; you are not crazy.
You have attained a recompense that is well deserved.
You are blessed with a great moral character.
You will see, and they will see.
Which of you are condemned.
Your Lord is fully aware of those who strayed off His path, and He is fully aware of those who are guided.
Do not obey the rejectors.
They wish that you compromise, so they too can compromise.
Do not obey every lowly swearer.
A slanderer, a backbiter.
Forbidder of charity, a transgressor, a sinner.
Unappreciative, and greedy.
Even though he possessed enough money and children.
When our revelations are recited to him, he says, "Tales from the past!"
We will mark his face.
We have tested them like we tested the owners of the garden who swore that they will harvest it in the morning.
They were so absolutely sure.
A passing (storm) from your Lord passed by it while they were asleep.
By morning, it was barren.
They called on each other in the morning.
"Let us harvest the crop."
On their way, they confided to each other.
That from then on, none of them would be poor.
They were so absolutely sure of their harvest.
But when they saw it, they said, "We were so wrong!
"Now, we have nothing!"
The righteous among them said, "If only you had glorified (God)!"
They said, "Glory be to our Lord. We have transgressed."
They started to blame each other.
They said, "Woe to us. We sinned.
"May our Lord grant us a better one. We repent to our Lord."
Such was the requital. But the retribution of the Hereafter is far worse, if they only knew.
The righteous have deserved, at their Lord, gardens of bliss.
Shall we treat the Submitters like the criminals?
What is wrong with your logic?
Do you have another book to uphold?
In it, do you find anything you want?
Or, have you received solemn assurances from us that grant you whatever you wish on the Day of Resurrection?
Ask them, "Who guarantees this for you?"
Do they have idols? Let their idols help them, if they are truthful.
The day will come when they will be exposed, and they will be required to fall prostrate, but they will be unable to.
With their eyes subdued, humiliation will cover them. They were invited to fall prostrate when they were whole and able.
Therefore, let Me deal with those who reject this Hadith; we will lead them on whence they never perceive.
I will give them enough rope; My scheming is formidable.
Are you asking them for money, so they are burdened by the fine?
Do they know the future? Do they have it recorded?
You shall steadfastly persevere in carrying out the commands of your Lord. Do not be like (Jonah) who called from inside the fish.
If it were not for his Lord's grace, he would have been ejected into the desert as a sinner.
But his Lord blessed him, and made him righteous.
Those who disbelieved show their ridicule in their eyes when they hear the message and say, "He is crazy!"
It is in fact a message to the world.
The incontestable (event).
What an incontestable (event)!
It is truly incontestable.
Thamud and 'Ad disbelieved in the Shocker.
As for Thamud, they were annihilated by the devastating (quake).
As for 'Ad, they were annihilated by a persistent, violent storm.
He unleashed it upon them for seven nights and eight days, violently. You could see the people tossed around like decayed palm trunks.
Can you find any trace of them?
Pharaoh, others before him, and the sinners (of Sodom) were wicked.
They disobeyed the messenger of their Lord. Consequently, He requited them a devastating requital.
The flood was devastating, so we carried you on the floating (ark).
We rendered it a lesson for you, that any listening ear may understand.
When the horn is blown once.
The earth and the mountains will be carried off and crushed; utterly crushed.
That is the day when the inevitable event will come to pass.
The heaven will crack, and fall apart.
The angels will be all around, and Your Lord's dominion will then encompass eight (universes).
On that day, you will be exposed, nothing of you can be hidden.
As for the one who receives his record with his right hand, he will say, "Come read my record.
"I did believe that I was going to be held accountable."
He has deserved a happy life.
In an exalted Paradise.
Its fruits are within reach.
Eat and drink happily in return for your works in days past.
As for him who is given his record in his left hand, he will say, "Oh, I wish I never received my record.
"I wish I never knew my account.
"I wish my death was eternal.
"My money cannot help me.
"All my power is gone."
Take him and shackle him.
Burn him in Hell.
In a chain that is seventy arms long, tie him up.
For he did not believe in GOD, Most Great.
Nor did he advocate the feeding of the poor.
Consequently, he has no friend here.
Nor any food, except the bitter variety.
Food for the sinners.
I swear by what you see.
And what you do not see.
This is the utterance of an honorable messenger.
Not the utterance of a poet; rarely do you believe.
Nor the utterance of a soothsayer; rarely do you take heed.
A revelation from the Lord of the universe.
Had he uttered any other teachings.
We would have punished him.
We would have stopped the revelations to him.
None of you could have helped him.
This is a reminder for the righteous.
We know; some of you are rejectors.
It is but sorrow for the disbelievers.
It is the absolute truth.
Therefore, you shall glorify the name of your Lord, Most Great.
A questioner may question the inevitable retribution.
For the disbelievers, none can stop it.
From GOD; Possessor of the highest Height.
The angels, with their reports, climb to Him in a day that equals fifty thousand years.
Therefore, you shall resort to a gracious patience.
For they see it far away.
While we see it very close.
The day will come when the sky will be like molten rocks.
The mountains will be like fluffy wool.
No friend will care about his close friend.
When they see them, the guilty will wish he could give his own children as ransom, to spare him the retribution of that day.
Also his spouse, and his brother.
Even his whole tribe that raised him.
Even all the people on earth, if it would save him.
No; it is aflame.
Eager to burn.
It calls on those who turned away.
Those who hoarded and counted.
Indeed, the human being is anxious.
If touched by adversity, despondent.
If blessed by wealth, stingy.
Except for the worshipers.
Who always observe their contact prayers (Salat).
Part of their money is set aside.
For the poor and the needy.
They believe in the Day of Judgment.
They reverence their Lord's requital.
Their Lord's requital is not taken for granted.
They keep their chastity.
(They have relations) only with their spouses, or what is legally theirs-
anyone who transgresses these limits is a sinner.
And the believers keep their word; they are trustworthy.
Their testimony is truthful.
They consistently observe their contact prayers (Salat) on time.
They have deserved a position of honor in Paradise.
What is keeping those who disbelieved from joining you?
To the right, and to the left, they flee.
How can any of them expect to enter the blissful Paradise?
Never; we created them, and they know from what.
I solemnly swear by the Lord of the easts and the wests; we are able-
to substitute better people in your place; we can never be defeated.
Therefore, let them blunder and play, until they meet the day that is awaiting them.
That is the day they come out of the graves in a hurry, as if herded to the (sacrificial) altars.
With their eyes subdued, shame will cover them. That is the day that is awaiting them.
We sent Noah to his people: "You shall warn your people before a painful retribution afflicts them."
He said, "O my people, I am a manifest warner to you.
"To alert you that you shall worship GOD, reverence Him, and obey me.
"He will then forgive you your sins and respite you for a predetermined period. Most assuredly, GOD's appointment can never be delayed, once it is due, if you only knew."
He said, "My Lord, I have invited my people night and day.
"But my invitation only increased their aversion.
"Whenever I invited them to be forgiven by You, they placed their fingers in their ears, covered themselves with their clothes, insisted, and turned arrogant.
"Then I invited them publicly.
"Then I proclaimed to them loudly, and I spoke to them privately.
"I said, 'Implore your Lord for forgiveness; He is Forgiving.
" 'He will then shower you generously with rain.
" 'And provide you with money and children, and orchards, and streams.' "
Why should you not strive to reverence GOD?
He is the One who created you in stages.
Do you not realize that GOD created seven universes in layers?
He designed the moon therein to be a light, and placed the sun to be a lamp
And GOD germinated you from the earth like plants.
Then He returns you into it, and He will surely bring you out.
GOD made the earth habitable for you.
That you may build roads therein.
Noah said, "My Lord, they disobeyed me, and followed those who were even more corrupted when blessed with money and children.
"They schemed terrible schemes.
"They said, 'Do not abandon your gods. Do not abandon Wadd, Suwaa', Yaghouth, Ya'ooq, and Nasr.'
"They misled many. Therefore, let the wicked plunge deeper into loss."
Because of their sins they were drowned and assigned to the hellfire. They found no helpers to protect them from GOD.
Noah also said, "My Lord, do not leave a single disbeliever on earth.
"For if you let them, they will only mislead your servants and give birth to nothing but wicked disbelievers.
"My Lord, forgive me and my parents, and anyone who enters my home as a believer, and all the believing men and women. But do not give the disbelievers anything but annihilation."
Say, "I was inspired that a group of jinns listened, then said, 'We have heard a wonderful Quran.
" 'It guides to righteousness, and we have believed in it; we will never set up any idols beside our Lord.
" 'The Most High is our only Lord. He never had a mate, nor a son.
" 'It is the foolish among us who used to utter such nonsense about GOD.
" 'We thought that neither the humans, nor the jinns, could possibly utter lies about GOD.
" 'Human beings used to seek power through jinn beings, but they only afflicted them with a lot of adversity.
" 'They thought, just like you thought, that GOD would not send another (messenger).
" 'We touched the heaven and found it filled with formidable guards and projectiles.
" 'We used to sit there in order to spy. Anyone who listens is pursued by a powerful projectile.
" 'We have no idea if something bad is intended for the inhabitants of Earth, or if their Lord wills to redeem them.
" 'Some of us are righteous, and some are less than righteous; we follow various paths.
" 'We knew full well that we can never run away from GOD on Earth; we can never run away and escape.
" 'When we heard the guidance, we believed therein. Anyone who believes in his Lord will never fear any injustice, nor any affliction.
" 'Among us are the submitters, and among us are the compromisers.' " As for those who submitted, they are on the right path.
As for the compromisers, they will be fuel for Gehenna.
If they remain on the right path, we will bless them with abundant water.
We will surely test them all. As for him who disregards the message of his Lord, He will direct him to ever increasing retribution.
The places of worship belong to GOD; do not call on anyone else beside GOD.
When GOD's servant advocated Him alone, almost all of them banded together to oppose him.
Say, "I worship only my Lord; I never set up any idols beside Him."
Say, "I possess no power to harm you, nor to guide you."
Say, "No one can protect me from GOD, nor can I find any other refuge beside Him.
"I deliver GOD's proclamations and messages." Those who disobey GOD and His messenger incur the fire of Hell, wherein they abide forever.
Once they see what is awaiting them, they will find out who is really weaker in power, and fewer in number.
Say, "I do not know if what is promised to you will happen soon, or if my Lord will delay it for awhile."
He is the Knower of the future; He does not reveal the future to anyone.
Only to a messenger that He chooses, does He reveal from the past and the future, specific news.
This is to ascertain that they have delivered their Lord's messages. He is fully aware of what they have. He has counted the numbers of all things.
O you cloaked one.
Meditate during the night, except rarely.
Half of it, or a little less.
Or a little more. And read the Quran from cover to cover.
We will give you a heavy message.
The meditation at night is more effective, and more righteous.
You have a lot of time during the day for other matters.
You shall commemorate the name of your Lord, to come ever closer and closer to Him.
Lord of the east and the west; there is no other god beside Him. You should choose Him as your advocate.
And remain steadfast in the face of their utterances, and disregard them in a nice manner.
And let Me deal with the rejectors, who have been generously blessed; just give them a little time.
We have severe punishments, and Hell.
Food that can hardly be swallowed, and painful retribution.
The day will come when the earth and the mountains will quake, and the mountains will turn into a weightless pile.
We have sent to you a messenger, just as we sent to Pharaoh a messenger.
Pharaoh disobeyed the messenger and, consequently, we punished him severely.
If you disbelieve, how can you evade a day so terrible that it makes the infants gray-haired?
The heaven will shatter therefrom. His promise is true.
This is a reminder; whoever wills, let him choose the path to his Lord.
Your Lord knows that you meditate during two-thirds of the night, or half of it, or one-third of it, and so do some of those who believed with you. GOD has designed the night and the day, and He knows that you cannot always do this. He has pardoned you. Instead, you shall read what you can of the Quran. He knows that some of you may be ill, others may be traveling in pursuit of GOD's provisions, and others may be striving in the cause of GOD. You shall read what you can of it, and observe the contact prayers (Salat), give the obligatory charity (Zakat), and lend GOD a loan of righteousness. Whatever good you send ahead on behalf of your souls, you will find it at GOD far better and generously rewarded. And implore GOD for forgiveness. GOD is Forgiver, Most Merciful.
O you hidden secret.
Come out and warn.
Extol your Lord.
Purify your garment.
Forsake what is wrong.
Be content with your lot.
Steadfastly commemorate your Lord.
Then, when the horn is blown.
That will be a difficult day.
For the disbelievers, not easy.
Let Me deal with one I created as an individual.
I provided him with lots of money.
And children to behold.
I made everything easy for him.
Yet, he is greedy for more.
He stubbornly refused to accept these proofs.
I will increasingly punish him.
For he reflected, then decided
Miserable is what he decided
Miserable indeed is what he decided
He looked
He frowned and whined
Then he turned away arrogantly
He said, "This is but clever magic!
"This is human made."
I will commit him to retribution.
What retribution!
Thorough and comprehensive.
Obvious to all the people.
Over it is nineteen.
We appointed angels to be guardians of Hell, and we assigned their number (19) (1) to disturb the disbelievers, (2) to convince the Christians and Jews (that this is a divine scripture), (3) to strengthen the faith of the faithful, (4) to remove all traces of doubt from the hearts of Christians, Jews, as well as the believers, and (5) to expose those who harbor doubt in their hearts, and the disbelievers; they will say, "What did GOD mean by this allegory?" GOD thus sends astray whoever wills, and guides whoever wills. None knows the soldiers of your Lord except He. This is a reminder for the people.
Absolutely, (I swear) by the moon.
And the night as it passes.
And the morning as it shines.
This is one of the great miracles.
A warning to the human race.
For those among you who wish to advance, or regress.
Every soul is trapped by its sins.
Except for those on the right
While in Paradise, they will ask
About the guilty
"What brought you to this retribution?"
They will say, "We did not observe the contact prayers (Salat).
"We did not feed the poor.
"We blundered with the blunderers.
"We disbelieved in the Day of Judgment.
"Until certainty came to us now."
The intercession of the intercessors will never help them.
Why are they so averse to this reminder?
Running like zebras.
Who are fleeing from the lion!
Does each one of them want to receive the scripture personally?
Indeed, they do not fear the Hereafter.
Indeed, this is a reminder.
For those who wish to take heed.
They cannot take heed against GOD's will. He is the source of righteousness; He is the source of forgiveness.
I swear by the Day of Resurrection.
And I swear by the blaming soul.
Does the human being think that we will not reconstruct his bones?
Yes indeed; we are able to reconstruct his finger tip.
But the human being tends to believe only what he sees in front of him.
He doubts the Day of Resurrection!
Once the vision is sharpened.
And the moon is eclipsed.
And the sun and the moon crash into one another.
The human being will say on that day, "Where is the escape?"
Absolutely, there is no escape.
To your Lord, on that day, is the final destiny.
The human being will be informed, on that day, of everything he did to advance himself, and everything he did to regress himself.
The human being will be his own judge.
No excuses will be accepted.
Do not move your tongue to hasten it.
It is we who will collect it into Quran.
Once we recite it, you shall follow such a Quran.
Then it is we who will explain it.
Indeed, you love this fleeting life.
While disregarding the Hereafter.
Some faces, on that day, will be happy.
Looking at their Lord.
Other faces will be, on that day, miserable.
Expecting the worst.
Indeed, when (the soul) reaches the throat.
And it is ordered: "Let go!"
He knows it is the end.
Each leg will lay motionless next to the other leg.
To your Lord, on that day, is the summoning.
For he observed neither the charity, nor the contact prayers (Salat).
But he disbelieved and turned away.
With his family, he acted arrogantly.
You have deserved this.
Indeed, you have deserved this.
Does the human being think that he will go to nothing?
Was he not a drop of ejected semen?
Then He created an embryo out of it!
He made it into male or female!
Is He then unable to revive the dead?
Is it not a fact that there was a time when the human being was nothing to be mentioned?
We created the human from a liquid mixture, from two parents, in order to test him. Thus, we made him a hearer and a seer.
We showed him the two paths, then he is either appreciative, or unappreciative.
We prepared for the disbelievers chains, shackles, and a blazing Hell.
As for the virtuous, they will drink from cups spiced with nectar.
A spring that is reserved for GOD's servants; it will gush out as they will.
They fulfill their pledges, and reverence a day that is extremely difficult.
They donate their favorite food to the poor, the orphan, and the captive.
"We feed you for the sake of GOD; we expect no reward from you, nor thanks.
"We fear from our Lord a day that is full of misery and trouble."
Consequently, GOD protects them from the evils of that day, and rewards them with joy and contentment.
He rewards them for their steadfastness with Paradise, and silk.
They relax therein on luxurious furnishings. They suffer neither the heat of the sun, nor any cold.
The shade covers them therein, and the fruits are brought within reach.
They are served drinks in silver containers and cups that are translucent.
Translucent cups, though made of silver; they rightly deserved all this.
They enjoy drinks of delicious flavors.
From a spring therein known as "Salsabeel."
Serving them will be immortal servants. When you see them, they will look like scattered pearls.
Wherever you look, you will see bliss, and a wonderful dominion.
On them will be clothes of green velvet, satin, and silver ornaments. Their Lord will provide them with pure drinks.
This is the reward that awaits you, for your efforts have been appreciated.
We have revealed to you this Quran; a special revelation from us.
You shall steadfastly carry out your Lord's commandments, and do not obey any sinful disbeliever among them.
And commemorate the name of your Lord day and night.
During the night, fall prostrate before Him, and glorify Him many a long night.
These people are preoccupied with this fleeting life, while disregarding-just ahead of them-a heavy day.
We created them, and established them, and, whenever we will, we can substitute others in their place.
This is a reminder: whoever wills shall choose the path to his Lord.
Whatever you will is in accordance with GOD's will. GOD is Omniscient, Wise.
He admits whomever He wills into His mercy. As for the transgressors, He has prepared for them a painful retribution.
(Angels) dispatched in succession.
To drive the wind.
Stir up clouds.
Distribute the provisions.
Deliver messages.
Good news, as well as warnings.
What is promised will come to pass.
Thus, when the stars are put out.
The sky is opened up.
The mountains are blown up.
The messengers are summoned.
That is the appointed day.
The Day of Decision.
What a Day of Decision!
Woe on that day to the rejectors.
Did we not annihilate the earlier generations?
Then we made others follow them?
This is what we do to the criminals.
Woe on that day to the rejectors.
Did we not create you from a lowly liquid?
Then we placed it in a well-protected repository.
For a specific period.
We measured it precisely. We are the best designers.
Woe on that day to the rejectors.
Did we not make the earth an abode?
For the living and the dead?
We placed on it high mountains, and provided you with fresh water to drink.
Woe on that day to the rejectors.
Go to what you used to disbelieve in.
Go to a shade of three different densities.
Yet, it provides neither coolness, nor protection from the heat.
It throws sparks as big as mansions.
As yellow as the color of camels.
Woe on that day to the rejectors.
That is the day they do not speak.
Nor are they given permission to apologize.
Woe on that day to the rejectors.
This is the Day of Decision. We have summoned you and the previous generations.
If you have any schemes, go ahead and scheme.
Woe on that day to the rejectors.
The righteous will enjoy shade and springs.
And fruits that they desire.
Eat and drink happily in return for your works.
We thus reward the virtuous.
Woe on that day to the rejectors.
Eat and enjoy temporarily; you are guilty.
Woe on that day to the rejectors.
When they are told, "Bow down," they do not bow down.
Woe on that day to the rejectors.
Which Hadith, other than this, do they uphold?
What are they questioning?
The great event.
That is disputed by them.
Indeed, they will find out.
Most assuredly, they will find out.
Did we not make the earth habitable?
And the mountains stabilizers?
We created you as mates (for one another).
We created sleeping so you can rest.
We made the night a cover.
And the day to seek provisions.
We built above you seven universes.
We created a bright lamp.
We send down from the clouds pouring water.
To produce with it grains and plants.
And various orchards.
The Day of Decision is appointed.
The day the horn is blown, and you come in throngs.
The heaven will be opened like gates.
The mountains will be removed, as if they were a mirage.
Gehenna is inevitable.
For the transgressors; it will be their abode.
They stay in it for ages.
They never taste in it coolness, nor a drink.
Only an inferno, and bitter food.
A just requital.
They never expected to be held accountable.
And utterly rejected our signs.
We counted everything in a record.
Suffer the consequences; we will only increase your retribution.
The righteous have deserved a reward.
Orchards and grapes.
Magnificent spouses.
Delicious drinks.
They will never hear in it any nonsense or lies.
A reward from your Lord; a generous recompense.
Lord of the heavens and the earth, and everything between them. The Most Gracious. No one can abrogate His decisions.
The day will come when the Spirit and the angels will stand in a row. None will speak except those permitted by the Most Gracious, and they will utter only what is right.
Such is the inevitable day. Whoever wills let him take refuge in his Lord.
We have sufficiently warned you about an imminent retribution. That is the day when everyone will examine what his hands have sent forth, and the disbeliever will say, "Oh, I wish I were dust."
The (angels who) snatch (the souls of the disbelievers) forcibly.
And those who gently take (the souls of the believers) joyfully.
And those floating everywhere.
Eagerly racing with one another-
to carry out various commands.
The day the quake quakes.
Followed by the second blow.
Certain minds will be terrified.
Their eyes will be subdued.
They will say, "We have been recreated from the grave!
"How did this happen after we had turned into rotten bones?"
They had said, "This is an impossible recurrence."
All it takes is one nudge.
Whereupon they get up.
Have you known about the history of Moses?
His Lord called him at the holy valley of Tuwa.
"Go to Pharaoh; he has transgressed."
Tell him, "Would you not reform?
"Let me guide you to your Lord, that you may turn reverent."
He then showed him the great miracle.
But he disbelieved and rebelled.
Then he turned away in a hurry.
He summoned and proclaimed.
He said, "I am your Lord; most high."
Consequently, GOD committed him to the retribution in the Hereafter, as well as in the first life.
This is a lesson for the reverent.
Are you more difficult to create than the heaven? He constructed it.
He raised its masses, and perfected it.
He made its night dark, and brightened its morn.
He made the earth egg-shaped.
From it, He produced its own water and pasture.
He established the mountains.
All this to provide life support for you and your animals.
Then, when the great blow comes.
That is the day when the human will remember everything he did.
Hell will be brought into existence.
As for the one who transgressed.
Who was preoccupied with this life.
Hell will be the abode.
As for the one who reverenced the majesty of his Lord, and enjoined the self from sinful lusts.
Paradise will be the abode.
They ask you about the Hour, and when it will take place!
It is not you (Muhammad) who is destined to announce its time.
Your Lord decides its fate.
Your mission is to warn those who expect it.
The day they see it, they will feel as if they lasted one evening or half a day.
He (Muhammad) frowned and turned away.
When the blind man came to him.
How do you know? He may purify himself.
Or he may take heed, and benefit from the message.
As for the rich man.
You gave him your attention.
Even though you could not guarantee his salvation.
The one who came to you eagerly.
And is really reverent.
You ignored him.
Indeed, this is a reminder.
Whoever wills shall take heed.
In honorable scriptures.
Exalted and pure.
(Written) by the hands of messengers.
Who are honorable and righteous.
Woe to the human being; he is so unappreciative!
What did He create him from?
From a tiny drop, He creates him and designs him.
Then He points out the path for him.
Then He puts him to death, and into the grave.
When He wills, He resurrects him.
He shall uphold His commandments.
Let the human consider his food!
We pour the water generously.
Then we split the soil open.
We grow in it grains.
Grapes and pasture.
Olives and palms.
A variety of orchards.
Fruits and vegetables
To provide life support for you and your animals
Then, when the blow comes to pass
That is the day when one flees from his brother
From his mother and father
From his spouse and children
Each one of them, on that day, worries about his own destiny.
Some faces on that day will be happy.
Laughing and joyful.
Other faces, on that day, will be covered with misery.
Overwhelmed by remorse.
These are the wicked disbelievers.
When the sun is rolled.
The stars are crashed into each other.
The mountains are wiped out.
The reproduction is halted.
The beasts are summoned.
The oceans are set aflame.
The souls are restored to their bodies.
The girl who was buried alive is asked:
For what crime was she killed?
The records are made known.
The heaven is removed.
Hell is ignited.
Paradise is presented.
Every soul will know everything it brought.
I solemnly swear by the galaxies.
Precisely running in their orbits.
By the night as it falls.
And the morn as it breathes.
This is the utterance of an honorable messenger.
Authorized by the Possessor of the Throne, fully supported.
He shall be obeyed and trusted.
Your friend (Rashad) is not crazy.
He saw him at the high horizon.
He is not holding back any news.
It is not the talk of a rejected devil.
Now then, where will you go?
This is a message for all the people.
For those who wish to go straight.
Whatever you will is in accordance with the will of God, Lord of the universe.
When the heaven is shattered.
The planets are scattered.
The oceans are exploded.
The graves are opened.
Every soul will find out what caused it to advance, and what caused it to regress.
O you human being, what diverted you from your Lord Most Honorable?
The One who created you, designed you, and perfected you.
In whatever design He chose, He constructed it.
Indeed, you disbelieve in the religion.
Oblivious to the fact that there are (invisible) keepers around you.
They are honest recorders.
They record everything you do.
Surely, the pious have deserved bliss.
While the wicked have deserved Hell.
Will incur it on the Day of Judgment.
They never leave it.
Awesome is the Day of Judgment.
What a day; the Day of Judgment!
That is the day when no soul can help another soul, and all decisions, on that day, will belong to GOD.
Woe to the cheaters.
Who demand full measure when receiving from the people.
But when giving them the measures or weights, they cheat.
Do they not know that they will be resurrected?
On a tremendous day?
That is the day when all people will stand before the Lord of the universe.
Indeed, the book of the wicked is in Sijjeen.
Do you know what Sijjeen is?
A numerically structured book.
Woe on that day to the rejectors.
They do not believe in the Day of Judgment.
None disbelieves therein except the transgressor, the sinful.
When our revelations are recited to him, he says, "Tales from the past!"
Indeed, their hearts have become shielded by their sins.
Indeed, they will be isolated, on that day, from their Lord.
Then they will be thrown into Hell.
They will be told, "This is what you used to deny."
Indeed, the book of the righteous will be in 'Elleyyeen.
Do you know what 'Elleyyeen is?
A numerically structured book.
To be witnessed by those close to Me.
The righteous have deserved bliss.
On luxurious furnishings they watch.
You recognize in their faces the joy of bliss.
Their drinks will be spiced with nectar.
Its spice is like musk. This is what the competitors should compete for.
Mixed into it will be special flavors.
From a spring that is reserved for those close to Me.
The wicked used to laugh at those who believed.
When they passed by them, they used to poke fun.
When they got together with their people, they used to joke.
Whenever they saw them, they said, "These people are far astray!
"They have no such thing as (invisible) guards."
Today, those who believed are laughing at the disbelievers.
On luxurious furnishings they watch.
Most assuredly, the disbelievers are requited for what they did.
The time will come when the sky is ruptured.
It will submit to its Lord and expire.
The earth will be leveled.
It will eject its contents, as it erupts.
It will submit to its Lord and expire.
O humans, you are irreversibly heading for a meeting with your Lord.
As for the one who receives his record in his right hand,
His reckoning will be easy.
He will return to his people joyfully.
As for the one who receives his record behind his back,
He will be ridden with remorse.
And will burn in Hell.
He used to act arrogantly among his people.
He thought that he will never be called to account.
Yes indeed, his Lord was Seer of him.
I solemnly swear by the rosy dusk.
And the night as it spreads.
And the moon and its phases.
You will move from stage to stage.
Why do they not believe?
And when the Quran is recited to them, they do not fall prostrate.
This is because those who disbelieved are rejecting (the Quran).
GOD is fully aware of their innermost thoughts.
Promise them painful retribution.
As for those who believed and led a righteous life, they receive a recompense that is well-deserved.
The sky and its galaxies.
The promised day.
The witness and the witnessed.
Woe to the people of the canyon.
They ignited a blazing fire.
Then sat around it.
To watch the burning of the believers.
They hated them for no other reason than believing in GOD, the Almighty, the Praiseworthy.
To Him belongs the kingship of the heavens and the earth. And GOD witnesses all things.
Surely, those who persecute the believing men and women, then fail to repent, have incurred the retribution of Gehenna; they have incurred the retribution of burning.
Surely, those who believed and led a righteous life, have deserved gardens with flowing streams. This is the greatest triumph.
Indeed, your Lord's blow is severe.
He is the One who initiates and repeats.
And He is the Forgiving, Most Kind.
Possessor of the glorious throne.
Doer of whatever He wills.
Did you note the history of the troops?
Pharaoh and Thamoud?
Those who disbelieve are plagued with denial.
GOD is fully aware of them.
Indeed, it is a glorious Quran.
In a preserved master tablet.
By the sky and Al-Taareq.
Do you know what Al-Taareq is?
The bright star.
Absolutely, everyone is well guarded.
Let the human reflect on his creation.
He was created from ejected liquid.
From between the spine and the viscera.
He is certainly able to resurrect him.
The day all secrets become known.
He will have no power, nor a helper.
By the sky that returns (the water).
By the earth that cracks (to grow plants).
This is a serious narration.
Not to be taken lightly.
They plot and scheme.
But so do I.
Just respite the disbelievers a short respite.
Glorify the name of your Lord, the Most High.
He creates and shapes.
He designs and guides.
He produces the pasture.
Then turns it into light hay.
We will recite to you; do not forget.
Everything is in accordance with GOD's will; He knows what is declared, and what is hidden.
We will direct you to the easiest path.
Therefore, you shall remind; perhaps the reminder will benefit.
The reverent will take heed.
The wicked will avoid it.
Consequently, he will suffer the great Hellfire.
Wherein he never dies, nor stays alive.
Successful indeed is the one who redeems his soul.
By remembering the name of his Lord and observing the contact prayers (Salat).
Indeed, you are preoccupied with this first life.
Even though the Hereafter is far better and everlasting.
This is recorded in the earlier teachings.
The teachings of Abraham and Moses.
Are you aware of the Overwhelming?
Faces on that day will be shamed.
Laboring and exhausted.
Suffering in a blazing Hellfire.
Drinking from a flaming spring.
They will have no food except the useless variety.
It never nourishes, nor satisfies hunger.
Other faces on that day will be full of joy.
Satisfied with their work.
In an exalted Paradise.
In it, no nonsense is heard.
In it, a spring flows.
In it, there are luxurious furnishings.
And drinks made available.
And pitchers in rows.
And carpets throughout.
Why do they not reflect on the camels and how they are created?
And the sky and how it is raised.
And the mountains and how they are constructed.
And the earth and how it is built.
You shall remind, for your mission is to deliver this reminder.
You have no power over them.
As for those who turn away and disbelieve.
GOD will commit them to the great retribution.
To us is their ultimate destiny.
Then we will call them to account.
By the dawn.
And the ten nights.
By the even and the odd.
By the night as it passes.
A profound oath, for one who possesses intelligence.
Have you noted what your Lord did to 'Ad?
Erum; the town with tall buildings.
There was nothing like it anywhere.
Also Thamud, who carved the rocks in their valley.
And Pharaoh who possessed might.
They all transgressed in the land.
They spread evil throughout.
Consequently, your Lord poured upon them a whipping retribution.
Your Lord is ever watchful.
When the human being is tested by his Lord, through blessings and joy, he says, "My Lord is generous towards me."
But if He tests him through reduction in provisions, he says, "My Lord is humiliating me!"
Wrong! It is you who brought it on yourselves by not regarding the orphan.
And not advocating charity towards the poor.
And consuming the inheritance of helpless orphans.
And loving the money too much.
Indeed, when the earth is crushed, utterly crushed.
And your Lord comes, together with the angels in row after row.
On that day, Gehenna will be brought forth. On that day, the human being will remember-but what a remembrance- it will be too late.
He will say, "Oh, I wish I prepared for my (eternal) life."
On that day, no retribution could be worse than His retribution.
And no confinement is as effective as His confinement.
As for you, O content soul.
Return to your Lord, pleased and pleasing.
Welcome into My servants.
Welcome into My Paradise.
I solemnly swear by this town.
The town where you live.
The begetting and the begotten.
We created the human being to work hard (to redeem himself).
Does he think that no one will ever call him to account?
He boasts, "I spent so much money!"
Does he think that no one sees him?
Did we not give him two eyes?
A tongue and two lips?
Did we not show him the two paths?
He should choose the difficult path.
Which one is the difficult path?
The freeing of slaves.
Feeding, during the time of hardship.
Orphans who are related.
Or the poor who is in need.
And being one of those who believe, and exhorting one another to be steadfast, and exhorting one another to be kind.
These have deserved happiness.
As for those who disbelieved in our revelations, they have incurred misery.
They will be confined in the Hellfire.
By the sun and its brightness.
The moon that follows it.
The day that reveals.
The night that covers.
The sky and Him who built it.
The earth and Him who sustains it.
The soul and Him who created it.
Then showed it what is evil and what is good.
Successful is one who redeems it.
Failing is one who neglects it.
Thamud's disbelief caused them to transgress.
They followed the worst among them.
GOD's messenger said to them, "This is GOD's camel; let her drink."
They disbelieved him and slaughered her. Their Lord then requited them for their sin and annihilated them.
Yet, those who came after them remain heedless.
By the night as it covers.
The day as it reveals.
And Him who created the male and the female.
Your works are of various kinds.
As for him who gives to charity and maintains righteousness.
And upholds the scripture.
We will direct him towards happiness.
But he who is stingy, though he is rich.
And disbelieves in the scripture.
We will direct him towards misery.
His money cannot help him when he falls.
We provide the guidance.
We control the Hereafter, as well as this life.
I have warned you about the blazing Hellfire.
None burns therein except the wicked.
Who disbelieves and turns away.
Avoiding it will be the righteous.
Who gives from his money to charity.
Seeking nothing in return.
Seeking only his Lord, the Most High.
He will certainly attain salvation.
By the forenoon.
By the night as it falls.
Your Lord never abandoned you, nor did He forget.
The Hereafter is far better for you than this first (life).
And your Lord will give you enough; you will be pleased.
Did He not find you orphaned and He gave you a home?
He found you astray, and guided you.
He found you poor, and made you rich.
Therefore, you shall not forsake the orphan.
Nor shall you reprimand the beggar.
You shall proclaim the blessing your Lord has bestowed upon you.
Did we not cool your temper?
And we unloaded your load (of sins).
One that burdened your back.
We exalted you to an honorable position.
With pain there is gain.
Indeed, with pain there is gain.
Whenever possible you shall strive.
Seeking only your Lord.
By the fig and the olive.
Mount Sinai.
And this honored town (Mecca).
We created man in the best design.
Then turned him into the lowliest of the lowly.
Except those who believe and lead a righteous life; they receive a reward that is well deserved.
Why do you still reject the faith?
Is GOD not the Most Wise, of all the wise ones?
Read, in the name of your Lord, who created.
He created man from an embryo.
Read, and your Lord, Most Exalted.
Teaches by means of the pen.
He teaches man what he never knew.
Indeed, the human transgresses.
When he becomes rich.
To your Lord is the ultimate destiny.
Have you seen the one who enjoins.
Others from praying?
Is it not better for him to follow the guidance?
Or advocate righteousness?
If he disbelieves and turns away.
Does he not realize that GOD sees?
Indeed, unless he refrains, we will take him by the forelock.
A forelock that is disbelieving and sinful.
Let him then call on his helpers.
We will call the guardians of Hell.
You shall not obey him; you shall fall prostrate and draw nearer.
We revealed it in the Night of Destiny.
How awesome is the Night of Destiny!
The Night of Destiny is better than a thousand months.
The angels and the Spirit descend therein, by their Lord's leave, to carry out every command.
Peaceful it is until the advent of the dawn.
Those who disbelieved among the people of the scripture, as well as the idol worshipers, insist on their ways, despite the proof given to them.
A messenger from GOD is reciting to them sacred instructions.
In them there are valuable teachings.
In fact, those who received the scripture did not dispute until the proof was given to them.
All that was asked of them was to worship GOD, devoting the religion absolutely to Him alone, observe the contact prayers (Salat), and give the obligatory charity (Zakat). Such is the perfect religion.
Those who disbelieved among the people of the scripture, and the idol worshipers, have incurred the fire of Gehenna forever. They are the worst creatures.
Those who believed and led a righteous life are the best creatures.
Their reward at their Lord is the gardens of Eden with flowing streams, wherein they abide forever. GOD is pleased with them, and they are pleased with Him. Such is the reward for those who reverence their Lord.
When the earth is severely quaked.
And the earth ejects its loads.
The human will wonder: "What is happening?"
On that day, it will tell its news.
That your Lord has commanded it.
On that day, the people will issue from every direction, to be shown their works.
Whoever does an atom's weight of good will see it.
And whoever does an atom's weight of evil will see it.
By the fast gallopers.
Igniting sparks.
Invading (the enemy) by morning.
Striking terror therein.
Penetrating to the heart of their territory.
The human being is unappreciative of his Lord.
He bears witness to this fact.
He loves material things excessively.
Does he not realize that the day will come when the graves are opened?
And all secrets are brought out.
They will find out, on that day, that their Lord has been fully Cognizant of them.
The Shocker.
What a shocker!
Do you have any idea what the Shocker is?
That is the day when the people come out like swarms of butterflies.
The mountains will be like fluffy wool.
As for him whose weights are heavy.
He will lead a happy (eternal) life.
As for him whose weights are light.
His destiny is lowly.
Do you know what it is?
The blazing Hellfire.
You remain preoccupied with hoarding.
Until you go to the graves.
Indeed, you will find out.
Most assuredly, you will find out.
If only you could find out for certain.
You would envision Hell.
Then you would see it with the eye of certainty.
Then you will be questioned, on that day, about the blessings you had enjoyed.
By the afternoon.
The human being is utterly lost.
Except those who believe and lead a righteous life, and exhort one another to uphold the truth, and exhort one another to be steadfast.
Woe to every backbiter, slanderer.
He hoards money and counts it.
As if his money will make him immortal.
Never; he will be thrown into the Devastator.
Do you know what the Devastator is?
GOD's blazing Hellfire.
It burns them inside out.
They will be confined therein.
In extended columns.
Have you noted what your Lord did to the people of the elephant?
Did He not cause their schemes to backfire?
He sent upon them swarms of birds.
That showered them with hard stones.
He made them like chewed up hay.
This should be cherished by Quraish.
The way they cherish the caravans of the winter and the summer.
They shall worship the Lord of this shrine.
For He is the One who fed them after hunger, and provided them with security after fear.
Do you know who really rejects the faith?
That is the one who mistreats the orphans.
And does not advocate the feeding of the poor.
And woe to those who observe the contact prayers (Salat)-
who are totally heedless of their prayers.
They only show off.
And they forbid charity.
We have blessed you with many a bounty.
Therefore, you shall pray to your Lord (Salat), and give to charity.
Your opponent will be the loser.
Say, "O you disbelievers.
"I do not worship what you worship.
"Nor do you worship what I worship.
"Nor will I ever worship what you worship.
"Nor will you ever worship what I worship.
"To you is your religion, and to me is my religion."
When triumph comes from GOD, and victory.
You will see the people embracing GOD's religion in throngs.
You shall glorify and praise your Lord, and implore Him for forgiveness. He is the Redeemer.
Condemned are the works of Abee Lahab, and he is condemned.
His money and whatever he has accomplished will never help him.
He has incurred the blazing Hell.
Also his wife, who led the persecution.
She will be (resurrected) with a rope of thorns around her neck.
Proclaim, "He is the One and only GOD.
"The Absolute GOD.
"Never did He beget. Nor was He begotten.
"None equals Him."
Say, "I seek refuge in the Lord of daybreak.
"From the evils among His creations.
"From the evils of darkness as it falls.
"From the evils of the troublemakers.
"From the evils of the envious when they envy."
Say, "I seek refuge in the Lord of the people.
"The King of the people."
"The god of the people."
"From the evils of sneaky whisperers."
"Who whisper into the chests of the people."
"Be they of the jinns, or the people."